CREATED AT: 2023-01-22 14:51:18.409091
BASE DOMAIN: https://www.naturalpower.com


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com
privacy policy
View all
Graeme Cook
Renewable heat
Field technician
People come to work for Natural Power for a number of reasons, but what unites us is our passion. Sometimes the work is challenging, but as a helpful and friendly team, we share and overcome these challenges together.
I worked for two years on the Knowledge Transfer Partnership (KTP) between Natural Power and University of Strathclyde. Together, we developed a new through-life management service that allows clients to monitor the health of their wind turbines and effectively plan their end-of-life strategies.
Health & Safety at Natural Power
Golden, USA
© Natural Power 2023
Rest of world
Europe
Contact
Glasgow, Scotland
Latwind Energías Renovables - Valparaiso, Chile
Submit
Back
Natural Power operates globally across 14 offices
Dublin, Ireland
Projects
Asset management
Amber Wright
(GB)
We're an independent consultant and service provider, and we only ever work on green energy projects.
Nantes, France
(US)
Natural Power is an independent consultant and service provider. And we only ever work on green energy projects.
results (of
Director of Offshore Planning & Environment
read story
Knowledge Centre
News
USA
Re-consult - Ankara, Turkey
Natural Power is set to accelerate the implementation of its proven
Knowledge centre
Aberystwyth, Wales
Our vision, mission and values
Life at Natural Power
Inspections
Engineering and operations
. Natural Power
Change to
Service
Planning, permitting and environment
Recent news
Load the next
Geotechnical services
Engineering and design
Search for services, sectors, projects and more
Enter a search term.
(FR)
Analysis
Natural Power
Stirling, Scotland
Expertise
Homepage
Wind turbine inspections
Results
Gdynia, Poland
Your current location is the UK and Ireland
Advisory
By submitting this form, you are signing up to receive news from Natural Power and are consenting to the terms of our
Knowledge
Contact sales
Email address
Current vacancies
Chris Pendlebury
Working to create a world powered by renewable energy.
Inverness, Scotland
About
Policies
George Elderfield
Onshore wind
)
Operations and asset management
.
view project
Hybrid white paper
Change Region
Phone
Health and safety
Echo
Sense
Our Projects
Advising Network Rail to secure renewable PPA
Submitting...
Our expertise
UK and Ireland
More stories
Principal environmental consultant
Welcome to Natural Power
Global Headquarters, Castle Douglas
What’s really stood out to me from the start is the sense of community and teamwork at Natural Power.
The
Our expert teams can take your project and turn it into a safe, reliable and successful venture from beginning to end.
36
Search
I would say my biggest achievement is simply having a role that I enjoy doing, with a team that I enjoy working with, for a company that I admire and want to be involved in making successful.
Connect with us
It’s important to me to think that what I’m doing has a wider societal purpose (and that it’s ‘helping the birds’). I like to think that my tiny, wee contribution to the huge process of helping the uptake of renewables to happen, and thereby moving away from fossil fuels...
Centre
England
Our Vision
17 Nov 2022
Leadership
Filter by category
Service and repair
Sector
Gothenburg, Sweden
We found
Natural Power’s HSEQ Director, Frank Monaghan, has been appointed to the leadership board of SafetyOn, the UK’s onshore wind safety organisation. He’s joined by Stewart Reid, Natural Power’s Manager of HSEQ, who has been appointed as vice chair of the technical advisory committee (TAC).
×
Life extension
submit
Due diligence
Subscribe to our newsletter
Natural Power has officially been awarded Carbon Neutral Plus status by Carbon Footprint Ltd.
EchoSense deployment accelerates to tackle wind production challenges as new bats become endangered
Careers
France
Natural Power achieves Carbon Neutral Plus status
Construction
Want to learn more?
Project management
Carbon Neutral Plus
®
Menu
Keep up to date with all the latest insights, reports and case studies
Grid, storage and infrastructure
United States of America
Planning, permitting and environment
Address
20 Jan 2023
Reliability engineer and former KTP associate
History
Solar
Hydro
Certifications
London, England
Since 1995 we have worked towards creating a better environment for future generations and provided expert advice for over 3,500 projects to help progress our vision: working to create a world powered by renewable energy.
0
Newcastle, England
Offshore wind
Seattle, USA
(USA)
smart bat curtailment technology in a move to ensure the protection of endangered bat species at wind projects in North America.
All
Legals
Partners and membership organisations
6 Dec 2022
Natural Power HSEQ Director appointed to SafetyOn leadership
NY, USA


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/advisory/planning-permitting-and-environment
Business Development Manager
Talk to our service experts about your needs
We offer environmental advice and site inspection during the feasibility and construction of a project and throughout its life. Put simply, we make sure your proposed project follows the rules.
Surname
Fiona Stryjewski
SERVICE
More services
Share
We go out to sites and perform environmental audits, including bird and bat monitoring, collision studies, and habitat surveys. Using ecological modelling techniques, we use the data we collect to develop habitat and species management plans. These plans help to define the requirements for the site and project. The geospatial (GIS) team create visuals of how a site will look to help with planning documents and help with stakeholder engagement.
Your Company
We also make sure that this feeds into all parts of our project design and development.
Talk to
send enquiry
Email
Our planning department brings together qualified planners with project managers and a range of technical specialists to support our clients during their projects.
To make this process as easy as possible for you, we can find areas where there may be risks and keep your project compliant.
Message
We work closely with regulatory bodies to keep up to date with changes to policies and requirements. We can provide advice on environmental requirements on topics such as forestry management, species specific studies and collision avoidance.
Renewables Planning, Permitting & Environment | Natural Power
Natural Power offers and performs a range of planning and permitting related services right the way through an asset’s life.
Talk to Fiona Stryjewski about this service
fionas@naturalpower.com
We make sure that planning applications are robust; we take into account environmental and community concerns; and we consult stakeholders at the right stages. We draw on our local knowledge to reduce risk and increase consent success wherever possible, and we plan, manage and ensure compliance during operation. All of this counts towards getting consent for your project.
First Name


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/legals
Your access to and use of the Site is also subject to the following terms and conditions and all applicable laws. By accessing and browsing the Site, you accept, without limitation or qualification, the Terms and Conditions.
Trade Marks
‘Natural Power’ also assumes no responsibility, and shall not be liable for, any damage to, or virus that may infect, your computer equipment or other property on account of your access to, use of browsing in the Site or your downloading of any materials provided that we do not limit in any way our liability by law for death or personal injury caused by our negligence. Everything on the Site is provided to you “AS IS” WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, OR NON-INFRINGEMENT provided that we do not limit in any way our liability by law for death or personal injury caused by our negligence.
The terms and conditions listed below, as well as any other law or regulation that applies to this website (the ‘Site’), the Internet or the Worldwide Web, apply to all Site users.
You must not use any registered or unregistered trade marks on the Site without either our prior written permission or the prior written permission of the relevant trade mark owner.
‘Natural Power’ has not reviewed any or all of the sites linked to the Site and is not responsible for the content or the privacy policies of any off-site pages or any other sites linked to the Site.
legals
Terms and conditions
ZephIR® and VENTOS® are registered trademarks of Natural Power. WindManager™, Melogale™, WindCentre™, ForeSite™, SeaPlanner™, and OceanPod™ are trademarks of Natural Power.
Your use of and browsing in the Site are at your risk. Neither ‘Natural Power’ nor its affiliated entities, nor any of its agencies, nor any other party involved in creating, producing, or delivering the Site, is liable for any direct, incidental, consequential, indirect, or punitive damages or losses arising out of your access to, or use of, the Site provided that we do not limit in any way our liability by law for death or personal injury caused by our negligence.
Our Terms and Conditions | Legals | Natural Power
Privacy policy
While ‘Natural Power’ endeavours to include accurate and up to date information in the Site, ‘Natural Power’ makes no warranties or representations as to its accuracy. ‘Natural Power’ assumes no liability or responsibility for any errors or omissions in the content of the Site.
You are prohibited from posting or transmitting any unlawful, threatening, defamatory, obscene, scandalous, inflammatory or profane material or any material that could constitute or encourage conduct that would be considered a criminal offence, give rise to civil liability, or otherwise violate any law. ‘Natural Power’ will fully cooperate with any law enforcement authorities or court order requesting or directing ‘Natural Power’ to disclose the identity of anyone posting any such information or materials and reserves the right to remove any such materials at any time from this Site.
Subject to your compliance with these Terms and Conditions, and solely for so long as you are permitted by ‘Natural Power’ to access and use the Site, you may download and view one (1) copy of any content and software on the Site to which we provide you access or download, on any single computer, solely for your personal, non-commercial use, provided that you keep intact all copyright and other proprietary notices. Except as otherwise expressly authorised in writing in advance by ‘Natural Power’, you agree not to reproduce, modify, rent, lease, loan, sell, distribute, adapt, translate, create derivative works based (whether in whole or in part) on, reverse engineer, decompile or disassemble any services or software, all or any part of the Site, or any materials made available through the Site. Certain software may be governed by an additional end user licence agreement to which you may be required to agree before using such software.
The Natural Power Consultants ‘Natural Power’ (Registered No. SC177881, VAT No. GB243692648, Office: The Green House, Forrest Estate, Dalry, Castle Douglas, DG7 3XS) maintains this Site for your information and communication. You may not, however, distribute, modify, transmit, reuse, repost, or use the content of the Site for public or commercial purposes, including the text, images, audio and video without the written permission of ‘Natural Power’.
More legals


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/sector/onshore-wind
Evaluating site feasibility
Permitting
At the end of a wind farm’s expected life, we can also work with you to plan extensions or re-powering.
SECTOR
Compliance and construction
Talk to our sector experts about your needs
Engineering design lead
We can provide you with the right advice at the right time to make sure your wind farm is safe, compliant and productive. We’re wind energy experts.
Engineering
We work from the beginning to the end of a wind farm’s life. Our services include:
We have a strong portfolio of work that shows we support you through all stages of a project lifecycle, planning, building and managing your wind farm.
Wind turbine maintenance and repair
Shane Bermingham
More sectors
Wind farm design
Onshore Wind Energy | Onshore Wind Power | Natural Power
Talk to Shane Bermingham about this sector


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/engineering-operations/geotechnical-services
A successful energy project must have a solid foundation.
Geotechnical Services for Renewable Energy | Natural Power
We work with our clients to provide the rights methods for each project. These methods include traditional land surveys and the use of UAV drones to survey large areas.
We investigate the ground at a proposed site to check the foundations and conditions. Our drilling team work with our geophysicists and chartered, geotechnical and civil engineers to carry out a range of sampling methods so we can highlight any potential risks. To complement the site investigation and design works, we also undertake topographic surveys and terrain analysis.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/leadership
LEADERSHIP
Managing director
HSEQ director
Our values
William Black
Global Director of Planning & Environment Planning & Environment
Linkedin
Frank Monaghan
It is also the role of our leadership team to guide and nurture our teams so we can shape leaders of the future. They help support and develop our people, enabling them to reach their potential.
Rob Brown
Richard Nash
Here you can meet our leadership team and find out more about what they do and how they help drive Natural Power forward so we can create a world powered by renewable energy.
President, North America operations
More from about
Senior team
Seán Manley
Country director, Ireland
Giles Dearden
Keith Burns
Director
Commercial director
Construction director
Director of due diligence
Leanne Ramage
Ralph Spernagel
Director of finance
Group partners
Jeremy Sainsbury
Stephen Brignall
Director of service operations
We’ve always tried to lead the way in making renewable energy the technology of the future, and we pride ourselves on being a team that shares insight and engages in discussion with the wider renewables industry. They use their collective expertise to support our clients and the business.
|
Jim Adams
Director of advisory and analytics
Our leadership team brings a broad range of experience to the business.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/legals/privacy-policy
We do not make extensive use of cookies but do use Google Analytics to optimise our websites. The personal data collected through Google Analytics is:
Company
We receive data about our website usage through Google Analytics.
You can invoke any of your rights at any time using the contact details listed in this notice. Please be aware that we can ask for identification documents to confirm we are disclosing information to the correct person. If you elect a representative to invoke these rights on your behalf we will request that the representative can demonstrate they have the authority to act on your behalf and their identity.
Right to erasure of your data
Phone: (+44) (0) 303 123 1113
You are not required to provide this information to us before you can use our website. When you visit our website we inform you of our use of cookies. By clicking the ‘Ok’ button on our cookie banner, you are providing an affirmative action to consent to our use of this technology. You can always withdraw your consent or ‘opt-out’ out of the use of cookies by changing the cookie settings in your browser to stop the collection and use of cookie technology.
To find out more information on computer cookie technology visit this webpage: http://www.whatarecookies.com/
Retention of your personal data
Right to information on how your data is processed
Legals - Natural Power
This is the web site of The Natural Power Consultants Limited. Our postal address is The Green House, Forrest Estate, Dalry, Castle Douglas DG7 3XS, SCOTLAND, UK We can be reached via email at sayhello@naturalpower.com or you can reach us by telephone at +44 (0)1644 430 008.
Time the form was submitted
Preface
Receiving Data Through Third-Parties
Right to object to us processing your personal data
Right to data portability
Categories of Personal Data We Process
Name
Job title
Purposes of processing your personal data legal basis
Your Rights
Internet Protocol (IP) Address
Capture details on those interested in receiving our occasional newsletters
Email: dpo@naturalpower.com
IP Address
The amount of personal data we collect on our website is limited. We have a newsletter sign up form which allows us to communicate company news with those who wish to receive it. The information that we capture on our newsletter form is:
Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO)
Browsing activity
Supervisory Authority
Each internet browser has different settings to block cookie placements. Please review your internet browser’s method for blocking cookie placements.
Administration System
We may share information as necessary if our company agrees or negotiates any of the following: (1) the sale of the company or its assets or (2) the sale of one of our businesses or its assets.  We may share information with the acquirer and its representatives after the transaction closes or as part of negotiations and due diligence.
Right of access to the personal data we hold on you
We are always happy to fulfil any one of your rights. Your rights with respect to the personal data that we process on you are:
We use our legitimate interest as a data controller as the legal grounds for capturing personal data, provided that those interests are not overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. These interests enable us to:
Consent is captured through your clicking of the ‘Ok’ button on our cookie banner.
Sharing of your information
We will never sell personal data to a third party.
You can opt-out of Google Analytics by installing the opt-out extension for your internet browser which you can find by following this link: https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
Opting-out
We do not conduct any automated decision making or profiling when you visit our website.
Analyse website performance
Right to lodge a complaint with a data protection regulator
Phone: (+44) (0) 1644 430 008
We are committed to protecting the privacy of everybody that visits our website. This privacy notice is our way of being transparent to you about how we use your personal data when you visit our website and demonstrate our fair processing practices.
Right to rectify any inaccurate data we process on you
Consent Statement
We use cookies on this website to analyse website performance. By using this website you are consenting to the use of cookie technology.
Data Controller
Address: Natural Power, The Greenhouse, Forrest Estate, Dalry, Dumfries & Galloway, DG7 3XS, Scotland, UK.
We may also process the personal data we capture on our website to comply with an applicable law, legal or regulatory obligations or regulatory inquiries or requests.
Location
Natural Power is the data controller for all personal data collected and processed when selling a Natural Power service or product. Natural Power collect and process data for a number of purposes outlined in this notice. If you have a specific query relating to how we process your personal data, you can contact our us on:
Right not to be subject to automated decision making
We retain information captured in Google Analytics for 25 months


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/life-at-natural-power
Life at natural power
Interested in working with us? See our careers section
Sometimes the work is challenging, but as a helpful and friendly team, we share and overcome these challenges together. In addition to company benefits, we’ll also invest in your skills and development.
Our vision, mission and values have drawn similar people to Natural Power, and our passion is what unites us.
Multi-platform wind turbine technician
Our culture
Scott Bennett
Principal land agent
Louise Renton
Wind farm operations assistant
You can grow within Natural Power and get the most out of your career here. We want you to do your best. Our staff also run a busy social hub, and they organize events all year round. Even socially we aim to create a better environment and give back to our communities, so we often run charity events or environmental projects.
Jai Lawless
life at natural power


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/advisory/analysis
Through providing you with layout design and optimising the array for the on-site wind climate, we make sure that your project can perform at its best and produces the maximum amount of energy.
Our experts will advise you on which type, location and duration of monitoring equipment to use during on-site monitoring. Our in-house monitoring team offers full data monitoring packages, collecting on-site data and providing regular checking and quality control. We spot any issues with equipment or data quality early, which minimises downtime and campaign costs.
onshore
repowering
Operational reporting
Talk to George Elderfield about this service
. Covering both
Layout design and optimisation
here
projects, including those with hybrid, storage and solar technologies, we provide a range of standard and bespoke analytical solutions, keeping you informed at every step of the project’s development.
We can also carry out indicative energy yield analysis (iEYA) to estimate energy yields before any on-site data are available. We can advise you on the best turbine configuration for the project, informing early planning application strategies.
and
Working with you at the earliest stage of development, our site scoping and benchmarking services help to identify strong projects from the start.
Post-construction services
Our ecology, GIS, wind, solar and storage analysis teams deliver analytical services that cover all stages of a project: feasibility, development, operations and re-powering.
We provide an operational reporting service for existing assets, with regular reports detailing site performance relative to warranties and budget. We identify where your asset is underperforming so that any issues can be fixed. We also offer curtailment analysis, lenders reports and annual warranty reports when you need them.
Natural Power helps owners and investors to better understand their operational assets by performing SCADA-based post-construction energy yield analyses that assess the performance of wind energy projects. For extension sites we can use production data combined with on-site mast data or modelled datasets to get the energy yield of the proposed site. By taking this approach, we can minimise uncertainty compared to a standard pre-construction yield assessment.
Operational performance analysis
Natural Power’s Analytics team offers expert support and services that cover all stages of a wind energy project’s lifecycle, from feasibility and development through to operations and
Data monitoring campaign design
We have performed over 68 GW of finance-grade EYAs globally. Accepted by banks and independent financial institutions, developers and investors use our analyses to help them completely understand a project’s potential.
offshore
Finance-grade EYAs
Pre-construction services
For information on how our Analytics team can help you with your solar project, click
Using reliable data from the start of a project will lead to its success.
For our indicative wind resource assessment services we use a range of mesoscale modelled data products and our in-house Computation Fluid Dynamics package, VentosTM, to give early predictions of the on-site resource. We take a tailored site-specific approach to modelling, selecting the most appropriate flow model to accurately capture the topographic interaction of the site. The resulting wind speed and wind flow constraints maps allow our clients to better understand their sites, allowing for informed layout design.
Renewable Energy Project Analysis | Natural Power
Indicative wind resource assessments
Indicative energy yield analysis (iEYA)
Site scoping and benchmarking


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/advisory/analysis
Commercial manager - advisory
Talk to Evan Osler about this service
Our renewable energy analysis, ecology, spatial analysis and modeling teams deliver analytical services that cover all stages of a project: feasibility, development, operations and repowering.
Due dilligence
Solar and energy storage inspections
evano@naturalpower.com
Energy storage
Sign up here to recieve the latest news
During feasibility and development, we use finance grade energy yield and suitability assessments to understand if a site is viable. We use tools such as geographic information systems (GIS) and wildlife curtailment analysis to get a picture of how well an asset might perform.
Solar and storage
Knowledge Center
Evan Osler
We are always looking for ways to improve how our clients’ assets perform, so we are always reassessing our methods to make sure they meet or exceed industry norms and best practices.
Once a site is running, we look for areas of underperformance and help to provide strategies to improve it. Ongoing analysis ensures your asset continues to operate at its best, which means a better return for you.
Your current location is the United States of America
Environmental technology


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/legals
Terms and Conditions


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/legals/terms-conditions



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/sector/solar
support tax equity investor
Find more information about our solar expertise in our
Our in-house inspections team can perform site visits to assess construction quality, compile punch lists for construction contractors to rectify, and evaluate the health of operating assets in support of purchase or sale processes or amidst warranty claims.
Solar | Natural Power
Our due diligence team provides services throughout the transaction cycle, from initial risk assessment and red flag reporting in early transaction stages through to detailed Independent Engineer review to
and lender requirements.
Our team’s hands-on experience with inspections of installations in North America informs our understanding of PV plant design and operations. Natural Power has expertise in bifacial solar technology, extended plant lifetime considerations, project repowering, and combined solar and storage facilities.
by selecting Solar from the Sector drop down menu.
Talk to Evan Osler about this sector
We also provide ongoing technical advisory services during construction and operations.
administration system
We’ve built a specialized independent engineering team that can assess the potential of new solar projects from an energy, constructability and long-term financial, engineering and regulatory perspective.
Our experienced construction team is on hand to provide project management, procurement support, owner’s engineering and construction management to ensure that projects are on time, on budget and compliant.
We support project sponsors and investors alike in getting PV projects — regardless of scale — financed and built on time, operating successfully and transacted over their operating lives.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/history
The journey we have taken from being a small band of passionate enthusiasts to a proud business of market-leading specialists continues to inspire the people working for and with Natural Power.
This led to a lot of firsts.
Having signed as a developer’s agent for Powergen and with the security of several development projects under their belts, they began building their team.  They grew Natural Power based on pure enthusiasm and a belief in what the company was doing. It was very flexible and ambitious:
As a company, it was passionate in the belief that renewables were viable, but it was necessary to get them as economic as possible.
In Ted’s words;
“We had no monetary ambition. Our ambition was purely to develop quality wind farms that would raise the debate about climate change and to start offsetting carbon from fossil fuels.”
With power from renewable sources, heat from a ground source heat pump and water from underground aquifers, it represented a company that lives and breathes clean energy.
As part of the sale, the team would move to the Forest Estate.  They wanted to prove that you could run a high-tech business from a rural location and support that local population. The Green House would send a powerful statement that Natural Power wasn’t simply greening around the edges.
HISTORY
Our overseas teams are growing rapidly, and we are exploring new markets and technologies and sharing important insights and experience. We continue to find new ways to make the industry perform better, whilst satisfying our appetite for knowledge.
Natural Power was the first company to consent a 50MW project, it consented the first offshore wind farm in Scottish waters, combining two of the Crown Estate Round 1 sites into a single project called Robin Rigg, the biggest offshore project at the time.
It’s all about making renewables the technology of the future and continuing our quest to create a better environment.
By 1999 they recognised that to get a competitive advantage they would need a partner. After approaching some key players, they received a call from Jeremy Sainsbury who worked with Fred. Olsen on his estate in Dumfries. They had a shared belief in the viability of renewables, the chemistry was right and a month later Fred. Olsen bought Natural Power.
“We worked hard, but we also had fun. If there was a good day of snowfall, we would take the day off to go skiing and work all weekend to make up for it,” says Ted. “We had a ‘people like us’ policy: rather than employing specialists we employed people with a similar ethos, and that was the mentality of the company.”
The team did everything to make renewables projects better, more efficient and more cost effective. As Ted explained “It wasn’t enough to simply build renewable projects. Our job was to build them, learn from them and take that learning to make sure we do better the next time. Every time we identified any issues or a standard that fell below par out ethos was to improve it.”
For 25 years Natural Power has contributed to the growth of renewables from a fledgling industry into a maturing one of global importance. Not only do renewables provide the cleanest form of energy generation, they are now providing the cheapest. In doing so, renewable energy can no longer be seen as the stuff of ideology. It is a sustainable, self-supporting and vital part of our modern energy mix.
We’re advising our clients on solar and energy storage and how to tackle the next big challenge of our time: the decarbonisation of heat.
In 1995, two recent graduates, Ted Leeming and Stuart Hall, took the decision to go into business. They wanted to tackle the very real fear of climate change and help to create a better environment for future generations.
As renewable projects were starting to grow in number and more projects were connected to the National Grid, safety became a primary concern. The ControlCentre became a solution to that problem, originally starting out as a health and safety exercise, it was working to the wind turbine safety rules, which the Natural Power team helped to create.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/a-propos/histoire
Partenariats
En tant qu’entreprise, nous étions convaincus de la viabilité des énergies renouvelables, mais nous comprenions également qu’il fallait les rendre aussi économiques que possible. L’équipe fit tout ce qui était en son pouvoir pour rendre les projets en renouvelables plus attractifs, plus efficaces et plus rentables. Comme Ted le souligne : « Proposer de simples projets en renouvelables n’était pas suffisant. Notre travail c’était de de construire ces projets, d’apprendre d’eux, et d’être sûr de pouvoir mettre cette expertise acquise au service du prochain projet pour pouvoir s’améliorer. Notre éthique nous incombait d’identifier le moindre problème ou la moindre norme défaillante qui ne correspondait pas à notre éthique et d’y remédier.
Le chemin que nous avons parcouru, depuis notre petite bande d’enthousiastes jusqu’à l’entreprise fière de spécialistes leaders sur le marché, continue d’inspirer les personnes qui travaillent pour et avec Natural Power. Nos équipes à l’étranger se développent rapidement et nous explorons de nouveaux marchés et technologies tout en partageant notre expertise de taille ainsi que notre expérience. Nous continuons de trouver de nouvelles façons d’améliorer les performances du secteur tout en ayant à cœur de satisfaire notre appétence pour l’acquisition de savoirs. Nous conseillons nos clients sur l’énergie solaire et sur le stockage de l’énergie, mais également sur la manière de relever le prochain grand défi de notre époque: la décarbonisation de la chaleur.
Tous
Management de projet
La vie chez Natural Power
Sécurité et Santé
Eolien terrestre
A propos
Centre de conduite
En savoir plus ?
S'abonner à la newsletter
Services géotechniques
Addresse email
Petit hydraulique
Base de connaissances
Bienvenue chez Natural Power
Environnement et planning
A l’aube du nouveau millénaire ils reconnurent qu’ils auraient besoin d’un associé pour gagner en compétitivité. Après avoir sollicité plusieurs acteurs majeurs, ils reçurent l’appel de Jeremy Sainsbury, qui travaillait avec Fred. Olsen sur son site à Dumfries. Ils partageaient la même vision sur la viabilité du renouvelable, et avaient une alchimie telle que Fred. Olsen racheta Natural Power un mois plus tard. La vente sous-entendait que l’équipe entière se relocaliserait sur le site de Forest Estate. Le nouveau groupe voulait prouver qu’il était possible de diriger une entreprise high-tech à partir d’un emplacement rural tout en soutenant la population locale. Le site Green House enverrait le message fort suivant: non, Natural Power n’est pas une entreprise écolo seulement quand ça l’arrange. Bénéficiant d’une énergie verte grâce à la chaleur provenant d’une thermopompe souterraine et grâce à l’eau puisée dans les nappes aquifères, Natural Power se présentait comme un champion de l’énergie renouvelable.
Voire les
Recherche
Conseil
Solaire photovoltaïque
Changer de région
Chercher
Filtrer par categorie
Accueil
Éolien terrestre
Selon Ted:
Réseau, stockage et infrastructure
consentez a notre politique de
Tandis que le nombre de projets en énergies renouvelables se multipliait et que de plus en plus de projets étaient connectés au réseau national (National Grid), la sécurité devint une préoccupation majeure. Le ControlCentre permit de remédier à ce problème : il prit initialement forme sous l’aspect d’un exercice de santé et de sécurité et fonctionnait de pair avec les régulations des éoliennes, dont l’équipe de Natural Power participa à la conception.
Carrières
Chercher des services, des secteurs, projets ou autres
Changer pour
Resultats
Projets
Chaleur renouvelable
Natural Power fut la première entreprise à se lancer dans un projet de 50MW, et elle fut également la première à établir une ferme éolienne en mer dans les eaux Ecossaises, combinant ainsi deux des sites de Crown Estate Round 1 en un seul projet baptisé Robin Rigg qui devint à l’époque le plus grand projet offshore.
Restez en contact
Secteur
En 1995, Ted Leeming et Stuart Hall, tous deux fraîchement diplômés, prirent la décision de se lancer dans le monde du business. Ils avaient pour objectif de prendre à bras le corps la peur très réelle du changement climatique et d’aider à construire un meilleur environnement pour les générations futures.
Eolien en mer
En continuant vous vous abonnez à notre newsletter  et
Votre location France
Secteurs
s'abonner
Nos valeurs
“Ce n’était pas l’argent qui nous motivait. Nous voulions purement et simplement développer des fermes éoliennes de qualité qui permettraient d’élever le débat autour du changement climatique tout en commençant à compenser le carbone des combustibles fossiles fossiles."
Actualités
Depuis 25 ans Natural Power a contribué à l’expansion des énergies renouvelables en partant d’une industrie naissante pour tendre vers une industrie mature qui relève d’une importance mondiale. L’énergie renouvelable ne fournit pas seulement la forme de génération d’énergie la plus propre ; elle est également la plus économique. En ce faisant, l’énergie renouvelable en soi ne peut plus seulement être l’apanage d’une idéologie. Durable et auto-suffisante, c’est une partie vitale de notre bouquet énergétique moderne.
Après avoir signé son contrat avec Powergen en tant qu’agent de développement et s’être assuré d’avoir quelques projets de développements sous le pied, ils commencèrent à monter leur équipe. Natural Power vit le jour grâce à un enthousiasme débordant et la certitude que ceux qu’ils étaient en train de construire avait du sens. L’entreprise se voulait très flexible et ambitieuse à la fois:
Pour nous, il s’agit donc de faire des énergies renouvelables la technologie du futur et de poursuivre notre quête initiale afin de créer un meilleur environnement pour demain.
Contactez-nous
Retour
Cela nous mena à tout un ensemble de premières fois.
confidentialité
Ingénierie
Nous sommes un consultant indépendant, et nous travaillons uniquement sur des projets en énergie verte.
Analyse
Entrer un mot
Notre histoire
Histoire
"Nous travaillions dur tout en prenant du plaisir. Si la veille beaucoup de neige était tombé, nous décidions de prendre un jour off pour partir skier, et nous travaillions en contrepartie tout le week-end », raconte Ted. « Nous avions à cœur d’embaucher des gens « qui nous ressemblaient » au lieu de faire appel à des spécialistes ; nous prenions des gens qui partageaient la même éthique. C’était ça l’état d’esprit de notre entreprise.”
résultats (total
En cours...
Mentions légales
Eolien en mer et câbles d’interconnexion


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/base-de-connaissances
Are hybrid renewable projects the future?
2023
6 Jul 2021
From project to portfolio: The rise in platform mergers and acquisitions
Unlocking the value of your project in an uncertain world
2019
Through life management of wind assets
Region
Natural Power, has provided technical due diligence on behalf of Brookfield Renewable, one of the world’s largest clean energy investors, in support of its acquisition of Scout Clean Energy for $1 billion.
Peak Guidance
, a smart curtailment technology.
DARC system overview
January
Some of the biggest deals in the renewable energy sector in recent years have not just involved individual projects being sold or financed but entire platforms changing hands. Mergers and acquisitions (M&A) of renewable energy developers with large project pipelines played a major role in making 2021 a landmark year for power sector deals.
Year
Idées et rapports
Natural Power agit pour les énergies renouvelables depuis plus de 25 ans. Nous nous engageons à partager nos savoirs et nos idées pour contribuer au progrès global de notre secteur et créer un monde animé par les énergies renouvelables. Vous trouverez ici des livres blancs (white books) sur des sujets clefs du secteur, des blogs éclairés tenus par nos spécialistes et des informations et vidéos utiles.
Is your project underperformance caused by trackers?
May
8 Jun 2021
Categorie
8 Nov 2022
Reste du monde
Fixed and Floating - Rick Campbell
2021
April
Balancing bat conservation and wind energy production with EchoSense®
Natural Power kicks-off construction at Benbrack Wind Farm for Red Rock Power
Natural Power supports Brookfield’s $1 billion investment in Scout Clean Energy
July
Media
GB et Irelande
15 Dec 2021
November
2022
Téléchargements
Balancing bat preservation and wind energy production with EchoSense®
Scottish Ministers have today, Friday 21st October, approved an application by Fred. Olsen Renewables to extend Rothes Wind Farm in Moray.
21 Oct 2022
Knowledge Centre | Natural Power
September
28 Sep 2021
Download
Presentations
Natural Power secures consent for Rothes Wind Farm extension
11 Mar 2022
Q&A Vidéo module bifaciaux
1 Sep 2022
Solar racking systems that track he sun (trackers) are being deployed in photovoltaic (PV) projects across the globe due to their decreasing costs.  Trackers are the only moving parts within a PV system and are therefore subject to breakdown and wear and tear...
White paper
19 Dec 2022
June
22 Nov 2022
9 Dec 2022
From project to portfolio:  The rise in platform mergers and acquisitions
October
To minimize bat fatalities while maximizing energy production, Natural Power has developed
18 Oct 2022
Setting the standard: US offshore wind development
Month
December
Solar PV repowering
. Energie naturelle
Filtrer par:
2020
February
The business case for hybrid projects
Voir plus
Leading renewable energy consultancy and service provider, Natural Power, has commenced work at Red Rock Power’s Benbrack onshore wind farm in Dumfries and Galloway.
August
Modules solaires bifaciaux
Titre
March
Date
Climate change and severe weather series 2: Increased solar project flood risk
Wildfires in the US
Increasing solar project flood risk
8 Dec 2022
31 Oct 2022


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/actualite/echosense-deployment-accelerates-to-tackle-wind-production-challenges-as-new-bats-become-endangered
system is tried, tested, installed and operating across numerous sites in North America to protect bats when they are active on a site, while allowing operation and energy production in times when they are not present.”
The efficacy study of
· Meteorological data is collected on every turbine and processed against highly configurable bat protection rules for each turbine
If the tricolored bat is also listed as endangered as proposed in late 2022, over 70% of operational US wind projects would then fall within the range of an endangered species of bat.
system can be grouped into two subsystems:
smart bat curtailment technology in a move to ensure the protection of endangered bat species at wind projects in North America. On January 30, 2023, the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service will officially up-list the northern long-eared bat to endangered. For wind energy professionals, this means that the exemption for wind energy projects under the 4(d) rule no longer applies.
Natural Power, a leading renewable energy consultancy and service provider, is set to accelerate the implementation of its proven
· Presence of bats can be aggregated site-wide or by predefined zones (based on data driven approach) allowing optimization for geography and habitat of individual sites
· Nacelles that are instrumented for acoustic data collection are fitted with microphones mounted on brackets on the top of the nacelle, and a bat detector within the nacelle
Kevin Denman, Head of Environmental Technology at Natural Power, said: “Project owners and operators may need to consider smart curtailment measures to ensure energy production is not significantly compromised by the change to the listed status of this species.”
While the exact production numbers for the 69 wind turbines at English Farms are not public, for a wind farm of similar size with average wind conditions,
can increase the energy production by more than 5,000MWh per year.
server located onsite which processes the data and executes farm-level control
System overview
How does it work?
EchoSense@naturalpower.com
This will have a major impact on wind turbine operations - effectively doubling the installed US capacity that is located within the range of an endangered species of bat and may now be subject to minimization strategies such as curtailment.
20 Jan 2023 .
“The current standard practice of blanket curtailment at specific times of year to protect bats when they are most likely to be active means that operators may be losing out on significant energy production due to projects being curtailed when bats are not present. We need a better solution – environmentally and commercially.”
· Detection subsystem - collects bat acoustic and environmental data
· The system is engineered to ensure durability of components, NERC CIP compliant network security, and minimal, simple and safe periodic maintenance
For more information and assistance with this matter, please contact
Following a proof-of-concept deployment in 2019 and supported by the U.S. Department of Energy (DOE) as well as the National Renewable Energy Laboratory (NREL), Natural Power worked with Alliant Energy to install and operate a full system from August to October 2020 at the English Farms wind farm in Iowa.
· The bat detector sends data through the project network to the
· Curtailment commands are issued to individual turbines
“Our
Bat detection that occurs within the predefined rules set (season, temperature, wind speed…) will result in curtailment. Patent pending on all
· Decision subsystem – processes data against a predetermined rule set and issues commands to curtail or release turbines
at English Farms is currently in the final stages of peer review by the DOE and the report submitted demonstrates that the technology can maintain a reduction in bat fatalities comparable to a blanket curtailment strategy while giving back approximately 40-50% of energy production that would otherwise be lost under blanket curtailment methods. The environmental and commercial benefits offer an ideal solution to this industry-wide challenge.
equipment and technology.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/echosense-deployment-accelerates-to-tackle-wind-production-challenges-as-new-bats-become-endangered



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/sector/solar
largest transactions, projects and financiers in the industry
With solar power being the largest renewable energy sector in the world, we’ve built a specialist team of solar energy experts that can look at the potential and development of new solar sites and deliver your solar projects.
Ioannis Andronikidis
Feasibility and permitting
Our experienced construction team is on hand to provide project management,
Our in-house inspections team can perform site visits to assess construction quality,
Talk to Ioannis Andronikidis about this sector
Due diligence and strategic advisory
Our in-house Levelised Cost of Energy (LCoE) model and competitor benchmark database can help you understand your assets’ viability in a competitive auction environment.
We also provide ongoing
We offer support and advice on the successful development of solar and energy storage projects, from early-stage feasibility analysis to repowering and the
ioannisa@naturalpower.com
Part of this includes researching how much energy a site might generate, identifying the most appropriate technology to use and working with your engineer to build an efficient solar site. Our engineers also provide inspections to make sure that your solar site is working at its best. If it’s possible, they can also find ways to prolong an asset’s life.
optimisation of existing asset performance
Head of storage
compile snagging lists for construction contractors
Our team can identify suitable sites for solar development, taking into account the local solar resource as well as planning, grid and construction constraints. We can generate energy yield assessments with different module technology types and develop optimal site layouts for your site. Our in-house planning team have a track record of consenting over 90% of projects and can manage the entire permitting process.
lender’s technical advisory (LTA) services
Our due diligence team provides services throughout the transaction cycle, from initial risk assessment and red flag reporting in early transaction stages through to detailed due diligence for credit-committee at the final bid stage or financial close.
during construction and operations.
, owner’s engineering and construction management. This ensures that projects are on time, on budget and compliant.
Solar Power Expertise | Solar Energy Services | Natural Power
procurement support
Our team supports some of the
but doesn’t overlook the unique needs of smaller projects and new entrants to the solar market. This includes assessing how much energy a site might generate using energy yield analysis; identifying the best technology to use at your project; and working with your engineers to design and build a high-performing solar site. Our engineers also carry out inspections to make sure that your solar site is working at its best. Where possible, we can also find ways to prolong your asset’s life.
to rectify and evaluate the health of older assets.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/llwyndyrus-solar-farm
What was the outcome for the client?
International
sector
Natural Power delivered a full review of the proposed solar development to establish its viability from a permitting, grid and design perspective. The nature of the site created several unique challenges in optimising the layout of the solar array to achieve the ideal balance between total capacity (the solar farm’s maximum power output), and energy yield (the amount of energy generated by the solar farm in a typical year). Finding the right trade-off between these two aspects is key to maximising return on investment in a solar farm.
The solar farm was one of the first subsidy-free assets to be built in Wales, and it is the first subsidy-free development for Blackfinch. Its successful construction represents a significant step forward for the Welsh solar market, where hardly any solar farms have been built since government subsidies were phased out.
Wales, UK
Various, UK
Llwyndyrus solar farm
What did Natural Power do to get this result?
key service
location
District heat network (DHN) design
Throughout the construction of the project, which coincided with local lockdowns and travel restrictions, Natural Power made use of local and remote specialists to manage and advise the contractor and see this subsidy-free solar project through to commercial operation successfully.
Portfolio due diligence
Project stats
Llwyndyrus Subsidy-Free Solar Farm Project | Natural Power
Related projects
6 MW
Making subsidy-free solar a reality in North Wales
At a glance
Natural Power carried out technical due diligence to support the acquisition of a development-stage solar farm in Wales. Following that, we managed the engineering procurement construction (EPC) procurement process on behalf of the new owner. After the appointment of the successful EPC contractor, Natural Power managed the construction works of the solar farm through to Works Completion in April.
client name
What was the aim of the work?
6 MW solar farm located on the Llyn Peninsula.
First subsidy-free acquisition for Blackfinch.
Stoke-on-Trent, England
Yield assessment experience, 2019
subsidy-free
Natural Power managed the EPC procurement process on behalf of the owner, including development of detailed installation specifications, minimum requirements and other provisions necessary to provide contract requirements in line with global industry best standards.
Blackfinch Investments


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/llwyndyrus-solar-farm
Load more
Maryland Offshore Wind Project
Maryland, USA
or
all services
Finland
By
all sectors
Mutkalampi wind farm


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/sector/offshore-wind
Wind, waves, tides – if you want to harness the natural power of offshore energy, we have the in-house specialists that can get your project off the ground.
Offshore Wind, Wave & Tidal Energy Expertise | Natural Power
We can offer you a range of services to identify, investigate, plan, design and safely build an offshore site and the infrastructure required to support it.
Talk to Graeme Cook about this sector
We look at factors such as the energy source, grid connection, ground connections, offshore ecology and planning legislation to identify sites that could accommodate a lucrative offshore project. If any issues come up during the life of your offshore project, we'll propose a solution.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/offshore-wind
Assess the terrain for a new renewable project?
Maximise your asset’s performance 24/7?
Improve your annual energy production with independent service and repair?
We support our clients by delivering unrivalled renewable energy expertise and services.
What's your goal today?
We can adapt our services and develop new solutions to suit your needs and make sure your renewable energy asset is compliant, safe and efficient. We’ve been involved in making thousands of green energy projects successful. Let us do the same for you.
We offer services that assist with making each step of a renewable energy project as easy as possible for you. We only work with renewable energy, and our advice comes from years of practical experience in the industry and a focus on sustainable energy.
OUR APPROACH
We know renewables. Onshore wind, offshore, solar, hydro, heat, storage and new technologies, and grid and their associated infrastructure – we can work with you and help you through each stage of your project.
Protect your assets through early fault diagnosis?
You’ll have access to expert planning, engineering, environmental, project management and due diligence services when you work with us. Let our expertise help your project succeed.
Ensure effective compliant project management?
learn more
We help our clients create change that matters — transformation, enabled by technology and sustained through capabilities


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/our-values
To support our clients by delivering unrivalled renewable energy expertise and services. With experience at every phase of the project lifecycle, our objective is to support a low carbon economy by delivering safe, clean, reliable and competitive renewable energy.
Working to create a world powered by renewable energy
We work together, and we leverage our global know-how and capabilities to meet the needs of our clients and to help the business.
We uphold the highest standards of integrity, safety and ethics.
OUR VISION, MISSION AND VALUES
Leadership and accountability
We develop long-term relationships that allow our clients to succeed by delivering unsurpassed services, quality and value.
Our journey began when the industry was in its infancy. As pioneers of positive renewable change, we continue to contribute to its evolution and growth, creating a better environment for the future of our planet and the generations to come.
We are supportive, approachable, trusting, effective and communicative.
Teamwork and collaboration
Client commitment
We respect the environment, and we respect each other. We are honest, open, communicative, consistent and fair.
We are proactive, active listeners, progressive, straightforward and responsive.
Our people make our business. We employ the best specialists who share our passion for renewable energy. We invest in their development; we champion innovation and we share our knowledge with clients and partners who hold similar vision and values.
We are knowledgeable, pioneering, passionate, championing and always looking for ways to improve.
Integrity and respect
Our mission is:
1 of 5
Expertise, innovation and ambition
We are focused, driven, determined, strategic and responsible.
We want to be the best at all we do and will always look to improve.
We lead by example and empower our people to take ownership and make decisions in the best interests of our business and our clients.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/engineering-operations/construction
Building a renewable energy project?
As a project approaches its construction phase, our team can help you to administer contracts and act as your project interface, supervising construction and managing specifications. We can provide specific grid and electrical services as well as offering support in the form of civil and structural services, monitoring, witness testing and snagging inspections.
Renewable Energy Project Construction | Natural Power
Safety is always our first priority at Natural Power and we are proud to include specialist safety consultants in our team. By providing a range of CDM and project safety services we are able to instil best practice to all our construction sites. Our engineering team comprises experts in civil, mechanical, electrical, environmental and geotechnical engineering, they are able to make your project run more effectively and act as your on-site representative if required.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/engineering-operations/inspections
life extension assessments
We use a range of inspection methods, including intrusive works and walk downs. Our use of ground-based technology means that our inspections are fast, efficient and produce accurate, repeatable images and reports. This lets us identify and fix damage quickly, keeping your site working as economically as possible.
data analysis.
We monitor every part of your turbines and make sure they are working well and will continue to operate. We perform:
Great turbine health starts with early damage-detection.
drive train and blade inspections
This is vital for maintaining a healthy wind turbine fleet that performs at its best. Our expert inspections team can assess your fleet and diagnose any problems, and then we can predict the repairs a turbine might need and when. This results in a well-organised and cost-effective maintenance plan that suits you. This proactive approach to wind turbine upkeep reduces downtime, and it helps provide maximum output from your turbines.
end of warranty inspections
Wind Turbine Inspection Services | Natural Power


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/advisory/life-extension
Each project has its own set of needs when it comes to life extension
If life extension at your site isn't possible, we can also help support you in the decommissioning of your wind farm project.
Talk to us about our life extension services for
through life management of wind assets
Refurbishment
You can find out more
involves taking apart and removing the existing turbine and building entirely  new turbines. This is close in size, scope and cost  to a new-build wind farm,  although it may be possible to use some of the existing infrastructure,  such as electrical cables and grid connections.
Replanting
allows generators to operate turbines for longer than their planned life. This is one of the most cost-effective options as it keeps much of the existing infrastructure.
solar projects
Extending the life of solar projects
sees original turbines  replaced with new ones, but they may still use the existing foundations, towers and layouts. Alternatively, the towers are replaced, but the foundations and height restrictions stay the same.
may see the renewal or replacement of generation equipment; blade repairs; repainting of towers; and improvements and upgrades to components such as the electrical infrastructure.
and our white paper on
in our brochure
Extending the life of wind farms
We understand the risks and opportunities at every stage of a project’s life because we work on every phase of a project’s lifecycle. This includes getting them ready to work beyond their original lifespan. We do this using our experience in analysing, developing and operating renewable assets.
Decommissioning.
Natural Power supports clients who want to extend their asset’s life.
Repowering


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/life-extension



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr
Aberystwyth, Pays de galles
Nos projets
Notre expertise
Dublin, Irelande
Inverness, Ecosse
voir projet
Glasgow, Ecosse
Newcastle, Angleterre
Natural Power a l’ambition de contribuer à créer un monde vertueux dans ses besoins en énergie et que ces besoins soient satisfaits par des sources renouvelables. Nos missions d’études, d’expertises et conseils sont exclusivement consacrées à cette ambition.
London, Angleterre
Téléphone
Re-consult - Ankara, Turquie
Camille Guillemette
Travailler pour créer un monde animé par les énergies renouvelables
En s’appuyant sur l’expérience de plus de 3500 projets dans le monde et notamment en France, nos équipes de spécialistes vous aideront à amener vos projets à maturité tant dans leurs contenus globaux que dans des domaines précis d’expertise.
Chef de projet Environnement
Postes à pouvoir
Tenez-vous informés des dernières idées, rapports et études de cas.
Addresse
Latwind Energías Renovables - Valparaiso, Chili
Stirling, Ecosse
Natural Power opère globalement dans 13 bureaux.
Notre vision
J’ai commencé ma carrière en travaillant sur les oiseaux en mer, et notamment sur les zones de nidification en milieu insulaire. Ces études m’ont amené à travailler dans le contexte du développement de parcs éoliens en mer, et de l’intégration de ces projets dans leur environnement.
lire
Nos employés viennent chez Natural Power pour différentes raisons, mais c'est notre passion qui nous unit. Le travail est parfois difficile, mais nous dépassons et apprenons de ces difficultés en restant soudés et prêts à servir.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/ingenierie/inspections
Nous utilisons une large gamme de méthodes et outils d’inspection couvrant 100% des besoins d’exploration quel que soit le type d’inspection. Notre stratégie industrielle et commerciale dans ce domaine est de mettre à profit les évolutions technologiques validées pour gagner du temps tout en vous proposant la meilleure qualité d’analyse et de proposition d’actions correctives et d’évaluation de leurs coûts.
Inspection de rotor/pales :  éléments cruciaux qui rencontrent en premier le vent, il est fondamental d’en surveiller régulièrement la qualité
Christopher Renna
Contacter
Inspection de réception
Inspection hotspots sur panneaux solaires
Inspection de fin de vie qui permet de statuer de la possibilité d’extension de vie de l’actif et des moyens à mettre en œuvre pour y arriver le cas échéant
Inspection de fin de garantie qui permet de statuer des mises à niveau nécessaires de l’actif avant qu’il ne dépasse la période de garantie
Prénom
Directeur commercial, bureau d' études et de conseils
Envoi...
Analyse poussée des données Scada et des rapports d’exploitation
L’optimisation d’un actif (solaire ou éolien) est déterminée par l’identification la plus précoce possible d’une dégradation de la performance.
Contacter Christopher Renna à propos de ce service
christopherr@naturalpower.com
L’analyse des données vibratoires, des huiles, des données SCADA est pour cela le socle informatif de base qui sera complété par des inspections in situ de l’actif qui peuvent prendre diverses formes en fonction de l’enjeu et de la période de vie de l’actif au moment de l’inspection.
Nom
Votre entreprise
Envoyer
Parlons de vos projects
Partager


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise
Nous offrons des services qui rendent chaque étape d'un projet d'énergie renouvelable plus facile pour vous. Nous travaillons uniquement avec les énergies renouvelables, et nos conseils proviennent d'années d'experience pratique dans cette industrie et d'une focalisation sur les énergies durables. Nous adaptons nos services et développons de nouvelles solutions pour s'adapter à vos besoins et s'assurer que votre projet est conforme, sûr et efficace. Nous avons travaillé sur des milliers de projets réussis en énergie verte. Laisser nous faire la même chose pour vous.
Notre approche
Assurez vous de la conformité de la gestion de projet?
voir plus
Quand vous travaillez avec nous, vous avez accès à nos services experts en planification, engénierie, environement, gestion de project et due diligence. Laissez notre expertise mener votre projet à bien.
Estimez le terrain pour un nouveau projet renouvelable?
Que est votre but aujourd'hui ?
Supporter nos clients en délivrant une expertise et des services inégalés
Protégez votre capital avec un diagnostic précoce des défauts?
Nous aidons nos clients à amener un important changement - la transformation, rendue possible par la technologie et soutenue par les compétences
Maximisez la performance de votre capital 24/7?
Nous connaissons l'énergie renouvelable. Eolien terrestre, maritime, hydraulique, chaleur, stockage et nouvelles technologies, et réseau et son infrastructure - nous pouvons vous aider à chaque étape de votre projet.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/secteur/eolien-en-mer-et-cables-dinterconnexion
Assemblage des études d’impacts et suivi de l’instruction
SECTEUR
Les savoir-faire actuellement opérationnels en France sont :
Concertation locale (pêcheurs et autres acteurs de la mer)
Offshore wind | Natural Power
Evaluation de la production
Contacter Christopher Renna à propos de ce secteur
Relations avec la préfecture maritime
Voir plus secteur
Extension logique de nos compétences à terre et synergie internationale avec nos activités offshore dédiées, l’éolien en mer est une activité où nous avons su développer en tant que pionniers en France des compétences inégalées sur le territoire.
Nous nous organisons pour fournir en France, comme nous le faisons au Royaume-Uni, un service de suivi environnemental pendant la construction conformément aux attentes des services de l’état
Natural Power participe au débat lié à certains vides juridiques dans ce domaine, celui-ci facilitera la maturation de ce jeune secteur en France pour le bien de vos projets. Vous pouvez en confiance nous confier certains des challenges liés à ce secteur émergeant.
Conseil RH et HSE, marine coordination
Obtention de permissions diverses liées à la logistique travaux en mer et au port
Mise en conformité des permis / offres techniques
Assistance technique au développement jusqu’au raccordement
Etudes Mégafaune, risques de collisions CRM et effets cumulés


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/secteur/eolien-terrestre
Conduite et exploitation
C’est le secteur historique dans lequel Natural Power agit depuis plus de 20 ans au Royaume-Uni et 15 ans en France.
Faisabilité
Projet de Repowering et extension de fin de vie
C’est le secteur historique dans lequel Natural Power agit depuis plus de 20 ans au Royaume-Uni et 15 ans en France. D’abord logiquement présents dans les domaines liés au développement des projets, nous sommes devenus très rapidement leader dans l’analyse du gisement et l’évaluation du productible. Nous avons conservé au fil des années cette place de leader en investissant massivement dans la R&D. Puis, nous avons grandi avec le secteur lui-même et acquis d’autres savoir-faire jusqu’à jouer aujourd’hui le rôle d’acteur global en expertises fines :
Assistance technique au développement
Ingénierie contractuelle
Conception
Onshore wind | Natural Power
Au Royaume-Uni, nous assurons maintenance et réparation de nombreux actifs


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/secteur/solaire-photovoltaique
Études de productible
L’énergie solaire photovoltaïque représente la plus grande part du secteur des énergies renouvelables dans le monde.
Maîtrise des coûts dans le cadre d’appels d’offres
Formation
Extension de durée de vie
Il était logique que Natural Power investisse dans ce domaine en recrutant les meilleurs spécialistes et en formant nos ingénieurs aux savoir-faire afférents.
Design
Nos domaines d’expertise sont les suivants
Optimisation des choix technologiques
Inspection
Conseil en construction


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/service/ingenierie/services-geotechniques
Nous avons donc investi massivement non seulement dans les hommes de l’art (géophysiciens/ingénieurs certifiés) mais aussi dans les moyens techniques puissants et innovants (machines de forage, drones pour des relevés topographiques à grande échelle). Cette compétence en France est orientée conseil, comme les revues critiques des rapports de géotechniciens locaux, mais il nous est aussi possible, sur des projets à grande échelle en France, de réaliser des missions de G0 à G4 dans leur totalité.
L’Ecosse est un pays de tourbe, depuis longtemps déjà nous avons compris à quel point le risque sol y est fondamental, peut-être plus qu’ailleurs


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/secteur/reseau-stockage-et-infrastructure
Optimisation des raccordements proposés par les distributeurs de réseau
Grid, storage and infrastructure | Natural Power
Prise en main complète des dossiers de raccordement en distribution et transport sur réseaux interconnectés ou non
Nous sommes fiers de maîtriser ces compétences essentielles pour le développement d’un monde électriquement renouvelable, intelligent et durable.
Nous l’avons compris très rapidement et les services que nous proposons vous permettront d’appréhender au mieux ces enjeux fondamentaux de la transition vers un mix énergétique acceptable par le marché.
Audit de conception de système de prévision de production
Audit de conception de stockage en système non-interconnecté
L’émergence des besoins en stockage et prévisions s’impose avec le développement d’un mix énergétique écologiquement sobre, fiable et devant jouer un rôle majeur dans la sécurité et la sureté d’approvisionnement.
Assistance technique au financement


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/carrieres
Natural Power recruitment
Job type
La motivation et la passion de nos fondateurs ont attiré des profils qui se reconnaissent dans ces traits de caractère.
Speculative applications
Closing date
Au cours de ces 25 dernières années, notre équipe s’est étoffée pour compter aujourd’hui plus de 400 collaborateurs dans le monde. Tout en atteignant une taille honorable pour une entreprise de consultants, nous n’avons pas renié nos valeurs, notre mission, ni notre vision et nous sommes toujours en quête de nouveaux talents qui nous permettrons de tendre vers l’excellence dans ces domaines.
Avantages
Valeurs
We are fair, legal and ethical in our resource planning and recruitment procedures, with specific regard to actively promoting diversity and inclusion within the workplace.
Internships
Renewable Energy Jobs | Careers with Natural Power


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/careers
I work with some pretty awesome folks and have made some amazing friends across the globe!
The purpose and passion of our founders have drawn similar people to Natural Power.
Benefits
Our staff also run a busy social hub, and they organize events all year round. Even socially we aim to create a better environment and give back to our communities, so we often run charity events or environmental projects. We ensure that our recruitment process remains fair, inclusive and follows good practice, and that we review our process to allow for continuous improvement of the candidate experience.
LinkedIn
Chad Homouth
values
It is engaging to interact with such a wide variety of project contributors including investors, developers, contractors and other consultants.
Values
Over the past 25 years, we have grown into a team of over 400 people worldwide. Despite our growth, our founding beliefs, drive and philosophy have not changed. The people at Natural Power are still working together to create a better world powered by renewable energy. And we’re always looking for new people to help us make that happen.
I enjoy the marrying of the physical world, such as road corners and swept path analysis, and dealing with people and how you communicate that.
Danielle Burns
Senior project manager
Employee Benefits US
Here you’ll find our job vacancies at locations across the the USA, the UK, Ireland and France. If you want to know more about our culture and some of the jobs we do, you can find out more about our
more stories
. You can also follow our
profile to keep up to date with our latest jobs and news. In addition to company benefits, we’ll also invest in your skills and development. You can grow within Natural Power and get the most out of your career here. We want you to do your best.
Senior project engineer
I enjoy collaborating with my colleagues to identify solutions to ever-changing renewable energy problems.
Kerry Schmidt
Finance Manager


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/life-at-natural-power/story/danielle-burns
What is the most interesting project you have worked on and why?
My biggest achievement during my time at Natural Power has been learning more about wind energy. My existing knowledge base was largely limited to solar energy, but I have since learned a lot about wind energy contracting, including the similarities to and differences from solar energy contracts.
What is your biggest achievement at work?
My day consists of a collection of independent work, collaboration with colleagues and meetings with clients. I also perform a mix of project management and technical work within my day. Overall, it’s a nice variety.
How did you get into your roll in the first place?
What do you enjoy most about your role?
I really enjoy working on distributed generation-scale portfolios of solar projects because these portfolios represent a variety of offtakers, installation contractors, geographies and installation types. We are reviewing a 500+ MW portfolio of 149 solar assets on behalf of one client, and the economies of scale that we were able to provide allows for funding of the assets when the project achieves key milestones.
Interested in working with us?
As a senior project manager focusing on solar and energy storage, my role is to perform all facets of project management, including managing project timelines, schedules, scopes of work and budgets; communicating with internal staff and clients; and ensuring that our work products meet or exceed expectations. I also specialize in the evaluation of renewable energy contracts, and I review solar and wind energy contracts as part of my role, including offtake agreement, EPC contracts, O&M agreements, hedge agreements and asset management agreements.
I enjoy collaborating with my colleagues to identify solutions to ever-changing renewable energy problems. Many people would probably find this less-than-exciting, but I also really enjoy reviewing renewable energy contracts!
What does your role entail?
What does your day typically consist of?
I started in the consulting industry over 10 years ago. Although I’ve had a variety of different roles during that time, I found that renewable energy consulting — especially solar — was really where my passion is. I also really enjoy project management. My role as a senior project manager at Natural Power is really a perfect position for me.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/advisory/life-extension



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/life-at-natural-power
LinkedIn profile
You can see the jobs that we’re recruiting for on our
page, and if you want to know more about some of the work we do and careers at Natural Power, visit our meet the experts page. You can also follow our
Sometimes the work is challenging, but as a helpful and friendly team, we share and overcome these challenges together. In addition to company benefits, we’ll also invest in your skills and development. You can grow within Natural Power and get the most out of your career here. We want you to do your best.
current vacancies
People come to work for Natural Power for a range of reasons, but what unites us is our passion
to keep up to date with our latest jobs and news.
Our staff also run a busy social hub, and they organize events all year round. Even socially we aim to create a better environment and give back to our communities, so we often run charity events or environmental projects.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/partners-and-membership-organisations
American Clean Power
Learn more
ZX Lidars
Our Values
partners
We work with several professional partners to deliver services to our clients.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news
News and updates
Natural Power - News
UK & Ireland
Filter by:


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/echosense-deployment-accelerates-to-tackle-wind-production-challenges-as-new-bats-become-endangered



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/advisory/solar-and-energy-storage-inspections
Our team of experts add real value through hands-on services during project construction, asset acquisition or to address ongoing performance challenges.
owner’s engineering and construction monitoring inspections
forensic analysis and investigation
Our team understands the newest codes and standards. We know how to apply them and how to evaluate energy storage projects so that we can help identify and mitigate a complete range of risks.
Our technical team uses the latest in hands-on inspection tools and techniques, including infrared thermography and drones to perform detailed inspections of PV plants, energy storage systems, and related infrastructure.
Codes, standards and installation methods for solar and energy storage systems are changing almost as fast as the technologies and markets themselves.
system acceptance testing review and analysis
development and oversight of quality management programs
warranty inspections and support.
Key services include:


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/legals/privacy-policy
dpo@naturalpower.com
Email:


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/engineering-operations/planning-permitting-and-environment
We go into the field to perform environmental audits, including species and habitat surveys, acoustic studies and operational monitoring. Employing ecological modeling techniques, we use the data we collect to develop resource management plans and conservation strategies.
These plans in turn help to establish protocols for the construction and operations phases of a project. The geospatial (GIS) team compile data, conduct constraints analyses and create visual simulations of how a site will look to help with project and stakeholder engagement.
Put simply, we make sure your project functions within the rules while promoting win-win solutions that maximize conservation and the climate benefits of renewable energy production.
Natural Power offer and perform a range of planning and permitting related services right the way through an asset’s life.
Getting a renewable energy project from conception to completion can be a long and complex process. To make this process as easy as possible for you, we can identify areas where there may be risks and provide specialist support to keep your project in regulatory compliance throughout its life.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/engineering-operations/planning-permitting-and-environment



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/policies
This policy will be reviewed on an annual basis (or more frequently if there have been significant changes in the type and nature of our activities) and revised as required to ensure it remains current and appropriate for the business.
Supplier Code of Conduct
Managing Director
that all tools, equipment (including Personal Protective Equipment) and vehicles supplied to our employees and contractors are suitable for purpose and properly maintained;
Signed,
Quality Policy
Health and Safety Policy
Natural Power will do everything that is reasonably practicable to protect our employees, subcontractors or any other persons who may be affected by our activities from any work-related injury or ill health. The Board and senior management, led by the Managing Director, have overall responsibility for ensuring we achieve the highest standards of health and safety. We also expect all our employees, subcontractors and clients to share our commitment and contribute in implementing our health and safety policy in an effective way.
Gender pay report
More policies
investigation and learning from incidents & near misses; promotion of a continuous improvement culture;
our employees and contractors are fully aware of all risks associated with their activities and conduct themselves responsibly when carry out their duties;
our employees and contractors are empowered to stop work and challenge any situation they encounter where they believe health and safety may be compromised; and
CSR Policy
Management will set health & safety strategy and objectives and will also be actively involved in driving and reviewing our performance. Natural Power's aim is to continue to be a leader within the renewable sector and proactive safety leadership is a key part of this this ambition.
suitable and sufficient resources are in place to allow thorough and robust planning of our works to be carried out and that identified control measures are in place;
Environment Policy
We achieve this by ensuring:
download pdf
Modern Day Slavery and Human Trafficking Policy
our employees and contractors have the correct training, suitable instruction and the necessary supervision to carry out their works safely;
promotion of an open, positive attitude to health and safety issues, engaging and consulting with our employee and encouraging the reporting of incidents and issues;
collaboration and engagement with parties who share our interest in improving health and safety within the renewable sector; sharing best practice & learning from each other and challenging the status quo.
Robert P Brown


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/policies/modern-day-slavery-policy
This Policy Statement will be reviewed and published annually on the business website
Natural Power does not tolerate the physical punishment, abuse or involuntary servitude of any worker.
If a supplier is found to be demonstrating unacceptable practices they will be investigated and provided with guidance regarding immediately required improvements.
The Company’s zero tolerance approach to modern slavery must be communicated to all suppliers, contractors and other business partners when entering into new or renewed contracts with them.
Policy Statement
The prevention, detection and reporting of modern slavery in any part of the Company’s business or supply chains, whether in the UK or abroad, is the responsibility of all those working for the Company or under the Company’s control. You are required to avoid any activity that might lead to breach of this policy.
www.naturalpower.com
If you believe or suspect a breach of or conflict with this policy has occurred or may occur, you must notify your line manager or report it in accordance with the Company’s Disclosures in the Public Interest Policy. You are encouraged to raise concerns about any issue or suspicion of modern slavery in any part of the Company’s business or supply chains as soon as possible. If you are unsure about whether a particular act, the treatment of workers or their working conditions with any of the Company’s supply chains constitutes any of the various forms of modern slavery, please raise it with your line manager, Head of HR, or a Director. UK staff can also contact the government’s Modern Slavery Helpline on 0800 0121 700 for further information and guidance on modern slavery.
The Modern Slavery Act 2015 came into effect in March 2015 and is the first of its kind in Europe. The legislation enhances the support and protection for victims of human trafficking and enslavement. Natural Power is wholly supportive of the Act and has the following statements tomake regarding our stance:
The Company and group’s supply chain is limited and is predominantly UK, EU and US based and we would therefore expect these entities to have applicable anti-slavery and human trafficking policies and procedures. The Company will not forge commercial relationships with any business knowingly involved with slavery or human trafficking.
Natural Power is committed to providing applicable staff with a salary which at least meets the National Living Wage and offering the required statutory leave entitlement. Furthermore, Natural Power ensures all staff have provided their National Insurance Number, or working visa if they are not British nationals, prior to their employment and perform the necessary checks to determine their eligibility to work in the UK. By checking our employees’ NI numbers or working visas we know they are legally eligible to work in the UK, and that their salary will be monitored by HMRC. For staff based in the USA, France or Ireland checks for eligibility to work in those Countries will be made in line with local legislation and requirements.
Natural Power has a zero-tolerance attitude to modern slavery and human trafficking and we expect all those in our supply chain to comply with our values.
Natural Power will not tolerate the use of forced or child labour in any of its operations.
Compliance
The Company may terminate its commercial relationships with suppliers, contractors and other business partners if they are found to have been involved in modern slavery.
The Company aims to encourage openness and will support anyone who raises genuine concerns in good faith under this policy, even if they turn out to be mistaken. The company is committed to ensuring no one suffers any detrimental treatment or victimization as a result of reporting in good faith their suspicion that modern slavery is or may be taking place in any part of its business or in any of its supply chains.
Any employee who breaches this policy will face disciplinary action, up to and including summary dismissal for gross misconduct.
The Company will undertake responsibility for implementing this Policy Statement and its objectives.
Natural Power (The Company) is committed to ensuring that we conduct our business in a professional and ethical manner that respects and adheres to the human rights of all employees. This extends to all companies in our group and parties included in our supply chain with whom we have an affiliation to. We expect all our suppliers to uphold the same standards and values that we do and have policies in place that demonstrate their commitment to conduct business in a responsible and ethical manner.
Breach of the policy
If no improvement is implemented or they indicate an unwillingness to cease unacceptable practices they will be reported to the appropriate authorities and ultimately trading with this supplier will cease.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/policies/environment-policy
To reinforce this commitment, we will cascade this policy to all employees and review the policy every two years as a minimum.
Manage and risk assess operations to protect and minimise our impact on local and global environments, including minimising waste, reducing emissions, effective use of resources and pollution prevention
We are committed to continuous improvement in our environmental performance and have established an Integrated Management System {IMS) which provides a framework within which we will set and monitor appropriate environmental objectives and targets.
Comply with all applicable environmental legislation and standards (including the expectations of our customers)
To make business decisions that lower our environmental impact and to encourage a culture of environmental awareness at work, at home and in the wider community
Maintain ISO14001 or an equivalent certified management system to implement Natural Power's Environmental Policy globally
Whilst the Managing Director has responsible to the Board of Directors for ensuring this environmental policy is implemented, we also expect all of our employees , subcontractors and clients to share our commitment and contribute to implementing our policy and achieving our environmental objectives in an effective way.
Establish an (employee) environmental committee as a mechanism for ident ifying and implementing new ideas and initiatives to support our culture of sustainability
At Natural Power our vision is to create a world powered by renewable energy so that we can leave a better environment for future generations. To do this, we must support our clients, employ the best specialists and be pioneers of positive renewable change. We aim to support a low carbon economy by delivering safe, clean, reliable and competitive renewable energy.
Where practicable, procure and use vehicles, plant, goods, materia ls and services that incorporate the principles of the circular economy, sustainability and reducing emissions
In order to meet these objectives we will:
Encourage a culture of employee engagement and continual improvement in accordance with the environmental management system
Ensure our environmental systems, objectives and performance are reflected in internal and external communications


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/policies/quality-policy
Auditing our internal processes
Gathering and monitoring of customer feedback (and/or complaints)
Complying with local laws and the standards of our markets
work in partnership with our clients to understand their goals and better meet their needs;
A QMS that meets ISO 9001 standards and is set within a wider integrated management system (IMS)
To further suppor this we:
undertake management reviews of performance.
lead by example through a strong management commitment to quality, and we have clear communication, goals and support to achieve our objectives; and
Robert Brown
In order to meet these aims, we have the following systems and procedures in place.
At Natural Power, our vision is to create a world powered by renewable energy. Part of our mission is to support our clients by delivering unrivalled renewable energy expertise and services, so quality is important to our business. We strive to provide our clients with products and services that meet and even exceed their expectations. We are also committed to continuous improvement. We have established a quality management system (QMS) that provides a framework for measuring and improving our performance.
Training and developing our employees
support and encourage each other to engage with, and take ownership of, quality through education, coaching and sharing of best practice;
The managing director has ultimate responsibility for quality . However, all employees have a responsibility to ensure that quality is part of all of our services. To reinforce our commitment to quality , we make all employees and contractors aware of this policy . We will also review this policy at least every two years.
Setting measurable quality objectives that reflect our business aims.
champion quality as a core value within our company culture;
adopt a "right first time" mentality, taking responsibility for our actions and outcomes;
monitor and review our performance to make sure we are delivering the expected results and that we are identifying, and addressing, any areas where we can improve;
Monitoring performance and selection of suppliers


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/planning-permitting-and-environment



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/service/environnement-et-planning
Natural Power offre et fournit un éventail de service relatif au planning et autorisations tout au long de la vie d'un actif.
Nous nous assurons aussi que cela impacte tous les aspects de la gestion et du dévelopment du projet. Notre département planning réunit planificateurs et spécialistes techniques pour aider nos clients avec leur projet.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/service/ingenierie/management-projet
Cela inclus l'évaluation de l'impact environemental (environmental impact assessments EIA); construction et management du site; amener un management santé, sécurité, environmental et qualité (health, safety, environmental and quality management HSEQ);
Nous gérons toutes les facettes de gestion de projet au long de la vie des actifs d'energie renouvelable.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/a-propos/health_&_safety_at_natural_power
We ensure that good health and safety practice is implemented at all levels of the workforce, helping to achieve long-term success in keeping everyone, and the environment we work in, safe. It sets the highest standards for our workforce which, in turn, enables us to retain the confidence of our clients and the people we work with on renewable projects.
We hold accreditation for our health, safety, environment and quality management systems – ISO 45001, 140001 and 9001. These are regularly reviewed by an external assessor and, when combined with our health and safety reporting systems, allow for a positive feedback loop that drives a programme of continual improvement.
The health, safety and mental and physical wellbeing of our staff, and those that work with us, are our biggest priority.  It encompasses every aspect of the work that we do for our employees, the projects we manage and the support we give our clients. Nothing is more important to us than ensuring everyone returns home safely after the working day is complete.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/secteur/chaleur-renouvelable
Quel que soit le profil du porteur de projet (public-privé, exploitants-investisseurs)
Renewable heat | Natural Power
Au Royaume-Uni, nous disposons d’un niveau d’expertise incomparable dans les services suivants :
Laissez-nous vous aider dans votre ambition d’acteur militant de la transition vers un monde énergétiquement sobre et propre.
Quelle que soit la taille du projet
Conception de réseau de chaleur
Nous croyons à l’avènement de moyens de production et distribution de chaleur directement produite à partir de sources renouvelables, la demande est immense et la biomasse largement disponible en circuit court.
Exploitation et maintenance
Gestion de projet
Conseils sur la technologie
Maîtrise des CAPEX


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/chaleur-renouvelable



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/contact
Trouvez la bonne personne à qui parler
CONTACT
Renseignements généraux
Choisissez une location
S'abonner pour recevoir les dernières actualités
Contactez nous, nous sommes toujours heureux d'aider
+33 (0)2 49 88 12 80
Nantes, France:
sayhello@naturalpower.com
Voir notre politique de confidentialité


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/projets
N/A
ou
Repowering d’un site de 4 Éoliennes NM 48 to 4 Enercon E82
Conseiller du prêteur dans le cadre d’un financement de projet
tous les secteurs
Par
tous les services


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/projets/detail-projet/name-to-be-supplied
Valeur ajoutée
Etude de productible
Gain de fluidité et d’efficacité dans la performance des audits grâce à l’expérience des projets successifs réalisés avec les mêmes acteurs (conseiller, prêteur, porteur de projet)
secteur
Revue des risques de conception
Suivi de construction / visite de sites
Flexibilité de l’équipe Natural Power en termes de planning et selon l’évolution des projets
service clé
Revue des autorisations
Cahier des charges
Pas de retard dû à Natural Power depuis 5 ans de projets
nom du client
Financer et refinancer plus de 25 projets éoliens et photovoltaïques dans une période de 12 mois avec un prêteur qui saisit les aspects techniques dudit projet
Confidential client
Contactez-nous Christopher Renna a propos de ce projet
En un coup d'oeil
Revue des contrats
Revue des modèles financiers
Revue de la performance des projets
Objectif du client


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/projets/name-to-be-supplied



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/projets/detail-projet/maryland-offshore-wind-project
a construction plan review
Due to the relatively new (at the time) offshore wind siting, permitting and approval process, we focused on development of both the site assessment plan (SAP) and the construction operations plan (COP). At the time of the review, neither an SAP nor COP had reached approval status since the Block Island Wind project. The MarWin project is currently progressing through the BOEM approval process and expected to reach COD in the upcoming years.
OPEX and CAPEX estimates
health and safety plans.
Our efforts helped support Apollo’s decision to make this significant investment into a high-profile East Coast offshore wind project.
A thorough review of project risks and preliminary output was needed to help Apollo decide whether to finance the MarWin project. Natural Power’s work on behalf of Apollo helped inform their decision to invest in the project while highlighting risks and uncertainties surrounding the MarWin project and investment in US Wind.
Our Advisory team delivered a thorough review of the project’s technical, commercial and permitting characteristics. The assessment included:
an assessment of the project’s proposed design and technology, bids and contracts for key services
an operational strategy
The status of key environmental permits and applications, as well as plans for necessary site studies, were given particular attention as they are critical in the Bureau of Ocean Energy Management’s (BOEM) approval criteria. To complete the review, we provided:
Supporting Apollo’s decision to invest in East Coast offshore wind project MarWin
What was the outcome?
Natural Power supported Apollo Global Management’s investment decision to commit up to $265 million of convertible debt and equity to acquire an equity stake in US wind, an offshore wind energy development company. Apollo requested Natural Power conduct a technical due diligence review of the proposed 270 MW Maryland offshore wind project (MarWin). The plan is for this offshore wind project to be located approximately 17 miles from the coast of Ocean City, Maryland. It is one of the early offshore wind projects in the United States and at the center of US Wind’s development plans in the upcoming years.
an Energy Yield Assessment
a review of the development status, focusing on key milestone and schedule risks.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/projects/project-detail/maryland-offshore-wind-project



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/projects/maryland-offshore-wind-project
Rosamond central solar project
Utility scale energy storage
California, USA


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/projects/project-detail/de-risk-utility-scale-energy-storage
Key revenue streams
The key revenue streams were frequency response, resource adequacy and capacity.
Natural Power helps to de-risk utility scale energy storage in California
The total portfolio is 90 MW.
With approximately 90 MW of capacity and energy storage projects offering a range of services, such as resource adequacy, frequency response, and capacity the portfolio provided many opportunities for the client and also a complex mix of technical and financial risks to navigate. Natural Power’s technical team quickly deployed to evaluate key risks facing many of today’s energy storage projects, such as capacity degradation and suitability for participation in an optimized combination of revenue streams. The team also examined project design and technology selections in the context of rapidly evolving codes and standards.
75 MW
The largest project in the portfolio had a capacity of 75 MW.
Leveraging this expertise and in-depth review, Natural Power was able to help the client negotiate improved warranty coverage and a repowering program to ensure that the battery systems could meet the portfolio’s financial projections, even under the kinds of increased degradation rates that often come with maximizing disparate revenue streams.
90 MW
Natural Power worked with one of the market’s largest independent power producers to provide technical due diligence on the acquisition of a portfolio of grid-scale energy storage assets.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/advisory/due-diligence
We can evaluate the potential financial risks of your proposed project and see how that might impact its continued development, construction and operation.
Our experience allows us to help banks, developers, independent power producers (IPPs), utilities and investment funds make good financial decisions when it comes to clean energy projects.
We understand project financing for renewable energy projects, and we make it easy as possible for you to understand the risks.
We offer clear and concise reporting on these risks, and we outline how to manage them effectively, so you see a good return on your investment.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/due-diligence
Creating value by reinventing the core, together.
We offer services that assist with making each step of a renewable energy project as easy as possible for you. We only work with renewable energy, and our advice comes from years of practical experience in the industry and working on a range of renewable energy projects.
You’ll have access to expert planning, analysis, environmental, project management and due diligence services when you work with us. Let our expertise help your project or investment succeed.
our values
We know renewables. Onshore and offshore wind, solar, energy storage, renewable heat and their associated infrastructure — we can work with you and help you through each stage of your project.
Whats your goal today?


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/due-diligence



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/contact
IRE:
UK:
Get in touch, we're always happy to help
See our privacy policy
General Enquiries
+44 (0) 1644 430 008
+353 (0) 169 713 44
Let's connect you to the right person
Select a location
Subscribe to the latest updates
Get In Touch With the Renewal Energy Experts | Natural Power


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/engineering-operations/project-management
Commercial and financial services, such as insurance and contracts
Our services include:
Providing a health, safety, environmental and quality management (HSEQ) so the workforce remains safe and your asset is built and operated safely.
Environmental impact assessments (EIA), which measure the environmental impact of a site and covers areas such as design evolution, consultation and preparing the environmental statement.
We cover all areas of project management across the lifecycle of a renewable energy asset.
Site construction and management to make sure that projects are built on time, within budget and to specification.
Renewable Energy Project Management | Natural Power
Offshore Transmission Owner (OFTO) services.
Providing expert and experienced asset management through our ControlCentre 365 days a year.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/advisory/planning-permitting-and-environment



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/advisory/planning-permitting-and-environment



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/engineering-operations/solar-and-energy-storage-inspections



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/knowledge-center
Reducing energy risk for offshore wind investments
Downloads
31 Mar 2022
The Knowledge Center
Environmental
Title
Knowledge Center | Natural Power
Natural Power has been working on renewables for over 25 years, and we’ve built up a team of experts who share our pioneering spirit. We are committed to sharing information, knowledge and ideas so we can help move the industry forward and create a world powered by renewable energy. Here you’ll find white papers on important industry topics; thought leadership blogs from some our experts in renewables; and useful information and videos.
Insights & reports
ControlCentre
Category
Insights and reports
News and updates


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/insight/is-your-project-underperformance-caused-by-trackers
One of the considerations for trackers relates to maintenance. Trackers are one of the only moving components in a PV system. They have motors, controllers and sensors that can fail and require regular replacement. The second consideration is performance. In estimates of PV system energy generation, trackers are typically modeled in an idealized state such that they track the sun and minimize row to row shading perfectly. In operational projects, this is not always the case. Trackers can deviate from the idealized tracking angles, they can go offline, and they can stow due to high wind speeds. They require regular tuning and performance checks as part of the maintenance plan.
31 Oct 2022 .
Tracker tuning and performance checks during project commissioning; and
Solar racking systems that track the sun, or trackers, have existed in the industry since the late 1980s. While they were initially used for concentrating solar systems, trackers today are deployed in conventional photovoltaic (PV) projects around the world. As tracker costs have decreased, their market share has grown and trackers are now being deployed at higher latitudes, in more complex terrain and in remote locations. Today, almost all utility scale projects in the southern half of the US utilize trackers.
While it may seem like this error in tracker tilt angles is insignificant, it can translate into quantifiable energy losses at the meter, and thus lost revenues from the project. Figure 2 shows the performance index (actual energy vs. ideal energy) of individual trackers in the PV system above. The median performance index is approximately 97%, resulting in a potential 3% lost energy production. This loss is typically not captured in initial energy estimates for a PV system. Further, tracker availability or tracker performance is typically not captured as a requirement in O&M contracts and can go undetected.
When considering tracker-based PV systems, Natural Power recommends the following considerations:
All tracker products and suppliers are not created equal – a high-quality tracker has the potential to exhibit better performance in the field;
Figure 1. Tracker tilt angles for 100+ trackers in the same PV system
Figure 2. Performance index of 100+ trackers in the same PV system
Ensure that there are tracker performance requirements in the supply agreement;
Tracker performance is a key aspect of Natural Power’s performance analysis for operating projects. Figure 1 shows the tracker tilt angles of 100+ trackers from a single PV system. The variation in tracker tilt angles at any individual time is significant. At 1pm the range of tilt angles is approximately +/- 6 degrees. Tracker suppliers typically quote tracking accuracy in the +/- 2-3 degree range. In an ideal system, these trackers would all be exhibiting very similar tilts during the prime solar generating hours of the day.
Inclusion of regular tracker tuning and performance checks in the O&M plan.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/insight/is-your-project-underperformance-caused-by-trackers



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/knowledge-centre
17 Aug 2021
Sharpening Operations Models
Natural Power has been working on renewables for over 25 years, and we’ve built up a team of experts who share our pioneering spirit. We are committed to sharing information, knowledge and ideas so we can help move the industry forward and create a world powered by renewable energy.
EchoSense® system overview
Solar racking systems that track the sun (trackers) are being deployed in photovoltaic (PV) projects across the globe due to their decreasing costs.  Trackers are the only moving parts within a PV system and are therefore subject to breakdown and wear and tear...
The Renewables Knowledge Centre | Natural Power
The Knowledge Centre
Offshore wind supply chain in the UK


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/natural-power-kicks-off-construction-at-benbrack-wind-farm-for-red-rock-power
The development has also finalised contracts with Jones Bros for the balance of plant elements of the wind farm following an initial preferred supplier agreement, and Vestas, the wind farm’s turbine contractor, is expected to start mobilising to site in early 2024.
Keith Burns, Commercial Director at Natural Power said “Natural Power’s headquarters, The Green House, is located in Dumfries & Galloway  and Benbrack is less than 15 miles from our HQ.  Our construction team has delivered over 280 owners engineer projects, totalling more than 9GW of renewable energy, around the world and many of that team are based in The Green House and will be supporting this project. We look forward to working with Red Rock Power on this project which will deliver employment in the local area and community benefits through it’s entire operational life.”
As owners engineer for Benbrack Wind Farm Limited, Natural Power will provide project management and quality assurance support during the construction phase of development. As an independent representative of the owner, the team will provide services such as balance of plant and TSA contract management, project execution support, interface management and health and safety and environmental compliance.
21 Oct 2022 .
Leading renewable energy consultancy and service provider, Natural Power, has commenced work at Red Rock Power’s Benbrack onshore wind farm in Dumfries and Galloway. First generation is anticipated in Spring 2024, with full commercial operation of the 15-turbine, 67MW capacity project expected later that summer.
Jamie Grant, Benbrack Project Director, said: "Benbrack is the first construction project under Red Rock Power's management, which we're eager to deploy to the highest standards. Partnering with Natural Power allows us to benefit from its decades of onshore wind experience and provide valuable expertise to our own operation. We look forward to working with the local team and our other suppliers over the coming years."


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/natural-power-kicks-off-construction-at-benbrack-wind-farm-for-red-rock-power



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/natural-power-kicks-off-construction-at-benbrack-wind-farm-for-red-rock-power



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/natural-power-kicks-off-construction-at-benbrack-wind-farm-for-red-rock-power
Jamie Grant, Benbrack’s Project Director, said: “We’ve been driving towards the start of construction since we acquired Benbrack early last year, so we’re excited to get started and be a step closer to generating clean energy. We’ll be working closely with our key contractors and the local supply chain to deliver the wind farm quickly and with minimum disruption to the local area.”
Ralph Spernagel, Construction Director at Natural Power said: “comments about local significance of this project and how we’re supporting Red Rock to deliver…”
Benbrack is the first construction project under Red Rock Power’s management, marking a momentous step forward for the business as it continues to grow its wind portfolio and cement its position in the Scottish industry.
Guy Madgwick, Red Rock Power’s CEO, added: “As the first wind farm under Red Rock Power’s management to move into construction, Benbrack signifies our continued commitment to the Scottish market and the expansion of our wind business. Onshore wind remains central to our long-term vision – we look forward to seeing Benbrack come to fruition while we consider future opportunities.”


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/leadership



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/sector/energy-storage
Our North American experience covers all major state-level and regional storage markets.
Natural Power’s team of storage experts can provide a full suite of owner’s engineer and technical due diligence services, including market analysis, independent engineering, technology reviews, field inspections and energy and revenue modelling.
If you want to develop, finance, build or run a standalone or co-located energy storage project, we can make sure that it has the best possible chance of success.
More Engineering and operations


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/sector
NY, US
This year we’re celebrating 25 years of powering up projects for the renewable energy industry. Since 1995 we have worked towards creating a better environment for future generations and provided expert advice for over 3,500 projects to help progress our vision: working to create a world powered by renewable energy.
Bright future as Natural Power appoints Principal Solar Engineer
Natural Power approved as a NYSERDA FlexTech consultant in New York
Natural Power SVP to co-chair wind resource conference
Center
Natural Power operates globally across 13 offices
At Natural Power, we want to help create a world powered by renewable energy. We’re an independent consultant and service provider, and we only ever work on green energy projects.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/natural-power-approved-as-a-nyserda-flextech-consultant-in-new-york
Natural Power has been approved by the New York State Energy Research and Development Authority (NYSERDA) as a FlexTech consultant to help businesses plan clean energy strategies.
FlexTech consultants are contracted by NYSERDA to provide expert, objective, and customized technical services to inform clean energy management and investment decisions. FlexTech consultants must demonstrate experience and a thorough understanding of clean energy services delivery to commercial and industrial customers in New York State, and they must have a Licensed Professional Engineer (P.E.) on staff.
shawns@naturalpower.com
To find out more about the scheme, please visit this
Completing an energy study on a building can help the owner identify and evaluate opportunities to reduce energy costs and incorporate clean energy into capital planning. The FlexTech program shares the cost to produce an objective, site-specific and targeted study on how best to implement clean energy and/or energy efficiency technologies. The NYSERDA FlexTech consultant program provides an approved, independent, professional to complete the energy study.
danielleb@naturalpower.com
. Consultancy
3 Feb 2020 .
Danielle Burns on 518-306-7257,
or,
Shawn Shaw on 518-704-3624,
Eligible participants include New York State commercial and industrial facilities such as office buildings, retail, colleges and universities, health care facilities, state and local governments, not-for-profit and private institutions, public and private K-12 schools, and data centers that are a New York State electricity customer of a participating utility company who pay into the System Benefits Charge (SBC). Multifamily facilities in New York State that contribute to the SBC on their electric utility bill may be eligible for CHP (traditional and premium), energy storage, and clean heating and cooling systems studies only.
Through the FlexTech program, NYSERDA will pay for a significant portion of Natural Power’s consultancy time to complete a study – usually 50% to 75% of the eligible study costs depending on the scope of work. This could include pre and post-construction energy production assessments, inspections, or other work on solar and wind projects, as well as energy planning, analysis, and technical support for businesses and agencies in New York.
link
Serving all counties in New York State, Natural Power is approved to provide consultancy services in the areas of technical support and clean energy analysis as well as distributed generation, resources, and energy storage.
or contact:


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/natural-power-approved-as-a-nyserda-flextech-consultant-in-new-york



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/natural-power-approved-as-a-nyserda-flextech-consultant-in-new-york



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/engineering-operations/engineering-and-design
Talk to Shane Bermingham about this service
Engineering & Design for Renewable Energy | Natural Power
Our engineering services include design and advisory; electrical and mechanical engineering; geotechnical services; and owner’s engineer services.
Natural Power brings together expert civil, mechanical, electrical, environmental and geotechnical engineers to deliver our clients’ renewable energy projects.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/engineering-and-design



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/sector/renewable-heat
We’ve worked on heat networks of all sizes, including small groups of networks and those that span across cities. Our renewable heat team works with public bodies, private developers, community groups and investors, so we can work with you to develop your project. We can design and oversee the build of a network that suits your needs and helps you lower carbon emissions, shape a sustainable energy development or investigate new business opportunities.
Renewable Heat Projects & Networks Expertise | Natural Power
We’ve worked on heat networks of all sizes, including small groups of networks and those that span across cities.
The next big challenge in combating climate change is reducing the amount of carbon used in heating. We’ve worked and consulted on a number of ground-breaking district heating network projects, so we can give you professional, practical advice on the technology, costs and planning involved in making it a success. We can also support you in the management and maintenance of your heat asset.
To find out more about our renewable heat work, read our case studies


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/renewable-heat



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/chauffage-renouvelable



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/engineering-operations/engineering-and-design
civil and structural engineering design that includes high voltage electrical engineering, geotechnical analysis and design, and technology selection.
Together they support our clients in the delivery of renewable energy projects across the globe.
Here are just some of the services they can provide:
feasibility and front-end engineering studies
Natural Power has gathered together an expert team of civil, mechanical, electrical and environmental engineers.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/engineering-operations/inspections
We use a range of inspection methods. Our use of ground-based technology means that our external blade inspections are fast, efficient and produce accurate images and reports. This lets us identify and fix damage quickly, keeping your site working as efficiently and economically as possible.
Great turbine health starts with early damage-detection. This is vital for maintaining a healthy wind turbine fleet that performs at its best.
Our expert inspections team can assess your fleet and diagnose any problems, and then we can predict the repairs a turbine might need and when. This results in a well-organized and cost-effective maintenance plan that suits you. This proactive approach to wind turbine upkeep reduces downtime, and it helps provide maximum output from your turbines.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/sector/offshore-wind
Our technical advisory team brings a wide range of global experience coupled with specific knowledge of US offshore metocean and geotechnical conditions, turbine technology, grid connection and regulatory regimes.
Our specialist team of experts contributed to the early-stage development of US offshore wind projects throughout the 2000s and provided technical due diligence support for an investor in the leading-edge Block Island Wind Project in 2016.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/offshore-wind



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/engineering-operations/solar-and-energy-storage-inspections



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/solar-and-energy-storage-inspections



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/projects



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/projects/project-detail/rosamond-central-solar-project
Confidential tax equity investor
O
Rosamund central solar project
ur analytics team modelled long-term energy production and calculated estimation uncertainty using our industry-leading tools and resources, as well as our in-house experts in bifacial PV system modelling and performance.
Revisiting bifacial module technology
To provide a reliable technical review of all aspects of the project, including characterization of project risks and potential mitigants, to give our investor client comfort to move forward with a sizable tax equity investment.
Key services from Natural Power:
192MWac
21 May 2020
Talk to Evan Osler about this project
Provision of an independent, finance-grade energy yield analysis (EYA) for the project, to provide an estimate of long-term energy production and production uncertainty. Natural Power employed industry-leading tools and expertise for evaluating bifacial PV module performance and carefully examined albedo, bifacialty, and module construction to ensure best possible returns for the client.
192MWac bifacial solar project in Kern County, California, USA
Pre-construction technical due diligence, including reviw of the Independent Engineer's report as well as key project documents, system design, project participants, construction plan, technology and financial model. The review included a deep analysis of current hot topics in complex utility scale projects, such as curtailment risk, shared facilities and nuances offtaker agreements.
The client used Natural Power’s review to gain comfort in its decision to fund the project with a tax equity investment
Our advisory team undertook a detailed review of all aspects of the planned project, with a specific focus on uncovering and further investigating technical risks that might have a material effect on the long-term operation from a design, financial or regulatory perspective
Talk to our project experts about your needs
Further reading
Tax equity investor support on complex bifacial California solar project


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/policies
Implement and maintain an integrated management system that includes the provisionsof ISO 14001.
Manage and risk assess our operations to ensure that our impact on the local and global environment is minimised.
The Managing Director is accountable to the Board of Directors for ensuring this policy is implemented
Responsibilities:
Where practicable, utilise low carbon or zero carbon energy solutions within service delivery.
Management throughout Natural Power are responsible for ensuring the adherence with this policy and ensuring adequate provision of required resources to comply with this policy.
The statement shall be communicated to all employees and directly employed contractors working for or on behalf of the business and shall be reviewed every two years. The statement shall be available to all interested parties and published on the business website
Where practicable, strive to be energy efficient and actively reduce the organisations negative impact in relative terms.
Natural Power shall:
Comply with relevant laws and regulations of the market our services are delivered in and adhere to the requirements outlined within our integrated management system.
Set and regularly review environmental objectives and targets with the aim of continuous improvement.
All employees and directly employed contractors have the individual responsibility to ensure that they and their colleagues adhere to this policy at all times and report any breaches of policy
Encourage a culture of employee engagement and participation in the environmental management system and in continuous improvement of it.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/policies/modern-day-slavery-policy
efdg


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/policies/csr-policy
defgh


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/policies/environment-policy



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/policies/quality-policy



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/contact
Contact us to learn more about our business, discuss your project or talk to a member of our team.
Saratoga Springs NY:
Let us connect you to the right person
+1 (518) 308 0200


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/engineering-operations/inspections



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/certifications
APS, UK
CIBSE, UK
Cyber Essentials
UVDB Verify, UK
ISO 9001:2015 UK, Ireland     ISO 14001:2015 UK, Ireland     ISO 45001:2018
Natural Power's certifications and accreditations
certifications
IEMA,UK
Sellihca, UK
smas worksafe contractor, UK


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/history
In Ted’s words:
As part of the sale, the team would move to the Forest Estate. They wanted to prove that you could run a high-tech business from a rural location and support that local population. The Green House would send a powerful statement that Natural Power wasn’t simply greening around the edges.
the
It’s all about making renewables
Having signed as a developer’s agent for Powergen, and with the security of several development projects under their belts, they began building their team. They grew Natural Power based on pure enthusiasm and a belief in what the company was doing. It was very flexible and ambitious:
As renewable projects were starting to grow in number and more projects were connected to the National Grid, safety became a primary concern. The ControlCentre became a solution to that problem. Originally starting out as a health and safety exercise, it was working to the wind turbine safety rules, which the Natural Power team helped to create.
With power from renewable sources, heat from a ground source heat pump and water from underground aquifers, it represented a company that lived and breathed clean energy.
The team did everything to make renewables projects better, more efficient and more cost effective. As Ted explained: “It wasn’t enough to simply build renewable projects. Our job was to build them, learn from them and take that learning to make sure we do better the next time. Every time we identified any issues or a standard that fell below par out ethos was to improve it.”
Our overseas teams are growing rapidly, and we are exploring new markets and technologies and sharing important insights and experience. We continue to find new ways to make the industry perform better, while satisfying our appetite for knowledge.
As a company, Natural Power was passionate in the belief that renewables were viable, but it was necessary to get them as economic as possible.
By 1999 they recognised that to get a competitive advantage they would need a partner. After approaching some key players, they received a call from Jeremy Sainsbury who worked with Fred. Olsen on his estate in Dumfries. They had a shared belief in the viability of renewables, the chemistry was right, and a month later Fred. Olsen bought Natural Power.
technology of the future and continuing our quest to create a better environment.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/engineering-operations/service-and-repair
Service & Repair at Renewable Energy Sites | Natural Power
Our aim is to give our clients long-term value when it comes to servicing and repair, and the best way to do that is making sure we keep assets working for as long as possible and with as little downtime as possible. This gives you peace of mind that you’re getting the best out of your assets.
We give our clients independent and transparent servicing advice.
Our expert staff provide a full level of servicing at sites that includes routine maintenance and repairs; reactive and predictive maintenance; and annual servicing. With people on site or local to an asset, we can respond to any faults or handle any repairs quickly.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/sector/grid-storage-and-infrastructure
Developing a resilient
electrical protection and offshore transmission operator (OFTO) services.
Not only can we assist you with identifying and applying for the right connection, we can provide asset management services, including high voltage (HV) management and maintenance services.
The world’s increasing demand for energy means that we must create an energy system that can meet this need. This
overhead and underground connections, substations, interconnectors, active network management options,
energy system that meets the demand of our ever-growing energy needs also means offering battery storage. This means storing electricity so that it’s available as and when it’s needed. If you want to develop, finance, build or operate
a storage project, we can make sure that it has the best possible chance of success.
Talk to Fiona Stryjewski about this sector
Green Energy Grid, Storage & Infrastructure | Natural Power
means connecting sustainable energy sources to the grid. We can create a link between the grid and your onshore, offshore or infrastructure projects, large or small. This includes advising on


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/grid-storage-and-infrastructure



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/reseau-stockage-et-infrastructure



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/a-propos
Pays dans lequels nous avons menés des projets
Rencontrez ici notre equipe leadership, découvrez ce qu'ils font et comment ils font avancer Natural Power pour que nous puissions créer un monde alimenté par des energies renouvelables.
Contrôles techniques diligent effectués
Nos but et nos valeurs soutiennent tout ce que nous faisons
Tonnes compensés en carbone
+2350
Clients servis
42
+2,100
En tant que pionniers du changement renouvelable nous continuons de contribuer a son évolution et son expansion, créant un environement meilleur pour notre planète et les générations à venir.
63
Plus de 25 ans de conseils fiables et impartiaux dans un large éventail de services.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/leadership
Partenaires
LeaderShip
Natural Power est dirigée par des experts dans leur domaine. Ensemble, ils associent leurs riches expériences et une capacité à prendre les meilleures décisions pour le long terme à leurs riches expériences.
Directeurs


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/leadership
Meet Our Senior Leadership Team | Natural Power


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/leadership



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about
As pioneers of positive renewable change, we continue to contribute to its evolution and growth, creating a better environment for the future of our planet and the generations to come.
history
Technical due diligence services provided
Our vision, mission and values underpin everything that we do
Clients served
Meet our leadership team and find out more about what they do and how they help guide our business.
Tons of carbon emissions offset
Our policies
Countires where we have worked on projects
Over 25 years of trusted and impartial advice on a wide range of services


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/our-vision-mission-and-values
We develop long-term relationships that allow our clients to succeed by delivering unsurpassed services, quality and value. We are proactive, active listeners, progressive, straightforward and responsive.
We lead by example and empower our people to take ownership and make decisions in the best interests of our business and our clients.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/a-propos/nos-valeurs
Travail d'equipe
Intégrité et respect
Leadership et responsabilité
L'ensemble des idées et des comportements auxquels notre entreprise est attachée, ce que nous défendons et pourquoi nous faisons ce que nous faisons.
Nous travaillons en équipe au-delà des frontières, en tirant parti de nos savoir-faire et compétences de par le monde pour répondre aux besoins de nos clients et contribuer à la réussite de l'entreprise. Nous nous faisons confiance. Nous savons voir la situation dans son ensemble et réagissons en adéquation de sorte que la réussite soit celle de tous.
Expertise, innovation et ambition
Nous dirigeons par l’exemple et responsabilisons nos collaborateurs dans l’appropriation et la prise de décisions qui sont dans l'intérêt de l’entreprise et de nos clients. Nous ne nous soustrayons pas à nos responsabilités et ne nous blâmons pas entre nous. Nous sommes personnellement comptables de nos engagements. Nous reconnaissons et nous nous réjouissons de nos réussites.
Engagement envers les clients
Nous respectons les références les plus exigeantes en matière d'intégrité, de sécurité et d'éthique. Nous respectons l'environnement et nous nous respectons. Nous nous sommes engagés à créer un environnement de travail sûr, sans incident. Nous nous mettons nous-mêmes au défi de respecter ces exigences. Nous ne promettons que ce que nous pouvons tenir et avons le courage de dire non lorsque cela est nécessaire.
Nous développons des relations à long terme pour la réussite de nos clients en offrant des services, une qualité et une valeur inégalés. Nous pensons, parlons et agissons dans l’intérêt du client.
1 de 5
Nos  valeurs
Nous voulons être les meilleurs dans tout ce que nous entreprenons et cherchons toujours à nous améliorer. En investissant dans l'innovation (dans nos services et nos process) et dans le développement personnel, nous améliorons l'efficacité et la performance de notre entreprise. Nous acceptons les défis, nous accueillons favorablement le changement et sommes prêts à prendre des risques.
Intégrité
Travail d’équipe et collaboration


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/a-propos/la-vie-natural-power
Nos employés travaillent à Natural Power pour diverses raisons, mais c'est notre passion qui nous unit.
En plus des avantages de l'entreprise, nous investirons également dans vos compétences et votre développement. Vous pouvez grandir au sein de Natural Power et tirer le meilleur parti de votre carrière ici. Nous voulons que vous fassiez de votre mieux. Notre personnel gère également un centre social très fréquenté et organise des événements toute l'année. Même socialement, nous visons à créer un meilleur environnement et à redonner à nos communautés, nous organisons donc souvent des événements caritatifs ou des projets environnementaux.
Vous souhaitez travailler avec nous? Veuillez voir notre section carriéres
Notre culture


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/a-propos/la-vie-chez-natural-power/histoire2/camille-guillemette
Ces solutions sont ensuite rédigées et présentées en réunion au maître d’ouvrage.
J’ai commencé ma carrière en travaillant sur les oiseaux en mer, et notamment sur les zones de nidification en milieu insulaire. Ces études m’ont amené à travailler dans le contexte du développement de parcs éoliens en mer, et de l’intégration de ces projets dans leur environnement. Mon travail chez Natural Power entre dans ce contexte : je participe à l’intégration des projets d’énergies renouvelables dans leur environnement en conseillant les porteurs de projet dans les solutions à mettre en œuvre pour préserver la biodiversité et en particulier l’avifaune qui est ma spécialité.
Avec l’équipe Planning & Environnement de Natural Power France, nous avons décroché en décembre 2019, la réalisation de l’étude d’impact environnemental pour le projet éolien en mer de Dunkerque. Il s’agit du premier projet soumis à la nouvelle réglementation de l’autorisation environnementale que l’on appelle « permis à caractéristiques variables » et qui permet au porteur de projet de demander une autorisation pour un projet non entièrement défini de façon à pouvoir intégrer les évolutions de technologies qui pourront apparaître entre le dépôt de l’autorisation et « la pose de la première pierre » du projet.
Ce qui me plait est de toujours devoir trouver des solutions spécifiques au contexte d’un projet. Il s’agit de faire appel à ses connaissances pour trouver les éléments les plus pertinents qui pourraient être mis en œuvre dans le contexte environnemental toujours différent d’un projet à un autre. Il s’agit aussi de toujours être au fait des dernières avancées, des dernières connaissances pour développer les meilleures solutions.
A partir de ces informations et de la compréhension du contexte et des problématiques, je discute et réfléchis avec mes collègues experts en France et au UK des solutions qui existent et que l’on peut développer dans le cadre du projet pour résoudre les problématiques environnementales.
Comment en êtes-vous arrivé là ?
En tant que chef de projet environnement chez Natural Power j’interviens dans toutes les étapes du cycle de vie d’un projet (développement, construction, exploitation, démantèlement) pour répondre aux problématiques environnementales auxquelles fait face le projet.
Ma journée consiste à discuter avec le maître d’ouvrage des problématiques auxquelles il fait face, de manière à les cibler et à comprendre ses attentes.
En quoi consiste généralement votre journée ?
Quel est le projet le plus intéressant sur lequel vous avez travaillé et pourquoi ?
Il s’agit d’un projet transversal : le déploiement des modélisations du risque de collision dans les études d’impact des projets éoliens en France. Ces modélisations sont appliquées de façon réglementaire dans les projets au Royaume-Uni et ailleurs en Europe, et permettent d’aborder de façon quantitative le risque de collision, considéré comme l’effet majeur des parcs éoliens sur l’avifaune. Cette approche quantitative permet une comparaison des études entre plusieurs parcs et d’apporter une nouvelle voie à l’évaluation des effets cumulés, et cela à l’échelle européenne. Les modélisations du risque de collision sont des méthodologies innovantes qui permettrait d’apporter un nouveau point de vue pour le développement des parcs éoliens en France. Le caractère innovant et le développement d’une nouvelle méthodologie qui présente un intérêt majeur, font partie des éléments très stimulants dans le cadre de ce projet.
Quel est votre plus grande réussite ?
Vous avez des talents cachés ?
Je parle aux oiseaux et aux plantes, ce qui est un atout majeur dans le cadre de mon métier.
Quel est votre rôle ?
Qu’est-ce qui vous plaît le plus dans votre rôle ?
Il s’agit ensuite de comprendre et d’assimiler le contexte environnemental du projet de façon à débuter une réflexion sur comment résoudre les problématiques identifiées. Cette compréhension se base sur la lecture des documents publiés relatifs à l’environnement du projet et à la recherche d’informations complémentaires dans la littérature scientifique.
C’est un évènement important en France dans l’évolution de l’évaluation environnementale, et Natural Power est ainsi l’acteur n°1.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/service/ingenierie/engineering-service
Nos services d'ingénierie incluent design et conseils; ingénierie électrique et mécanique; services géotechniques; et les services d'ingénierie du directeur.
Natural Power réunit des ingénieurs civils, mecaniques, electriques, environementaux et géotechniques pour mener à bien les projets d'énergie renouvelables de nos clients.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/service/conseil/analyse
En phase d’exploitation, nous analysons la performance dans le cadre de processus d’amélioration permanente.
En phase développement, nous apportons nos conseils dans la mise en place d’une stratégie de capture de données in situ (mâts, LIDAR) et supervisons les mâts ou lidar pendant la période d’acquisition de données.
Notre équipe d’Analystes est capable de réaliser des études de gisement et de productible à toutes les étapes d’un projet dans tous les secteurs.
En phase de financement, nous produisons des études complètes reconnues par tous les organismes prêteurs en France comme à l’étranger.
Dans cette gamme de production purement intellectuelle, Natural Power investit massivement dans les programmes français et européens de Recherche et Développement. Nous sommes tout particulièrement en pointe dans l’analyse des sites à structure complexe grâce à la mise en œuvre d’outils CFD (Computational Fluid Dynamics).
En phase faisabilité, nous réalisons des études qualitatives qui permettent de définir les priorités de développement en comparant le potentiel des sites sur la base de données disponibles, souvent publiques.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/analyse



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/service/ingenierie/inspections



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/inspections



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/inspections



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/inspections



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/our-values



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/health_&_safety_at_natural_power



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/health_safety_at_natural_power



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/partners-and-membership-organisations
renewable UK
Wind Energy Ireland
scottish renewables
partners and membership organisations


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise
Renewables Expertise & Consultancy Services | Natural Power


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/careers
Do you have the power to change the world?
Our staff also run a busy social hub, and they organise events all year round. Even socially we aim to create a better environment and give back to our communities, so we often run charity events or environmental projects.
Employee Benefits Guide UK
In addition to company benefits, we’ll also invest in your skills and development. You can grow within Natural Power and get the most out of your career here. We want you to do your best.
Employee Benefits Guide Ireland
Careers in Renewables | Current Vacancies at Natural Power
Read our CSR statement here.
Natural Power Consultants is now a signatory of the Good Recruitment Campaign. The campaign requires organisations to sign up to a Good Recruitment Charter and commit to following the nine key principles. These ensure that our recruitment process remains fair, inclusive and follows good practice, and that we review our process to allow for continuous improvement of the candidate experience.
The purpose and passion of our founders have drawn similar people to Natural Power. Over the past 25 years, we have grown into a team of over 400 people worldwide. Despite our growth, our founding beliefs, drive and philosophy have not changed. The people at Natural Power are still working together to create a better world powered by renewable energy. And we’re always looking for new people to help us make that happen.
Here you’ll find our job vacancies at locations across the UK, Ireland, France and the USA. If you want to know more about our culture and some of the jobs we do, you can find out more about our
profile to keep up to date with our latest jobs and news.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/life-at-natural-power/story/amber-wright
About four months into my internship, I became more conscious that the end of my six-month contract was getting closer. I was enjoying the job so much and was over the moon when my line manager told me that they had decided to give me another six months. Then, when my new contract came through, I realised it had been extended to a year!
The interview was on Teams and had a panel of three: Toby Gilbert, head of design and geotechnical; Mae Aldridge, geo-survey project manager; and McNabb Laurie of The Galloway Glens Landscape Partnership, which would be funding the internship. I was nervous upon realising there would be a panel of three; however, it took only a couple minutes to see how friendly everyone was, and I felt I could be myself. When I found out a few days before Christmas that I had got the position, I was thrilled. Christmas 2020 was one to remember.
Even before I started the job, I already had a keen interest in peat. We have so much of it in Scotland, and it’s really engrained into our culture. However, I didn’t realise quite how important it is and how much of an impact it can have on our environment. Learning about its history and how much carbon it stores was fascinating, and I’ve really enjoyed working on detailed peat studies, as the information from these is used to prevent things like peat slides happening during construction, which could be seriously detrimental to the environment and affect water courses and carbon emissions.
My job varies a lot, so I couldn’t really say there was a typical day! It often depends on any client requests, what stage the work is at, historical land uses of the site and many other things.
The first job I had was to carry out over 1,000 peat probes at a site in Ayrshire to measure the peat depths on the proposed turbine access tracks. The site is near an old WW2 practise bombing site, so an explosive ordnance disposal (EOD) had to accompany me to scan for unexploded ordnance before I could penetrate the ground with the peat probe. Since then, I’ve done lots of detailed peat studies, in-situ testing and walkovers, both in Scotland and Northern Ireland. What I can say is that my field work almost always consists of a lot of walking, and it’s often over beautiful landscapes!
What has been your biggest achievement so far while at Natural Power?
Initially, it was a parent of a friend who spotted the advert for the internship, and they thought it would be a good fit for me. When I read the job description, I was immediately intrigued: it sounded brilliant and was exactly what I was looking for. I filled out the online application and was delighted to be given an interview a couple of weeks later.
Galloway Glens Landscape Partnership
The Galloway Glens Landscape Partnership project is a National Lottery Heritage Fund supported project, hosted by Dumfries and Galloway Council. It’s aim is to connect people with their heritage and to support sustainable rural communities. A key strand of this is in creating opportunities for our young people to stay in the region with fulfilling careers, and so the Galloway Glens has created an internship programme that supports local businesses and organisations with half of the costs of offering fully-paid internships. For more details about this programme, contact
So far, I’ve worked mostly on wind farm sites, but more recently I’ve been working on an overhead power line route and even a geothermally heated swimming pool.
What is the most interesting thing you’ve learnt so far and why?
I've always been an outdoorsy person, so the fact that I get to simultaneously enjoy the outdoors, learn about it, and actively help it through my work is a dream come true!
Helen.Keron@dumgal.gov.uk
One highlight for me was working on a peat study in Ireland where we came across an area of very deep peat descending over six metres deep. Using the peat corer, we took samples of the peat and found fragments of wood that had been perfectly preserved metres under the ground. To put this into perspective, peat accumulates from decaying moss and plant matter at only 1mm per year, meaning anything found metres under the ground would be thousands of years old. Peat preserves things very well, and on the first job I worked on we had to have an archaeologist supervising trial pits in case we discovered anything of historic importance.
Gallowayglens.org.
After a chunk of field work often comes a chunk of desk work to process the data collected and display it in a way that it can be passed on to the client. It’s a great balance between the two, and it’s always nice to sit down at a desk after a lot of walking and vice versa.
. For more details about the Galloway Glens and its projects, see
Finding a career path that I’m truly passionate about and working hard to show I’m committed in the hopes that I could stay with Natural Power after my six-month internship was over. This came true for me last month, and I can’t wait to continue learning and improving. When I left school, I wasn’t sure of what I wanted for myself, but I didn’t want to throw myself into a degree for the sake of it. I’ve now found a degree that covers earth sciences, environmental sciences and renewable energy, and I can study from home while learning just as valuable skills and expertise on the job.
The ground investigation consists of different intrusive tests and methods to decipher the soil and rock profile, and parameters. This can be things like rotary drilling, in-situ testing, detailed peat studies, trial pitting and peat probing. This information is then compiled into a report and used by the Planning and Construction teams. At my desk, if I’m not processing the data collected, I could be using mapping software to look at information relating to sites or preparing points of interest for a site visit.
Another would be the amount of training I’ve received since starting: NPORS 4x4 training, construction skills certification scheme (CSCS) and Health and Safety Awareness course, Level 3 First Aid, hill training and lots of Teams meetings explaining how to use different Natural Power computer programs. It’s increased my confidence hugely, and I feel safe on site knowing I’m prepared for any difficulties that could arise.
The past six months has inspired me to pursue higher education in this field, so I’m hopefully going to be starting a part-time Honours degree in Environmental Science with the Open University while working alongside with my new contract.
I work within the Geotechnical department, and my time is split between being in the office assisting in desk studies and being on site working on ground investigations, which are carried out before construction begins on site.
It's hard to say just one thing, but what’s really stood out to me from the start is the sense of community and teamwork at Natural Power. Within two weeks of starting, I felt as if I’d been here for two months, as everyone was so friendly and welcoming – it helped me settle in quickly. My line manager Allan checked up on me regularly to see how I was getting on and got me involved in lots of different projects.
How did you get into the role in the first place?


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/amber-wright
Countries where we have worked on projects
About us - Natural Power
We have provided independent, expert advice to the renewable energy industry for over 25 years
68
+2,156
315


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/engineering-operations/operations-and-asset-management
High Voltage support.
We also have the capacity to develop and grow. The ControlCentre can expand to accommodate any changes in the market or to meet new needs from our clients. We’re always developing new tools that make it easier and faster to monitor and report on a site’s activities.
health and safety co-ordination
To make sure our ControlCentre services can operate independently, should our first site have any technical issues, we have a backup ControlCentre with a standalone IT network. We’ll always keep your asset running and make sure your data stays safe.
Once operational, our multi-disciplinary team will help you to get the most from your assets and keep them safe, reliable and compliant. Our team of office-based asset managers provide a single point of contact for our clients and work to improve the performance of their assets. They work closely with the on-site teams to effectively manage inspections, electrical network operations, maintenance and emergency response activities, and they capture this via operational reporting.
Our ControlCentre manages renewable energy assets for clients 24/7 all year round to make sure they stay operational and safe.
Our operational controllers use automated systems to monitor the sites in our care, so we always keeping a close watch on your asset for you. Our ControlCentre services include:
remit portal
View our
Natural Power’s team of servicing and repair technicians form an integral part of the operations and asset management team. Working closely with our team of analysts and engineers, they can schedule maintenance work to ensure minimal downtime and reduction of long-term renewable energy operational costs. We currently manage over 200 onshore wind, offshore, solar, hydro and heat sites around the world.
24/7 monitoring
Renewables Operations & Asset Management | Natural Power
grid code services


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/operations-and-asset-management



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/operations-and-asset-management



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/engineering-operations/environmental-technology
Following a proof-of-concept deployment in 2019 and supported by the U.S. Department of Energy (DOE) as well as the National Renewable Energy Laboratory (NREL), we worked with Alliant Energy to install and operate a full system from August to October 2020 at the English Farms wind farm in Iowa.
Paul Burkert
Creating harmony between wind energy and bat populations
Can EchoSense make a difference to your wind farm project?
against minimal and blanket curtailment to prove it works, and the results were compelling. Curtailment with
How we tested
system began in 2018 when Natural Power gathered a team of bat experts, technology and software engineers to create a more effective way to protect bats while minimizing the impact on energy production. A deep understanding of bat behavior, wind farm operational controls and cybersecurity were essential to find a solution that presented clients with environmental and financial benefits.
Commercial Manager
Environmental Technology
Talk to Paul Burkert about this service
Development of the
How
In 2020-21 we tested
works
works by combining SCADA (Supervisory Control and Data Acquisition), meteorological and acoustic data to curtail wind turbines when bats are present in a NERC compliant manner.
to prove its effectiveness
paulbu@naturalpower.com
to find out.
is a highly effective bat smart curtailment technology that provides an alternative to the high energy losses associated with blanket curtailment. The system reduces  bat fatalities at wind farms while simultaneously reducing curtailment hours and associated energy losses when compared to a blanket curtailment strategy.
resulted in an average reduction in energy loss of 56% compared to blanket curtailment.
Contact us at
Read more here...


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/environmental-technology



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/sector/onshore-wind
operational energy yield assessments
finance-grade pre-construction energy yield assessments
site screening and site feasibility evaluations
We can also work with you to plan life extension or project repowering.
We can support you with the right advice at the right time to ensure productivity, compliance and safety. We’re wind energy experts.
Having started our business consulting on wind energy projects, we have an impressive portfolio of work that shows we can help plan, build and optimize the performance of your wind farm.
inspections
compliance and construction monitoring
environmental assessment and permitting support
buy-side and sell-side technical due diligence
asset management.
independent engineering


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/onshore-wind



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/onshore-wind



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news
News & Articles on Renewable Energy Sector | Natural Power


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites
Natural Power - actualites


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/actualite/natural-power-secures-consent-for-rothes-iii-wind-farm-extension
Rothes Wind Farm is located approximately 4km west of Rothes and first became operational in 2005. The wind farm originally consisted of 22 turbines and was extended in 2012. It currently generates 92 MW and the decision today will bring the total capacity at the site to over 190 MW.
“Consenting the extension will allow us to build on this track record and work with the local community and stakeholder to make sure that Rothes Wind Farm continues to be an asset to the local area.”
The Rothes application was prepared and submitted on behalf of Fred. Olsen Renewables by Natural Power.
“Natural Power’s operations team already service the existing Rothes 1 and 2 wind farms providing 11 wind turbine technical jobs in the local community. Having the opportunity to expand these services and increase local employment opportunities is an exciting prospect as well.”
Julie Aitken, Senior Project Manager at Fred. Olsen Renewables, said: “We welcome today’s decision from the Scottish Government. Rothes Wind Farm has been operational for almost 20 years and during this time it has delivered considerable community benefit locally, helped to support the local economy and made a substantial contribution towards our net zero targets.
The project has delivered more than £1m in community benefit funds and the new plans will see more than £500,000 distributed annually in the local area – more than £17.5m throughout the lifetime of the project.
Emily Galloway, Technical Director at Natural Power, said: “Natural Power’s Onshore Consenting and Environmental Impact Team team, along with input from various technical specialists, are proud to have supported Fred. Olsen Renewables in the successful consenting of a further extension to Rothes Wind Farm. This consent takes the existing legacy of the operational site, which has been a show case project for environmental and habitat management, forward for another 35 years.
Scottish Ministers have today, Friday 21st October, approved an application by Fred. Olsen Renewables to extend Rothes Wind Farm in Moray. The plans, for an additional 28 turbines, will bring the total number of turbines at the site to 68, with the potential to generate more than 100 MW of additional electricity.
Construction of the extension is anticipated to commence in 2026 with the project being fully operational by 2027.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/natural-power-secures-consent-for-rothes-iii-wind-farm-extension



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/actualite/natural-power-achieves-carbon-neutral-plus-status
17 Nov 2022 .
emissions since 2019 and sets a great benchmark for us to build and improve on.”
Chair of the Green Space, Josie FitzGibbon said “this is the result of a year-on-year decline in Natural Power’s CO
2
Achieving Carbon Neutral Plus status puts the company on a positive trajectory to achieving its Net Zero ambitions and is just one of the initiatives being run by Natural Power’s Green Space committee, which brings colleagues from across teams and countries to collaborate on improving sustainability across the company. It also aims to help our people and the communities that they work in on their own green journeys.
Natural Power has officially been awarded Carbon Neutral Plus status by Carbon Footprint Ltd by supporting global projects which offset more carbon than the company has been produced this year. The projects, which are audited independently to a Gold Standard, include a wind power project in India, efficient cookstoves in Uganda and peatland restoration in Indonesia, as well as tree planting schemes across Scotland, Wales and Kenya.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/natural-power-achieves-carbon-neutral-plus-status



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/natural-power-achieves-carbon-neutral-plus-status



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/natural-power-achieves-carbon-neutral-plus-status



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/natural-power-supports-brookfields-1-billion-investment-in-scout-clean-energy
Leading renewable energy consultancy and service provider, Natural Power, has provided technical due diligence on behalf of Brookfield Renewable, one of the world’s largest clean energy investors, in support of its acquisition of Scout Clean Energy for $1 billion.
Colorado-based Scout will continue to operate as an independent business within the Brookfield Renewable U.S. platform. The transactions will be invested through the Brookfield Global Transition Fund I (“BGTF I”), which is the largest fund in the world focused on the energy transition. Co-led by former Bank of England Governor and Brookfield Vice Chair, Mark Carney, and Brookfield Renewable CEO, Connor Teskey, BGTF I has raised $15 billion to invest across a range of transition opportunities.
Michael Rucker, CEO and founder of Scout Clean Energy, said: “Scout is pleased to be sponsored going forward by an industry-leading partner to help Scout continue to grow our rapidly expanding pipeline of wind, solar and battery storage projects across the United States. “
Jim Adams, President of North America Operations at Natural Power, said: “Natural Power is incredibly proud to have supported this significant investment in a highly-regarded developer, owner and operator of renewable energy projects. 2022 continues to be an historic year for renewable platform M&A, and the recent passage of the Inflation Reduction Act will only serve to increase interest in the sector.”
18 Oct 2022 .
From its three US offices in New York, Seattle and the Denver area, the Natural Power team supports a range of clients including
www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/advisory/due-diligence
Scout’s portfolio is comprised of more than 1,200 MW of operating wind assets, including 400 MW managed on behalf of third parties, and a pipeline of more than 22,000 MW of wind, solar and storage projects across 24 states, including almost 2,500 MW of under construction and advanced-stage projects.
institutional investors and banks, developers, asset owners, power producers and utilities, as well as government organizations, delivering services throughout the region and beyond. To date, Natural Power’s U.S. team has delivered technical advisory services on more than 100GW of renewable energy projects. Find out more here


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/natural-power-supports-brookfields-1-billion-investment-in-scout-clean-energy



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/natural-power-supports-brookfields-1-billion-investment-in-scout-clean-energy



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/natural-power-supports-brookfields-1-billion-investment-in-scout-clean-energy



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/actualite/natural-power-kicks-off-construction-at-benbrack-wind-farm-for-red-rock-power



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/mentions-legales
Bien que Natural Power s’efforce de publier sur ce Site des informations exactes et à jour, Natural Power n’offre aucune garantie quant à l’exactitude de ces informations. Natural Power décline toute responsabilité pour d’éventuelles erreurs ou omissions dans le contenu de ce Site.
Les conditions générales énoncées ci-dessous, ainsi que toute autre loi ou règle applicable à ce site internet (le « Site »), à Internet en général ou au réseau global du Web, s’applique à tous les utilisateurs du Site.
Il vous est interdit de publier ou de diffuser tout contenu illégal, menaçant, diffamatoire, obscène, scandaleux, sulfureux ou grossier ou tout autre élément qui pourrait constituer ou encourager un comportement qui pourrait soit être considéré comme étant une infraction pénale, soit engager une responsabilité civile ou encore être contraire à la loi. Natural Power apportera son entière coopération aux autorités policières ou judiciaires qui lui demanderaient ou lui ordonneraient de révéler l’identité de toute personne qui aurait publié de telles informations ou contenus, et se réserve le droit de retirer tout contenu de ce type de son Site à tout moment.
Politique de confidentialité
Par ailleurs, Natural Power n’assume aucune responsabilité, et ne pourra être tenue responsable d’aucun dommage causé à votre matériel informatique ou tout autre bien, ni d’aucun virus qui pourrait l’infecter en raison de votre accès au Site, de son utilisation, de la navigation sur celui-ci, ou du téléchargement de tout élément mis à disposition, étant précisé que nous ne limitons en aucune façon notre responsabilité prévue par la loi en cas de décès ou de préjudice corporel qui résulterait de notre négligence. Tous les éléments présentés sur ce site vous sont fournis « TELS QUELS » SANS AUCUNE GARANTIE D’AUCUNE SORTE, EXPRESSE OU IMPLICITE, Y COMPRIS MAIS SANS SE LIMITER AUX GARANTIES IMPLICITES DE COMMERCIABILITE, DE CONFORMITE A UN USAGE SPECIFIQUE, OU D’ABSENCE DE CONTREFACON, étant précisé que nous ne limitons en aucune façon notre responsabilité prévue par la loi en cas de décès ou de préjudice corporel qui résulterait de notre négligence.
Conditions générales
Il vous est interdit d’utiliser toute marque, déposée ou non, figurant sur ce site sans avoir reçu au préalable notre autorisation écrite ou celle du titulaire de la marque concernée.
Natural Power n’a examiné aucun des sites pouvant être reliés à ce Site et se dégage de toute responsabilité quant au contenu ou à la politique de confidentialité de toute page hors site ou de tout autre site relié à ce Site.
Marques
Les Consultants de Natural Power (« Natural Power » – société enregistrée sous le numéro SC177881, TVA n°GB243692648, siège sis à The Green House, Forrest Estate, Dalry, Castle Douglas, DG7 3XS, Royaume-Uni) assurent la maintenance de ce Site à des fins d’information et de communication. Cependant, vous n’êtes pas autorisés à distribuer, modifier, transmettre, réutiliser, republier, ou utiliser le contenu de ce site à des fins publiques ou commerciales, y compris les textes, images, contenus audio et vidéo, sans l’autorisation écrite de « Natural Power ».
Sous réserve du respect de ces Conditions Générales d’Utilisation, et seulement tant que l’accès et l’utilisation du Site vous est autorisé par Natural Power, vous pouvez télécharger et consulter une (1) copie de tout contenu et logiciel présent sur le Site pour lequel nous vous fournissons un accès ou un lien de téléchargement, sur un seul ordinateur, uniquement pour votre usage personnel et non commercial, sous réserve du respect de tout droit d’auteur et de tout autre avis de propriété. Sauf autorisation contraire expresse, exprimée par écrit à l’avance par Natural Power, vous acceptez de ne pas reproduire, modifier, louer, prêter, vendre, distribuer, adapter, traduire, créer d’œuvres dérivées (en tout ou en partie), procéder à une ingénierie inverse, décompiler ou désassembler tout service ou logiciel, tout ou partie de ce Site ou tout document mis à disposition sur ce Site. Certains logiciels peuvent être régis par un contrat de licence d’utilisateur final supplémentaire auquel il pourrait vous être demandé d’adhérer avant de les utiliser.
ZephIR® et VENTOS® sont des marques déposées de Natural Power. WindManager™, Melogale™, WindCentre™, ForeSite™, SeaPlanner™ et OceanPod™ sont des marques de commerce de Natural Power.
L’utilisation et la navigation sur ce Site s’effectuent à vos propres risques. Ni Natural Power, ni ses filiales, ni aucune de ses agences, ni aucune autre partie impliquée dans la création, la production ou la mise en service de ce Site ne peuvent être tenues responsables en cas de dommage direct, accessoire, consécutif, indirect ou punitif qui résulterait de votre accès à ce Site ou de son utilisation, étant précisé que nous ne limitons en aucune façon notre responsabilité prévue par la loi en cas de décès ou de préjudice corporel qui résulterait de notre négligence.
documents juridiques
L’accès à ce Site et son utilisation sont également soumis aux conditions d’utilisation suivantes ainsi qu’à toutes les lois en vigueur. En accédant et en naviguant sur ce Site, vous acceptez sans réserve et sans restriction, ces Conditions Générales d’Utilisation.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/mentions-legales/conditions-generales



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/service/conseil/due-diligence
gilesd@naturalpower.com
Service phare de Natural Power, l’audit technique de projet (technical due diligence) s’appuie d’abord sur la richesse de l’expérience pratique de chacun de nos collaborateurs.
Contacter Giles Dearden à propos de ce service
Au cœur des besoins, le concept de financement de projet sans recours : le prêteur ne peut compter que sur le projet pour se faire rembourser les échéances du prêt, il a donc intérêt à connaitre parfaitement les risques du projet. L’exercice s’applique aussi lorsqu’il s’agit d’évaluer le prix de transaction (achat/vente) dans sa dimension technique, qu’il s’agisse d’un projet en développement ou d’un portefeuille de parcs en exploitation.  La capacité à évaluer de manière indépendante et répétable un risque est le parangon de l’expertise qui prend parfois la forme d’un exercice collégial. Ce service passionnant est exigeant et impose une capacité à synthétiser les savoir liés à l’expérience et ceux liés à la curiosité technique pour l’évolution des bonnes pratiques, les technologies, l’innovation et le contexte réglementaire.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/advisory/due-diligence
Talk to Giles Dearden about this service
We understand project financing for renewable energy projects, and we make it as easy as possible for you to understand the risks.
Our experience allows us to help banks, developers, independent power producers (IPPs), utilities and investment funds make good financial decisions when it comes to green energy projects.
Renewable Energy Project Due Diligence | Natural Power
We can evaluate the potential financial risks of your proposed project and see how that might impact its build and operation.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/due-diligence



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about
Independent Green Energy Consultant | Natural Power


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/sector/hydro
Hydropower Consultants | Hydro Expertise | Natural Power
Our water services include hydropower assessments, river gauging, flow monitoring and flow duration curves, protected species surveys, and catchment surveys. Our expert teams, which include engineers, hydrologists and ecologists, can move your hydropower project forward at every stage.
If you want to utilise the power of water, we have the in-house hydro knowledge to help your project flow at every stage.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/sector



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/advisory/due-diligence



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/conseil/due-diligence



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/due-diligence



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/due-diligence



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/due-diligence



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/our-vision-mission-and-values



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects
Renewable Energy Projects | Green Projects | Natural Power


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/advising-network-rail-to-secure-renewable-ppa
Neil Marshall, advisory lead at Natural Power, said: “We’re delighted to be supporting Network Rail on its route to decarbonisation. EDF Renewables UK has demonstrated its ability to provide diverse renewable energy solutions for customers that are both competitive and affordable, so it’s a really positive move that underpins the importance of all renewable technologies in decarbonising the UK electricity system to reach the country’s net zero targets by 2050.”
Network Rail
Capture Price
Natural Power supports landmark Network Rail solar agreement with EDF Renewables UK
This agreement is in line with Network Rail’s commitment to sourcing 100% of non-traction energy from renewable sources by 2030 as part of its environmental sustainability strategy.
The successful contract covers around 15% of Network Rail’s annual consumption of non-traction energy being used in offices, depots and railway stations across the country. The power is to be provided by EDF Renewables UK’s Bloy’s Grove solar farm in Norfolk, which received planning consent in June 2022. This builds on the existing traction supply partnership between Network Rail and the wider EDF Group in the UK.
12 Aug 2020
07 Jul 2020
During the project, Natural Power helped define the parameters of the project and supplier evaluation procedure, undertake technical evaluations of the suppliers and projects submitted to the evaluation process and provided technical support during negotiation of the PPA contract which ultimately led to the purchase of 49.9 MW of solar power.
29 Aug 2022
Natural Power provided Network Rail with the technical support needed to enter into a corporate power purchase agreement of 49.9 MW of solar power with EDF Renewables UK.
Natural Power gears up for global solar growth
Procurement support


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/natural-power-gears-up-for-global-solar-growth
12 Aug 2020 .
In Ireland, we have provided M&A advisory services on more than 50 solar projects so far in 2020, with 17 of these projects securing successful results in the recent Renewable Electricity Support Scheme (RESS) auction. The range of services included site optimisation, energy yield analysis, planning and environmental and grid connection services, and it is expected that procurement and owner’s engineer services will follow on a number of these projects as they progress towards the construction phase.
Dan has more than a decade of professional experience in the solar industry. He adds extensive experience with solar technology and as an independent engineer of record on numerous utility scale solar projects and C&I portfolios for financial transactions. He is an expert on solar technology, resource and energy generation modelling, site evaluation, and storage technology.
Demonstrating further commitment to support the solar industry in North America, we recently opened our 12th global office in Golden, Colorado. Initially, there will be four keys members of the team here, including the recently appointed Dr Vardaan (Dan) Chawla as Principal Solar Engineer, as well as Chris Mertes (PE), Head of Advisory; Chad Homuth (PE), Senior Project Engineer; and Reece Enderson (PE) Senior Project Manager.
In the past 12 months, we have supported more than 6GW of solar projects, half of which have been in North America, including work as technical advisor, independent engineer of record, energy yield analysis, providing expertise on PV plant lifetime extension, and installation quality, as well as more than 100MW of storage projects supported through due diligence and lender’s technical advisor roles.
The business has a proven reputation and track record of working with clients to deliver solar projects from site finding and feasibility studies through permitting and construction. In-house experts on grid, planning, ecology, human use considerations, ground conditions and flood risk assessment work seamlessly to identify sites with the lowest associated risk in terms of consent and build conditions. Find out more
With more than 140GW of new PV plant expected to be added to grids around the world this year, up almost 15% on 2019*, we are gearing up to support the global industry build-out the expansion.
Furthermore, Andrew Cowley, a Chartered Engineer (MEI) and solar and battery storage expert has been appointed to join the UK team, and Meriadeg Charlou has bolstered the solar credentials for Natural Power France by achieving several OPQIBI qualifications which recognise competence and professionalism in engineering services, including N° 2011 the study of production installations of photovoltaic solar energy, N°2015 engineering of solar installations using photovoltaic solar energy and achieving RGE status (Recognised Guarantor of the Environment), which is awarded to professionals providing intellectual services contributing to the energy performance of buildings and facilities in France.
"As one of the leading technical advisors supporting all types of project transactions, our experts are working hand in hand with banks, sponsors, lenders, and some of the biggest players in the market, to get projects and portfolios built using the latest technologies and market innovations, from hybrid systems to novel PV modules.”
Shawn Shaw, Head of Solar and Energy Storage at Natural Power, said: “An independent engineering or advisory firm is only as good as its people, and I am really excited about the growth across our global solar and energy storage team.
Globally, we have supported approximately 15GW across more than 240 solar projects since 2017, with 100 projects supported in the US market alone. Delivering work for major sponsors, and tax and equity investors, we also continue to support due diligence on stand-alone storage facilities in major markets across North America.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/natural-power-gears-up-for-global-solar-growth



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/natural-power-supports-brookfields-1-billion-investment-in-scout-clean-energy



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/actualite/natural-power-supports-brookfields-1-billion-investment-in-scout-clean-energy



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/a-propos/leadership



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/secteur/petit-hydraulique
Etudes hydroélectriques
Études des espèces protégées
Études des bassins hydrographiques
Energie primaire stockable par excellence et mobilisable très rapidement, ce secteur contribue fortement à l’équilibre des réseaux notamment en mode transitoire.
Hydro | Natural Power
Jaugeage des rivières
Au fil de l’eau, Natural Power peut vous accompagner avec l’aide de notre équipe écossaise composée d’hydrologues et écologues.
Secteur historiquement dominé en France par les grands barrages, le secteur moins connu des petits projets hydro offre néanmoins des possibilités intéressantes.
Au Royaume-Uni, nos experts disposent des connaissances nécessaires en énergie hydraulique pour assurer le bon développement de vos projets jusqu’à l’exploitation. Il faut notamment retenir :
Surveillance des débits dans la durée


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/petit-hydraulique



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/service/ingenierie/centre-de-conduite
les services systèmes (au Royaume-Uni)
les services spécifiques liés au réseau de transport au Royaume-Uni
Ce centre de conduite en évolution permanente fonctionne selon les plus hauts standards de sécurité, il est doté d’une structure redondante autonome et synchronisée à plusieurs kilomètres de distance. Ainsi, en cas d’accident majeur sur un site, le site miroir est capable d’assurer toutes les fonctions du site en défaut. Ce mode de fonctionnement a vu son intérêt renforcé en période de pandémie en permettant d’isoler les équipes entre sites de conduite.
Notre centre de conduite gère les centrales de production d’énergie électrique à partir de ressources renouvelables de nos clients toute l’année, 24 h sur 24 et 7 j sur 7.
la coordination en matière de santé et sécurité
la surveillance 24 h sur 24 et 7 j sur 7
Il est opérationnel sur plus de 200 centrales éoliennes à terre comme en mer mais aussi solaires, hydrauliques et thermiques partout dans le monde. En France, le service en langue française est assuré pendant les heures ouvrables. Parmi nos missions principales on trouve :


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/a-propos/la-vie-chez-natural-power



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/a-propos/partenariats
En savoir plus
partnenaires
Nous travaillons avec plusieurs partenaires pour fournir des services à nos clients


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/service/conseil/environnement-et-planning



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/environnement-et-planning



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/planning-permitting-and-environment



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/engineering-operations/project-management



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/project-management



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/project-management



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/management-projet



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/engineering-operations/operations-and-asset-management
By analyzing a range of data, such as monitoring real time independent SCADA, reviewing operational downtime analysis and reporting, combined with end of warranty and balance of plant inspections and audits, we can advise and implement measures that will provide performance and reliability optimization.
Natural Power has been working with its clients to develop optimizations strategies for their assets.
We can also support future planning by undertaking post-construction yield analysis (PCYA) and power output forecasting.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/planning-permitting-and-environment



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/centre-de-conduite



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/hydro



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/hydro



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/hydro



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/secteur



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/ingenierie/management-projet



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/management-projet



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/project-management



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/project-management



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/engineering-operations/project-management



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/engineering-operations/project-management



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/conseil/environnement-et-planning



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/environnement-et-planning



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/planning-permitting-and-environment



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/planning-permitting-and-environment



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/advisory/planning-permitting-and-environment



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/conseil/analyse



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/analyse



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/ingenierie/engineering-service



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/engineering-operations/engineering-and-design



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/engineering-and-design



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/engineering-service



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/engineering-and-design



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/engineering-operations/engineering-and-design



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/ingenierie/services-geotechniques



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/services-geotechniques



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/geotechnical-services



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/engineering-operations/geotechnical-services



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/ingenierie/centre-de-conduite



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/centre-de-conduite



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/operations-and-asset-management



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/operations-and-asset-management



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/remit-portal
Fallago Rig Remit
Dorenell Remit
Information made availableunder REMIT
Crystal Rig II Outage.pdf
Remit Portal
Crystal Rig II Remit
Beinneun Outage.pdf
REMIT Portal | Power Stations Production Info | Natural Power
Dorenell 1 Outage.pdf
Dorenell 2 Outage.pdf
Fallago Rig Remit.xlsx
Fallago Rig Outage.pdf
Beinneun Remit
EU Regulation 1227/2011 on Wholesale Energy Market Integrity and Transparency (REMIT) requires the owners of power stations to make publicly available information on the current status and availability of their production assets. This information is provided in the links below:.
CRYRW 2 202207030730.pdf


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/remit-portal



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/portal-remit
Portal Remit


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/engineering-operations/operations-and-asset-management



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/engineering-operations/operations-and-asset-management



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/natural-power-achieves-carbon-neutral-plus-status
Natural Power has officially been awarded Carbon Neutral Plus status by Carbon Footprint Ltd for the second year.  The award is given in recognition of the support Natural Power has given to projects across the globe which offset more carbon than the company has produced this year. The projects, which are audited independently by the Gold Standard, include a wind power project in India, efficient cookstoves in Uganda and peatland restoration in Indonesia, as well as tree planting schemes across Scotland, Wales and Kenya.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/natural-power-achieves-carbon-neutral-plus-status



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/natural-power-gears-up-for-global-solar-growth



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/natural-power-hseq-director-appointed-to-safetyon-leadership
Rob Brown, Managing Director at Natural Power, said: “Frank is a true health and safety professional. His appointment with Natural Power is integral to our strategy and he will be at the forefront of championing HSEQ from the very top of our business, ensuring strong corporate governance, compliance and the continuous development of our teams internationally. We’re delighted that he’s also taken on this leadership role with SafetyOn, and to be joined by Stewart on the technical committee ensures we are well represented at this level, and continue to champion HSEQ on behalf of our industry.”
health and safety here
:
Frank joined Natural Power earlier this year from SP Energy Networks where he latterly held the role of Health and Safety Director and was responsible for health and safety on all SPEN transmission and distribution assets throughout the UK. Prior to that, he was Health and Safety Director at Scottish Power Renewables and led on health and safety on a number of onshore and offshore wind projects.
SafetyOn
Find out more about Natural Power’s
6 Dec 2022 .
Frank Monaghan said: “Having been part of the founding team at SafetyOn, it’s great to be joining the leadership board to continue the vital work we do for the industry. By focussing on high priority topics, SafetyOn has developed industry wide health and safety initiatives that will bring benefit to everyone working in onshore wind. I’m particularly keen to be involved with the Safe by Design initiative in 2023.”
is the health and safety organisation for the onshore wind sector. As well as ensuring transparency about the industry’s health and safety performance, the organisation assists industry stakeholders to see that key emerging risks are mitigated through co-operation and shared learning.
Frank Monaghan and Stewart Reid


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/natural-power-hseq-director-appointed-to-safetyon-leadership



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/natural-power-hseq-director-appointed-to-safetyon-leadership



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/natural-power-hseq-director-appointed-to-safetyon-leadership



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/actualite/natural-power-hseq-director-appointed-to-safetyon-leadership



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/natural-power-hseq-director-appointed-to-safetyon-leadership



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/natural-power-secures-consent-for-rothes-iii-wind-farm-extension
Emily Galloway, Technical Director at Natural Power, said: “Natural Power’s Onshore Consenting and Environmental Impact Team, along with input from various technical specialists, are proud to have supported Fred. Olsen Renewables in the successful consenting of a further extension to Rothes Wind Farm. This consent takes the existing legacy of the operational site, which has been a show case project for environmental and habitat management, forward for another 35 years.
“Consenting the extension will allow us to build on this track record and work with the local community and stakeholders to make sure that Rothes Wind Farm continues to be an asset to the local area.”


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/natural-power-secures-consent-for-rothes-iii-wind-farm-extension



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/natural-power-secures-consent-for-rothes-iii-wind-farm-extension



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/natural-power-secures-consent-for-rothes-iii-wind-farm-extension



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/natural-power-gears-up-for-global-solar-growth



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/natural-power-network-rail-solar-agreement-edf-renewables-uk
29 Aug 2022 .
Jo Lewington, Network Rail’s chief environment and sustainability officer, said: “Rail is already in a strong position in terms of its green credentials, but it’s crucial that we do everything we can as a business to improve air quality, minimise our use of fossil fuels and transition to an industry powered by green, renewable, low-carbon energy.
Leading renewable energy consultancy and service provider Natural Power has provided technical support to Network Rail throughout the supplier identification and negotiation process which has ultimately led its corporate power purchase agreement for 49.9 MW of solar power from EDF Renewables UK.
Rail Minister Wendy Morton said: “Our railway has long been the backbone of travel across the UK and, as one of the greenest forms of transport, it is set to play a central role in slashing emissions and helping us achieve our world-leading decarbonisation goals.
“This first of its kind agreement is a huge moment not just for Network Rail but the rail industry as a whole, setting in motion a journey which will see Britain’s favourite transport become even greener, cleaner and more sustainable.”
There will also be significant biodiversity improvements on site, including a community orchard and the team will liaise with local residents on these matters.
The contract will cover around 15% of Network Rail’s annual consumption of non-traction energy being used in offices, depots and railway stations across the country – provided by EDF Renewables UK’s Bloy’s Grove solar farm in Norfolk, which received planning consent in June this year. This builds on the existing traction supply partnership between Network Rail and the wider EDF Group in the UK.
EDF Renewables UK will now work closely with the local community and the council to plan the next steps towards construction and operation of the solar farm. The company will build, own and operate the solar farm for the lifetime of the project and is offering a £20,000 per year community benefit fund which starts when the site is operational.
“Our vision is to serve the nation with the cleanest, greenest form of public transport, and this agreement marks another important step towards achieving our aims.”


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/natural-power-network-rail-solar-agreement-edf-renewables-uk



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/natural-power-network-rail-solar-agreement-edf-renewables-uk



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/natural-power-network-rail-solar-agreement-edf-renewables-uk



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/natural-power-network-rail-solar-agreement-edf-renewables-uk



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/actualite/natural-power-network-rail-solar-agreement-edf-renewables-uk



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/advising-network-rail-to-secure-renewable-ppa



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/mutkalampi-wind-farm-finland
Having developed a strong working relationship with Neoen’s international team through our offices in France, combined with our track record and growing reach in the Nordics, the project team was able to provide a strong knowledge base for this project. This project drew upon the international collaboration between our teams in the UK, France and the Nordics.
Neoen has now reached successful financial close for the project, and early construction works are underway. This deal places Neoen among the wind energy market leaders in Finland. Senior debt was provided by German institutional asset manager MEAG, which is a Munich Re company.
financial model technical inputs review;
We were able to draw on our experience as lender’s technical advisor (LTA) and from owner’s engineering mandates at other large wind farms in the Nordics to advise on technology risks associated with the Vestas EnVentus platform and managing construction in cold climates.
Most of the electricity produced in Mutkalampi will supply Google, Heineken, Nobian (previously Nouryon), Philips and Signify through five 10-year corporate power purchase agreements, which are for a combined total of 251 MW. This represents another major step forward in corporates sourcing green electricity directly from renewable generators in Europe.
comprehensive technical due diligence reporting, including a review of the EPC contract, turbine O&M agreement, grid connection agreement, construction programme, electrical design, site access and transportation arrangements, ground investigations, turbine technology, land leases, permits, and environmental review;
Natural Power provided technical due diligence services and a finance-grade energy yield assessment to Neoen for the financing of Mutkalampi wind farm in western Finland. Once built, the wind farm will be the largest onshore wind farm in Finland, accounting for some 2% of the country’s annual production. As part of this landmark deal, the team provided:
review of power purchase agreements and associated performance thresholds.
Acting as technical advisor, we’ll be providing continued support to the lenders throughout the construction stage. This will include certification of debt draw downs, regular progress reporting and site visits.
Natural Power advises on Finland’s largest onshore wind farm
Neoen
independent, bankable energy yield assessment, considering local environmental conditions, such as icing losses and extreme temperature shutdowns;
26 Apr 2021
Due diligence work for the upcoming largest onshore wind farm in Finland


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/natural-power-advises-on-finlands-largest-onshore-wind-farm
Neoen has now reached financial close for the project, which will be the largest onshore wind farm in Finland, accounting for some 2% of the country’s annual production.
We will continue to support the lenders throughout the constructions stage, acting as technical advisor. This will include certification of debt draw downs, regular progress reporting and site visits.
The first stage of energy production is due to become operational by the end of 2022, and the second stage, in the third quarter of 2023.
Our global Due Diligence team provides services throughout all stages of the transaction cycle, from initial risk assessment and reporting in early transaction stages through to comprehensive reporting for credit-committee or data room presentation at final bid stage or financial close. Find out more
Most of the electricity produced in Mutkalampi will supply Google, Heineken, Nobian (previously Nouryon), Philips and Signify through five 10-year corporate power purchase agreements, for a combined total of 251 MW.
We delivered an independent, bankable energy yield assessment and a comprehensive technical due diligence report, including a review of the EPC contract, turbine O&M agreement, grid connection agreement, all power purchase agreements, construction programme, electrical design, site access and transportation arrangements, ground investigations, turbine technology, permits and environmental review, and a financial model technical inputs review.
Neil Marshall, senior project manager in Natural Power’s Advisory team, said: “This project really exemplifies international collaboration between our teams in the UK and France as well as growing our reach into the Nordics. We have developed a strong working relationship with Neoen’s international team over many years through our offices in France, and our track record in the Nordics provided a strong knowledge base for this particular project.”
We have provided technical due diligence services and energy yield assessment to Neoen for the financing of its 404 MW Mutkalampi wind farm in western Finland.
The project will be financed by Neoen’s own capital and a €290 million non-recourse senior debt facility provided by German institutional asset manager MEAG, acting on behalf of primary insurance companies of ERGO, institutional investors via MEAG and several investment funds managed by MEAG. Neoen has also secured €38 million in VAT funding from Swedish bank SEB. Total investment in the wind farm is projected at €478 million, aside from financing costs.
26 Apr 2021 .


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/natural-power-advises-on-finlands-largest-onshore-wind-farm



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/mutkalampi-wind-farm-finland



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/maryland-offshore-wind-project
Apollo Global Management


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/maryland-offshore-wind-project



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/projets/maryland-offshore-wind-project



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/projets/detail-projet/repowering-dun-site-de-4-eoliennes-nm-48-vers-4-enercon-e82
Kallista Energy
Assistant à maîtrise d'ouvrage pour un projet de repowering
Besoin d’une ressource externe en qui avoir confiance pour la problèmatique technique novatrice de repowering Risques juridiques, techniques et financiers importants face aux problématiques liées au démantèlement.
Définir et mettre en œuvre des solutions après analyse des besoins et contraintes particulières liées au démantèlement en phase préconstruction
Planification et gestion des interfaces démantèlement et construction
Natural Power a pu proposer les ressources expérimentées adaptées pour un planning exigeant une exécution rapide et efficace avec beaucoup d’interfaces Expertises en construction, inspection et exploitation qui ont permis de bien encadrer le risque technique Retour d’expérience après un projet mené avec la DREAL pour la gestion de fin de vie des éoliennes.
Mise en place d’un protocole spécifique en collaboration avec le turbinier et le producteur d’énergie
Assistance à maitrise d’ouvrage, associant compétences techniques spécifiques et ressources qualifiées sur site
Etablissement d’un projet de construction « global » de démantèlement et reconstruction


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/projets/repowering-dun-site-de-4-eoliennes-nm-48-vers-4-enercon-e82



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/advisory/due-diligence



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/engineering-operations/construction



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/construction



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/insight/are-hybrid-renewable-projects-the-future
22 Nov 2022 .
white paper here
Hybrid projects aren’t new. The industry has been exploring the benefits of co-locating different types of renewable generation and storage technology for many years now. But while there is lots of talk of “energy parks”, “virtual power plants” and other hybrid concepts, in reality we continue to see the vast majority of wind, solar and storage plants being built out on a standalone basis. Read the full


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/perspective/are-hybrid-renewable-projects-the-future



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/insight/are-hybrid-renewable-projects-the-future



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/life-at-natural-power/story/george-elderfield
1. The company – Natural Power
3. The KTP associate (me) – leads the project with support from company and academic supervision.
As a KTP associate I was able to transfer my academic knowledge and research skills into developing a new commercial offering. Prior to this role I was a PhD researcher and the opportunities presented by becoming a KTP associate have turned out to be vast.
Prior to joining Natural Power as a full time Reliability Engineer, I worked for two years on the Knowledge Transfer Partnership (KTP) between Natural Power and University of Strathclyde. Together, we developed a new through-life management service that allows clients to monitor the health of their wind turbines and effectively plan their end-of-life strategies.
I have also developed my commercial skills and knowledge both through training and collaborating directly with clients to develop a new service. Through the work done during the KTP I was also able to secure my Chartered Engineering status with the IMechE.
KTP Project: Wind Turbine Through Life Management
What is a KTP?
2. The academic institution – University of Strathclyde Wind Energy and Control Centre
Innovate UK run the KTP scheme to help businesses in the UK innovate through collaboration with academic experts. Three parties take part in the scheme:
Through the KTP development budget I learned new job specific and broad commercial skills. I gained GWO certification to allow me to work on operation wind turbines and fitted the load sensor system designed during the KTP. This gave me practical experience (climbing turbines!) I had not had before through academia and a renewed insight into the difficulties in operating and managing wind turbines. Installing load sensors allows me to work with real measured data and validate engineering models against these real-world measurements – something rarely available to academics working in the industry.
Being a KTP Associate
Current operating onshore wind turbines have been designed with a lifetime of 20 years. In the next few years, many sites will begin to reach this design life. Owners will then face the decision of repowering, decommissioning, or extending their life. To safely extend the site, lifetime analysis of the wind turbine fatigue life needs to be undertaken. The methodologies used to achieve this currently use engineering models of generic wind turbines to predict the load history of the wind turbines on site.
This KTP has developed a methodology which combines load measurement of a selection of turbines on a site with a tuned and validated engineering model of the specific turbines. This reduces the uncertainty in the fatigue analysis and allows wind farm owners to monitor the health of turbines reaching the end of life more closely. Actively measuring the loads on turbines for as much of their lifetime as possible allows for a far improved picture of the conditions experienced on site. This is more beneficial than solely relying on models. This data will prove valuable for informing end of life maintenance strategies and budgeting while also providing potential secondary benefits. These could be validation of performance enhancing controller tuning to either maximise AEP or turbine life.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/george-elderfield



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/advisory/analysis



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/analysis



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/analysis



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service/engineering-operations/life-extension



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/engineering-operations/life-extension



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/life-extension



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/advisory/analysis



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/life-at-natural-power/story/graeme-cook
It’s important to me to think that what I’m doing has a wider societal purpose (and that it’s ‘helping the birds’). I like to think that my tiny, wee contribution to the huge process of helping the uptake of renewables to happen, and thereby moving away from fossil fuels, is making the world a wee bit better for people (and birds), and that does make me feel good about what I do.
I’ve got a memory like a sieve and a tendency to think whatever I’m doing at present is really interesting, so, with that in mind, I’ll say the work that I’m doing at the moment on Codling Wind Park. Ornithological impacts are a huge factor influencing what a consent for this project will look like (and rightly so). It’s fascinating working with the project managers, designers and engineers, and the other, concurrently progressing Phase 1 projects in Ireland, plus the statutory regulators and other groups to help shape this project and its approach to its application.
My role at Natural Power has changed a lot over the years. From mostly being out surveying (on boats or up hills), to coordinating ornithological baseline surveys and associated reporting and now to the rather broad remit of providing ornithological advice across Natural Power’s offshore portfolio. So, at the moment, I spend a lot of time working with offshore wind farm developer to help them arrive at a final project design where ornithological impacts are considered to be at consentable levels. When I’m not doing that I may be overseeing the early-stage work for us to deliver the marine ornithology chapter of one of the east coast Scotwind project EIARs, getting my head round what some new guidance note, paper or modelling tool means in terms of assessment protocols, doing due diligence work, contributing to a workshop, or I’m talking to folk about what we should present in particular baseline reports for clients, etc.
It’s hard to picture a ‘typical’ day! It’s a mix of working from home or from the Stirling office, rotating around child care and whatever Kat reminds me to do [Kat, my wife, works for Natural Power too – and generally keeps me right with things]. I typically spend a lot of time on project work, coordinating with the wider offshore ornithology team about how we deliver project work, or in meetings with clients. Sometimes I shut myself off so I can try to figure out a problem,  how something works or read documents that it’s important for me to know; and then other times I’m doing tasks that involve lots of time talking with folk on teams as we work through project delivery. Also somewhere in a ‘typical’ day there would be a lot of coffee and either some running around or riding my bike (if time allows).
I suppose it’s kind of an obvious answer, but as an ornithologist I really like the birds. I like finding out about them and working towards minimising impacts on their populations while delivering necessary renewable energy projects.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/graeme-cook



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/life-at-natural-power/story/chris-pendlebury
There has been lots of interesting projects during my 12 years at Natural Power, so I will pick two ongoing ones. We are currently providing ornithology services for two ScotWind offshore wind projects: the Buchan and Mara Mhor sites. What I find most interesting is getting into the detail of the analysis and determining what this actually means in terms of impacts on specific populations for the project, so we can then base our advice on this.
My change in role is allowing me to do more of what I enjoy the most, and that is working with my Natural Power colleagues to deliver on projects for our clients. My background is in the provision of bird advice, having done this for wind projects for the best part of 20 years. The elements that I probably enjoy the most are discussing the projects we have with the team to come up with solutions for our clients.
My role at natural power has changed recently to become more offshore focused as I take on the role of Director of Offshore Planning and Environment. This means I will now be responsible for the whole offshore P&E team, as well as maintaining responsibility for the Geospatial and International Environmental Advisory teams. Overall my role involves working with our global team to deliver on our projects.
If I am heading into the Stirling office then the day starts with a cycle. I do like to plan what I’ll be doing for the day over a cup of coffee, and get everything prepared for any meetings I have coming up. The day is then likely to involve working with the team either on one of our client projects, talking to clients about current or upcoming projects, or working on an element of strategic planning for the department. As you would expect, no day is the same as another, and I like this variation.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/chris-pendlebury



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/engineering-operations/service-and-repair



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/service-and-repair



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/mentions-legales/politique-confidentialite



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/natural-power-kicks-off-construction-at-benbrack-wind-farm-for-red-rock-power



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/eolien-terrestre



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/engineering-service



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/engineering-and-design



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/a-propos/camille-guillemette



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/service-and-repair



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/engineering-operations/inspections



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/service/inspections



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/service/inspections



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/service/inspections



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/policies/health-and-safety-policy



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/policies/gender-pay-report
For this year's report on gender pay, please download the below PDF.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/projects/rosamond-central-solar-project



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/life-at-natural-power/story/jai-lawless
My role requires me to work to the highest safety and environmental standards and being a member of the health and safety committee has allowed me to have a better understanding of these matters.
The five gearbox exchanges I’ve been involved with at Brockloch Rig have been the most interesting projects I’ve worked on. It’s essential life extension work and allows the turbines to continue running up until the decommission date.
The life extension work on-site consists of the monitoring and upgrading of main components that will guarantee the availability and production of the turbines to run, in this case, up until 2027. Carrying out these gearbox exchanges has given me a great sense of achievement, and myself and the team on-site have ensured that they were carried out to the best of our ability. Going forward, it’s essential that all inspections are carried out regularly to ensure the structural stability of the turbine is sound and that all environmental conditions are covered.
I got into this role when I was 18, which was after I finished high school. I attended college and undertook a 27-week German qualified wind turbine technician course (BZEE). It allowed me to immerse myself in the industry and pick up a passion that I still hold to this day. I passed the course and got a job with a company called Windtex Engineering.
I was contracting across the UK on multiple platforms for just under four years. It was at this point I started contracting for Natural Power at Crystal Rig wind farm, and shortly after this I got offered a full-time position. I spent 18 months gaining as much knowledge as I could on the Nordex and Siemens machines at Crystal Rig and made strong relationships across the company. I then left Natural Power to go travelling, but after a couple of months, I was eager to get back and re-join the company. In 2018, that opportunity came: I was positioned at Brockloch rig, and I haven’t looked back. I thrive in my role and can see a long and happy future with Natural Power.
I need to have detailed knowledge of Nordtank wind turbines, as well as turbines from other suppliers, which supports Natural Power's multibrand business. I perform scheduled maintenance throughout the year and carry out daily fault-finding tasks. I always make sure that service targets are met and carried out, so the turbines are maintained to the highest standards. This results in less downtime and more production.
I enjoy the responsibility of my role at Brockloch Rig. Recently, I have been given the opportunity to lead the gearbox exchanges on site, which has given me a great sense of leadership. Every day at site is different and provides new challenges. I look forward to the future at Brockloch Rig and all that entails with the repowering project.
My biggest achievement at work has been securing a position that I love at a well-organised site surrounded by likeminded technicians. I also recently achieved an award on the ‘Naturally Powerful’ employee recognition scheme, for championing our values of ‘Leadership & Accountability’ and ‘Teamwork & Collaboration’. This was a hugely proud moment, as these values are extremely important to me and the company.
My typical day consists of monitoring 36 turbines and making sure they’re efficiently running to meet the sites targeted output. When we’re running a service campaign, we prioritise faulted turbines. We’ll attend the faulted turbine and get it into an operational state then proceed to carry out the service. We always try and complete as many snagging issues as we can during the service.
On a normal day, when we’re not carrying out the service campaign, we prioritise faults in order of how quickly we can deal with them, and this allows higher production across site. Once the site is clear of faults, we can proceed with any unplanned maintenance or retrofits.
I also work alongside other technicians and have daily contact with supervisors and management. I always try and create the best relationship I can [with people], whether it be with technicians or clients.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/life-at-natural-power/story/jai-lawless



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/jai-lawless



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/jai-lawless



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/life-at-natural-power/story/chad-homouth
I am still in the early stages of my journey at Natural Power, so hopefully some of my biggest achievements lie ahead. Natural Power is an independent engineer on multiple wind projects, and one recent accomplishment that I am proud of is being part of a team that was able to develop and execute a plan to perform remote site visits on these projects. I was introduced to a fellow colleague with expertise in drone data-collection, and we were able to utilize his skillset to collect construction data using a drone at a time when the normal site visit participant was unable to access the site due to COVID-19 related travel restrictions.
One might say that I was a little obsessed with ping-pong growing up, and I developed into a pretty formidable opponent. I wouldn’t say that I’m quite to the level of some of the elite players like Forrest Gump, but I think I might be able to give him a run for his money…
It is engaging to interact with such a wide variety of project contributors including investors, developers, contractors and other consultants. I get exposure to a wide range of wind and solar project related topics, and I am learning new things daily, simply by working alongside people with different areas of expertise. I think the role of independent engineer or technical advisor is also a good fit for me because it involves digging into the finer details of project documents, and I enjoy the high level of detail required.
I started out my career working as a design engineer for an engineering consultant in the renewables industry. I learned through this experience that there was a lot of development and investment taking place in the wind industry, and I wanted to align more of my time with this opportunity. I was able to build a technical skillset related to design of wind turbine foundations in my previous position. When the opportunity with Natural Power arose, I was excited to utilize my previous experience and get more exposure to different levels of wind project development and exposure to solar projects.
A typical day for me involves reviewing civil related technical design or construction documentation for wind and solar projects. It is common for me to prepare reports summarizing the information reviewed during the due diligence process to highlight key features and potential risks. Sometimes I participate on calls with clients and act as the subject matter expert for civil related topics.
I am primarily responsible for reviewing civil engineering aspects of wind and solar projects. As a member of the advisory services team, I work with a team of engineers and specialists reviewing project documentation and identifying risks for potential lenders or buyers. I have also gained experience reviewing engineering, procurement, and construction (“EPC”) contracts for wind projects. Part of my role involves performing site visits at wind projects during construction to observe construction activities and engage with key project participants in order to identify technical or contractual risks associated with the project.
I am currently working on a wind project where Natural Power is the independent engineer, and concrete towers support the turbines. This is a new concept to the US wind market as steel tower support almost all of the turbines erected to date. We need to consider a whole new set of risks and design considerations for projects with concrete towers, and it has been exciting to learn some of these nuances.
Do you have any hidden talents?


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/chad-homouth



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/life-at-natural-power/story/kerry-schmidt
What advice would you give to future generations of women in the indusrty?
What are your future aspirations in your career?
To women in general I would say to support and believe in one another! Overall, communication is key to all solid working and personal relationships.
My role is in a bit of a transition at the moment. Prior to several months ago, as the Finance Manager for NPC US, I was solely responsible for all financial matters (cash management, invoicing, financial statements, budgets, etc.), payroll/HR, project approvals and overseeing the office from an Administrative standpoint. I still am managing most of these tasks, except for the office administration.
What attracted you to this role?
I enjoy the diversity as my tasks are ever changing. Additionally, and this is truly genuine, I work with some pretty awesome folks and have made some amazing friends across the globe!
Due to our rapid growth, my position is in a bit of a transition. At this po int I con easily soy that I want to see NPC US (and the entire company) continue to grow, be port of the success and to develop my role around the growth. It's been rather exciting to see the US team grow from 5 employees, residing in a small office, to fast forward to today, 30+ employees across several offices. These ore most definitely exciting times at Natural Power!
Due to my wide variety of duties, my days fluctuate quite a bit. They're never the same and multi-tasking is crucial. There is a never a dull moment or day in the finance department!
I've been with NPC US for nine years this month. Initially two of my friends worked at NPC and spoke highly about both the company and Jim Adams. Their input, the diversity of the role and the fact that I would be the first person in this position, were all attractive factors to me.
Initially when I started working at NPC, there was very little, if anything, in place due to our size and length of existence. I was tasked with setting up all of the financial recordkeeping, administration of benefits, procedures, etc. Loter on, I was tasked with implementing IFS in the US office and became the IFS Expert User for all aspects of IFS. It's been great to be so closely involved with the US growth straight from the very early days.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/kerry-schmidt



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/bright-future-as-natural-power-appoints-principal-solar-engineer
Dan has more than a decade of professional experience in the solar industry, including roles at a module supplier, a large solar developer and most recently at a technical consultancy where he led independent engineering and owner’s engineering diligence of utility-scale PV projects and C&I portfolios for financial transactions.
On joining the team, Dan said: “I’m delighted to be joining Natural Power. Natural Power’s historical experience in the wind industry, and the talented team of solar experts that have been assembled, has put us in a position to capitalize on the growth of the solar market in North America. I am looking forward to working with this growing team and providing actionable advice for our clients to help them succeed.”
21 May 2020 .
The business has a proven reputation and track record of working with clients to deliver solar projects from site finding and feasibility studies through permitting and construction. In-house experts on grid, planning, ecology, human use considerations, ground conditions and flood risk assessment work seamlessly to identify sites with the lowest associated risk in terms of consent and build conditions. Find out more at
here.
Dan is based at Natural Power’s Denver office and can be reached on
Natural Power has appointed Dr Vardaan (Dan) Chawla as Principal Solar Engineer in North America. He adds extensive experience with solar technology and as an independent engineer of record on numerous utility-scale solar projects.
He is an expert on solar technology, resource and energy generation modeling, site evaluation, and storage technology. He holds a Bachelor of Science in Materials Science & Engineering from Georgia Institute of Technology and a Master of Science and Doctorate in Materials Science & Engineering from Stanford University.
During 2019, Natural Power reviewed 2.2GW across more than 100 planned or operating solar projects on behalf of clients in the USA. Delivering work for major sponsors, and tax and equity investors, Natural Power also continues to support due diligence on stand-alone storage facilities in major markets across North America.
danch@naturalpower.com
Jim Adams, President of Natural Power in North America, said: “We’re delighted to welcome Dan to the team. He brings with him extraordinary technical expertise and industry knowledge so as the US solar industry gears up for significant growth, the expansion of our team ensures we are well qualified to serve as independent engineer of record on an increasing volume of wind, solar and storage projects simultaneously.”


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/bright-future-as-natural-power-appoints-principal-solar-engineer



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/bright-future-as-natural-power-appoints-principal-solar-engineer



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/bright-future-as-natural-power-appoints-principal-solar-engineer



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/bright-future-as-natural-power-appoints-principal-solar-engineer



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/actualite/bright-future-as-natural-power-appoints-principal-solar-engineer



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/natural-power-svp-to-co-chair-wind-resource-conference
Abstract submissions are due by 11:59 PM on Thursday, April 30.
Holly Burnett PE, Senior Vice President at Natural Power, a leading renewable energy consultancy and service provider, is set to co-chair the AWEA Wind Resource & Project Energy Assessment Conference 2020 which takes please on September 29 – 30 in Minneapolis, MN. Holly will co-chair the event with Dr. Chris Ziesler, Global Director at Energy Services Renewables UL LLC.
• Offshore resource assessment
• Turbine suitability
• Remote sensing
• Time series energy modeling
Holly said: “The momentum behind the US wind industry is strong, and planning for new projects is underway amidst the backdrop of record levels of wind farm construction, with more wind in operation than ever before. It is more important than event that we [safely] get together as an industry and share knowledge and best practices in order to improve pre-construction estimates as well as plant operations. This annual event is also a great time to catch up with peers and celebrate our collective successes as well as chart the future paths of innovation and cooperation. We look forward to continuing the tradition of this vital, informative and collaborative conference.”
This technical event is the only one of its kind in North America. Attendees will participate in targeted networking sessions, explore the industry’s needs through presentations on new state-of-the-art techniques and technologies. As the conference concludes, attendees should expect to gain critical insight into the key matters by which the industry makes energy predictions.
• Operational assessments and repowering
To submit an abstract, visit
https://www.abstractscorecard.com/cfp/submit/login.asp?EventKey=EARYKGOZ
This year’s topics include:
• Climatology and extreme events
• Turbine interaction effects (blockage)
The AWEA Wind Resource & Project Energy Assessment Conference is the nexus point for everything concerning wind farm production, the place where meteorologists and engineers highlight recent advances and debate the critical issues affecting wind resource assessment.
• Wind flow modeling
Attendees want to hear from experts and thought leaders who have innovative and disruptive ideas to share. It’s your chance to help us deliver an engaging program by proposing ideas that challenge us and solutions that help move the industry forward.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/actualite/natural-power-svp-to-co-chair-wind-resource-conference



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/natural-power-svp-to-co-chair-wind-resource-conference



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/natural-power-svp-to-co-chair-wind-resource-conference



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/natural-power-svp-to-co-chair-wind-resource-conference



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/natural-power-svp-to-co-chair-wind-resource-conference



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/eolien-en-mer-et-cables-dinterconnexion



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/natural-power-approved-as-a-nyserda-flextech-consultant-in-new-york



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/natural-power-approved-as-a-nyserda-flextech-consultant-in-new-york



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/actualite/natural-power-approved-as-a-nyserda-flextech-consultant-in-new-york
. Conseils


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/energy-storage



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/insight/unlocking-the-value-of-your-project-in-an-uncertain-world
Read the
authored by our very own Iain Dinwoodie and Hannah Staab.
PES article
9 Dec 2022 .
As we come to the end of a turbulent year for the energy sector, there can be little doubt that renewable energy developers, owners and investors will continue to face high levels of volatility and uncertainty. This creates different challenges for development-stage projects and operational assets, but also represents an opportunity to unlock new value. More and more projects are seeking to complement basic PPAs with merchant trading and additional revenue streams such as balancing, ancillary services and power-to-X.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/insight/unlocking-the-value-of-your-project-in-an-uncertain-world



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/perspective/unlocking-the-value-of-your-project-in-an-uncertain-world



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/insight/climate-change-and-severe-weather-series-2-increased-solar-project-flood-risk
Designing resilient solar projects to withstand catastrophic flooding events is a delicate balance to manage. Designs must meet or exceed code requirements, maintain structural integrity, and minimize both project capital costs and operating expenses. A well-balanced project design is one that maximizes use of the buildable land while avoiding costly impacts from flood damage during the operational period. The latter can be achieved by constructing solar arrays outside of expected flood areas or incorporating a structural design with adequate freeboard and structural strength to survive extreme flood events.
19 Dec 2022 .
Read more here.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/insight/climate-change-and-severe-weather-series-2-increased-solar-project-flood-risk



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/perspective/climate-change-and-severe-weather-series-2-increased-solar-project-flood-risk



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/insight/balancing-bat-preservation-and-wind-energy-production-with-echosense
A solution to this is smart curtailment, a strategy that considers real-time bat activity and weather conditions to maximize energy production when bats are not present or there is a low level of risk. One type of smart curtailment relies on sensor-based technology like an acoustic detector to monitor for bats.
In 2020 and 2021, we tested the effectiveness of the
system. To see the results of this study, which were shared at Renewable Energy Wildlife Institute conference in 2022,
see the presentation
here...
Curtailment of wind turbines during low wind speeds (i.e., below a set cut-in speed) is a leading solution in the reduction of bat fatalities caused by collision with turbines. This approach, referred to as blanket curtailment, has been found to significantly decrease fatalities up to 93%. In the U.S., concerns for impacts to federally listed species often result in recommended blanket curtailment every night during the fall migratory period and sometimes during the spring and summer months. Although blanket curtailment has been shown to decrease bat fatalities, it also results in a loss of energy production that is concerning to industry.
Read more about


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/insight/balancing-bat-preservation-and-wind-energy-production-with-echosense



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/perspective/balancing-bat-preservation-and-wind-energy-production-with-echosense



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/insight/from-project-to-portfolio
8 Nov 2022 .
From project to portfolio - white paper
To find out more click here:
Notable deals included Hanwha Solutions’ €727m acquisition of RES France, Ørsted’s €684m acquisition of Brookfield Renewable’s Irish and UK business, and Macquarie’s €2.5bn acquisition of Reden Solar. But what is driving this deal frenzy? And are the eye-watering sums paid by investors for early-stage development pipelines really justified?
What’s driving deals?


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/insight/from-project-to-portfolio



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/perspective/from-project-to-portfolio



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/perspective/is-your-project-underperformance-caused-by-trackers



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/solar-and-energy-storage-inspections



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/projects/de-risk-utility-scale-energy-storage



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/service/planning-permitting-and-environment



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/policies/supplier



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/policies/gender-pay-report



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/policies/health-and-safety-policy



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/policies/csr-policy
This Statement sets out our principles in dealing with our clients, suppliers and local communities, to develop relationships that support our goal to reduce our utilities, transport and other business usages, and the effects of our procurement activities, to minimise our carbon footprint and environmental impact.
The effectiveness of the Policy Statement will be monitored and reviewed at least annually by the Directors to ensure the Company’s continuing compliance with any relevant legislation, to meet new business requirements and to identify areas in need of improvement.
Manage and dispose of all waste in a responsible manner
Listen to our stakeholders to improve the products and services we offer
Introduction
This Statement should be read in conjunction with our Corporate Governance Code of Conduct.
Guarantee company vehicles are regularly serviced, including the verification of emission levels and economical usage of fuel
Ensure that water is used efficiently
Guarantee that our advertising and documentation about the business and its activities are clear, informative, legal, decent, honest and truthful
Use local suppliers wherever appropriate
Protect the environment by striving to prevent or minimise our contribution to pollution of land, air, and water
Acknowledge the problem and deal with it in the event we don’t meet expectations
Monitor and continuously improve our environmental performance
Work with like-minded suppliers who take steps to minimise their environmental impact
Pay our commitments on time, excepting exceptional circumstances
Local Community
Complete volunteer work as part of community activities
Support local schools
Source and buy locally to save fuel costs wherever possible
Protection of the environment in which we live and operate is part of Natural Power’s mission and values, and we consider it to be sound business practice. Care for the environment is one of our key responsibilities and an important part of the way in which we do business.
Ensure that all lights and equipment are switched off when not required
This Statement details how Natural Power takes account of the economic, social and environmental impact of the way it operates as a business. By demonstrating our commitment to Corporate Social Responsibility, we aim to align our business values, purpose and strategy with the needs of our clients, whilst embedding responsible and ethical behaviours in everything we do.
Work with and support local and national charities
Provide training for our staff to ensure we all work in accordance with this policy statement and within an environmentally aware culture
The operational and ultimate responsibility for the commitment to our Corporate Social Responsibility principles lies with the Directors of Natural Power, but every employee is expected to give their full cooperation to the above principles in their activities at work. All consultants and visitors are expected to adhere to these same principles.
Promote the use of scrap paper for drafts and notes
To ensure that Natural Power achieves this, we shall drive behaviours to:
Reduce our transportation requirements wherever possible, promoting the use of public transport and remote conferencing facilities where appropriate
Regularly communicate our environmental performance to our employees and other significant stakeholders
Seek to keep wastage to a minimum and maximise the efficient use of materials and resources
The nature of our work as a consultancy means we have minimal environmental impact from our own activities, but a high degree of influence through our advisory services. We consider environmental issues in all the professional services we provide and endeavour to reduce our environmental impact to the absolute minimum.
Benchmark and evaluate what we do to continuously improve our offering to the marketplace
Clients
We commit to dealing with our suppliers in a similarly responsible, open and fair manner, and shall:
Print in mono and double sided as standard
The communities we work within are key to our success, and we will champion the building of local relationships to develop opportunities to:
Recycle the maximum percentage of waste (shredding all business documentation)
Source recycled materials wherever possible
Undertake voluntary business advisory services via professional bodies
As a company, we commit that we shall:
To filfil our commitment to dealing responsibly, openly and fairly with all clients and potential clients we shall:
Never employ pressure selling techniques
Environment
Be open and honest about our products and services, including what we do to be socially responsible
Never expect a discount to be offered where it may have a detrimental effect on the suppliers’ business
Comply with all relevant environmental legislation, regulations and approved codes of practice
Develop our management processes to ensure that environmental factors are considered during planning and implementation


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/service/ingenierie/environnement-et-planning



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/echosense-deployment-accelerates-to-tackle-wind-production-challenges-as-new-bats-become-endangered



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/echosense-deployment-accelerates-to-tackle-wind-production-challenges-as-new-bats-become-endangered



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/echosense-deployment-accelerates-to-tackle-wind-production-challenges-as-new-bats-become-endangered



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/about/danielle-burns



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/services-geotechniques



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/geotechnical-services



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/solaire-photovoltaique



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/solar



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/solaire



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/expertise/solaire



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/solar



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/construction



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/district-heat-network-dhn-design
Stoke-on-Trent City Council
Helping Stoke-on-Trent Council deliver its pioneering district heating network
Work started on Stoke-on-Trent’s pioneering £52 million district heat network (DHN) back in September 2017. The Government-backed scheme is expected to significantly cut carbon emissions and improve air quality. It does this using underground pipes to distribute heat across the Stoke city area and removing the need for individual building boilers.
Determined the heat demand of buildings on the network and the loads experienced at the energy centre;
Natural Power has the knowledge, resources and experience to provide a complete end to end solution to deliver district heating networks. We work on initial environmental assessments right through to construction, completion and commissioning.
​Calculated heat losses from heat network pipes and pumping costs at different stages of the delivery.
District Heat Network (DHN) Design Project | Natural Power
The Stoke DEPO framework tender competition resulted in Natural Power being awarded a three-year contract to provide detailed mechanical and electrical designs of the Stoke-on-Trent DHN.
The specific challenges of this project and the client’s requirements called for a strong, multidisciplinary team. We collaborated with Hydraulic Analysis Limited and FVB Limited to provide the council with best in class design advice.
We also:
​Provided functional and non-functional specification of the energy centre, including planning and permitting;
The council is installing the core components of the DHN and will extend the network over the coming years. This will allow more buildings to connect to the network for affordable, low carbon and low maintenance heating and hot water.
We provided mechanical and electrical design(s) of an efficient and cost effective DHN scheme, including  heat generation systems, a heat distribution network, supplying customers with heat (substations, HIUs), and adapting the existing heating systems.
Simulated and verified design(s) against supply and demand balancing scenarios to ensure the delivery of a smart system;


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/district-heat-network-dhn-design



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/portfolio-due-diligence
Refinancing a mixed technology portfolio – evaluating risks and optimisation potential
Natural Power went on to advise Cubico in the sale of a minority stake of the portfolio to GLIL Infrastructure, which is a £1.8 billion infrastructure fund backed by Northern LGPS and Local Pensions Partnership.
Applying learnings from onshore wind to battery energy storage systems
Blyth, Northumberland, England
11 Mar 2020
Björkvattnet wind farm (‘BJV’)
Natural Power carried out technical due diligence to support the refinancing of one of the UK’s largest renewable energy portfolios.
200 MW
24 Feb 2020
Beinn an Tuirc wind farm (Phase 3)
A consortium of international banks successfully refinanced the portfolio. It was also a finalist at the 2019 British Renewable Energy Awards, which celebrates projects that have accelerated the deployment of renewables in the UK.
Cubico Sustainable Investments
AWEA Wind Project O&M and Safety Conference 2020
Jämtland County, Sweden
Environment Compliance & Construction
Blyth offshore wind farm decommissioning
Transaction value of £272m. This is one of the largest portfolio financings closed in the UK market in 2019.
Technical Due Diligence | Renewables Portfolio | Natural Power
£272m
200 MW portfolio that includes six wind farms and 11 solar farms.
We delivered a full review of permitting, grid and contracts, as well as assessing the operational performance of all 17 assets. Using operational data from the wind and solar farms, we provided a long-term energy yield estimate, which is the amount of energy generated by the sites in a typical year, for each site. It can be beneficial to group wind and solar projects within the same portfolio, as it reduces the year on year variability of portfolio energy generation and therefore provides more stable revenue. Our analysis showed that you can compensate for a particularly low wind speed year through higher than average sunniness. It also quantified how much more confident you can be in the average annual energy output of the portfolio, compared to looking at each individual wind and solar farm in isolation.
Kintyre Peninsula, Argyll and Bute, Scotland


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/portfolio-due-diligence



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/awea-wind-project-om-and-safety-conference-2020
2:30 PM – 3:30 PM (Moderating)
Jim Adams, President of North American Operations at Natural Power, will be involved with two sessions at the conference:
Shifting Winds for Wind Project Operations – An Owner’s Perspective
What does this mean for operations during the 2020s? Larger turbines, advances in storage and predictive maintenance are the types of technology trends that have the potential, if done right, to create more efficiencies and more reliable energy. A successful wind project requires more than top-notch technology; its most important asset are the people who maintain the projects.
Evolving Methods for Proactive Blade Maintenance
In the United States, there are now more than 56, 000 wind turbines with a combined capacity of 100 gigawatts (GW) of wind energy in the ground, and 22 GW expected offshore by 2030.  This impressive growth, coupled with leaps in technology, has renewable energy companies looking at their operating assets for profits.
24 Feb 2020 .
. Advisory
The AWEA Operations & Maintenance and Safety Conference is where the industry comes together to recognize unique challenges and identify solutions in four main sectors: health and safety, O&M, workforce training and development, and quality assurance. Find out more about the conference, register to attend and plan your visit
Natural Power will be at AWEA Wind Project O&M and Safety Conference which takes place at the Hotel Del Corondo, California, on February 26 and 27, 2020.
: Thursday, February 27, 3:45 PM – 5:00 PM (Speaking)
If you’d like to pre-arrange a meeting with the team, please contact
: Thursday, February 27
Come and say hello at booth #404.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/awea-wind-project-om-and-safety-conference-2020



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/awea-wind-project-om-and-safety-conference-2020



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/awea-wind-project-om-and-safety-conference-2020



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/actualite/awea-wind-project-om-and-safety-conference-2020
The AWEA Operations & Maintenance and Safety Conference is where the industry comes together to recognize unique challenges and identify solutions in four main sectors: health and safety, O&M, workforce training and development, and quality assurance. Find out more about the conference, register to attend and plan your visit
. Consultatif


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/awea-wind-project-om-and-safety-conference-2020



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/bjorkvattnet-wind-farm-bjv
39%
Infravia invests in a 175 MW onshore wind farm in Sweden with GE renewable energy to deliver Cypress turbines
Björkvattnet Vind AB
21
Working with local communities and authorities to build wind farms successfully
We were appointed as the owner’s engineer to act on behalf of the project owner to oversee stakeholder and public engagement; provide interface management; oversee and co-ordinate the balance of plant (BOP), turbine supply agreements (TSA) and grid contracts and contractors; identify and mitigate risk to the programme and budget; monitor control and environmental issues; pre-commencement health and safety planning and the creation and implementation of the Control Plan to secure the commencement certificate.
Björkvattnet Wind Farm | Wind Energy Project | Natural Power
The annual electricity output will land between 500 and 600 GWh with a capacity factor ranging between 32% and 39%.
The electricity from 21 of the 33 turbines is sold to Google via a private corporate purchase agreement based on merchant prices of the electricity.
North Sea
Due to negative wind farm experiences in the region, the environmental department of the Länsstyrelsen (municipality) took a keen interest in BJV, so we had to build a relationship with them. Early in the project, they told us that they wanted to hold all dialogue and communication in Swedish. By engaging a prominent local partner, Ecogain, who specialised in the topics and were able to provide seamless communication and documentation in Swedish, we were able to work with Länsstyrelsen.
We also built relationships with local people. We liaised with Sami people, who are indigenous people in the area and are protected by rights and responsibilities, so we communicated with and supported them. Their traditional heritage is heavily invested in reindeer grazing and herding, and the site area is subject to reindeer movements. We also worked with people in the two local villages that are close to the site. We used their community halls to hold monthly meetings and public presentations to keep them updated with project developments. BJV also set up a website to post information about the project, gather feedback, and give us a place to post routine construction updates.
Inch Cape offshore Wind Farm
By working with local people and authorities and using local partners to help with establishing positive communications, the client was reassured that Natural Power could successfully work on the project.
19 May 2020
Natural Power’s collaborative approach, combined with its advanced knowledge of health and safety principles, allowed us to deliver the project smoothly and to the satisfaction of the client and local stakeholders.
The work that we did on the project was designed to reflect the location and the culture that we were working in. We engaged with local partners to ensure specialist knowledge and overcome any potential language barrier. We worked with Ecogain, who were the environmental clerk of works; Bureau Veritas, who were the Bas-P and KA; and Wind Sweden, who were the resident engineers.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/bjorkvattnet-wind-farm-bjv



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/inch-cape-offshore-wind-farm
Natural Power carried out a wide range of consent services for our client to help with the consenting process on this offshore windfarm. We first worked on this wind farm in 2013 to provide EIA coordination and management for the offshore submission for this Scottish offshore wind farm. In 2017, we provided EIA services for a revised development for both the 2018 on and offshore applications. We then worked on this project for both post-application and post-consent support.
Both 2013 and revised 2018 application consented.
Position: Project environment and consents manager
Consenting and compliance
784 MW
Client testimonial
We acted as the lead technical advisor for benthic, marine mammal and fish for the 2013 and 2018 application and commercial fisheries for the 2018 application. We carried out benthic, fish and bird and marine mammal surveys and fisheries stakeholder consultation, and we produced benthic, marine mammal, natural fish and commercial fisheries scoping and EIA chapters. We also completed the habitat regulations assessment (HRA) for marine mammals and migratory fish, and we reviewed the licence conditions for the consented project and provided advice on updating these.
Retained on project since 2011.
Inch Cape Offshore Wind Farm Project | Natural Power
Our input meant that both the 2013 and 2018 applications were consented for this project.
“Through the wide range of services Natural Power has provided the project over the years they have always provided excellent support and advice. This has helped the project navigate around some difficult consenting and technical situations and their input and advice has been greatly appreciated over the years.”
Providing ongoing consent services for a wind farm
2013 and 2018
Red Rock Power Ltd (previously Repsol)
Natural Power team members were seconded as EIA consultants on the developer’s team for both applications. They led the coordination of the EIA offshore application in 2013 and 2018, and the onshore application in 2018. They also worked with engineering and technical specialists to make sure that project designs were suitable and consentable, and they liaised with Marine Scotland and key consultees, such as local planning authorities, the fishing industry and key stakeholders.
Name: Andrew Blyth
Company: Red Rock Power
Marine ecology and assessment
Fisheries liaison services
784 MW consented.
Since 2011


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/inch-cape-offshore-wind-farm



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/yield-assessment-experience-2019
Natural Power collaborated with its client base to deliver the analyses, and the results were used to inform several decisions.
We undertook a full assessment of losses and degradation to define net production figures, with any additional risks or areas for further investigation highlighted on a per project basis.
The results associated with operational assets allowed our client base to review and compare the results with pre-construction assumptions. The results also showed potential performance issues and informed both proactive and reactive maintenance planning.
For pre-construction projects, our clients used the bankable results to progress project finance. The results also supported the definition of the final turbine or PV technology and layout at construction phase.
Pre-construction assessment (solar)
80+ GW of analysis services delivered globally, spanning over 40 countries and six continents.
Over 25 years’ experience delivering marking leading analysis services to inform project development, finance and operational management.
Post construction assessments (wind)
A monthly breakdown of the P50 forecast was finalised to consider seasonality, and the defined energy yield model considered the relevant nearby and horizon shading and, where relevant, complex terrain effects.
80+ GW
The team used SCADA data recorded by all turbines on a per site basis for each assessment, and monthly production reports were also reviewed.
Each solar analysis used PVsyst software combined with bespoke in-house tools to inform yield estimates. It included a survey of commonly used solar resource databases to determine the most appropriate long-term dataset to be considered.
What was the aim of the project?
25 years’
We undertook a detailed review of alarm logs and associated categorisations to determine any significant downtime events, and operational power curves were generated following a filtering process accounting for downtime and unrepresentative performance. We quantified site electrical losses and reapplied them as a secondary loss.
Natural Power assessed the long-term performance of operational solar assets on the basis of historic production, correlated with long-term solar reference data.
An operational site performance model was then created to inform the calculation of the net P50 figure, with any further appropriate secondary losses applied, ahead of a full uncertainty assessment.
Various
We conducted shear and turbulence intensity calculations before performing wind flow modelling. We did this using either a linear flow model, CFD model or mesoscale product. This informed gross energy yield calculations for the specific turbine configurations.
Pre-construction assessments (wind)
For each analysis, our analysts used on-site data collected from masts or remote sensing devices to determine the local wind regime within the given site boundary. We then adjusted the data to a selected reference dataset to define the long-term wind climate in the region.
Post construction assessments (solar)
We derived an operational site performance model to inform the calculation of the revised P50 figure, including an assessment of future losses, degradation and uncertainties.
The projects assessed by Natural Power ranged from commercial rooftop sites to 100MW+ ground-mounted projects. A significant number of these featured bifacial modules
In 2019, Natural Power increased its energy yield analysis experience. Using our in-house team of over 20 energy analysts, we delivered over 380 analyses for our clients. This covered both pre-construction and operational assets in over 25 countries.
We then performed a full losses and uncertainties assessment, including consideration of the blockage effect, to inform net production figures.
Yield analysis experience, 2019
In cases where we delivered the energy yield analyses on behalf of banks and financial institutions, the results informed wider investment and divestment decision making.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/yield-assessment-experience-2019



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/blyth-offshore-wind-farm-decommissioning
After getting consent for the work, Natural Power carried out fisheries liaison before and during the decommissioning works to make sure there were no delays to the project occurred due to interactions with local fishing activities.
Through close liaison with the client and marine stakeholders, such as The Crown Estate and the Marine Management Organisation, we were able to submit the application on time.
E.ON UK Renewables Ltd
First consent for decommissioning of a wind farm and associated infrastructure achieved.
We supported the decommissioning of the first offshore turbines constructed in the UK by working with stakeholders to secure the necessary permitting for the works to take place. We also carried out fisheries liaison services to ensure that there were no delays to the decommissioning works due to fishing activities
On budget
Due diligence and advisory services 2019
We secured the Marine Licence in a timely manner, which allowed the decommissioning work to start as scheduled. The turbines and associated infrastructure were fully decommissioned in the summer of 2019. Once completed, the client was able to add to their decommissioning experience and portfolios.
All services were delivered within the client’s budget.
Delivered
Blyth Offshore Wind Farm Decommissioning | Natural Power
Achieved
Works were delivered within client’s timescales.
We made sure there were no delays caused by left fishing equipment in the area. We achieved this through liaison with local fishermen and negotiating cooperation agreements whereby fishermen agreed to remove their fishing gear from the works area. Negotiations were successful, and both fishermen and E.ON were happy with the outcome.
Supporting the first full decommissioning of a wind farm in the UK
This was the first full decommissioning of a wind farm in the UK. We acted as an advisor by providing intelligent solutions and cost-effective solutions to move the project forward. We prepared and produced the marine licence application documentation for the project, including the marine environmental assessment. We also provided stakeholder consultation services for the decommissioning works for two turbines and their transmission infrastructure.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/blyth-offshore-wind-farm-decommissioning



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/due-diligence-and-advisory-services-2019
Advisory team provides due diligence and advisory services to over 20 GW of projects
Merger and acquisition (M&A) transactions, often containing a mixture of operating, pipeline and pre-construction assets, where Natural Power performed technical due diligence duties on behalf of the acquirer or on behalf of the vendor.
Dedicated team of over 80 advisors with Natural Power’s global business.
Natural Power’s global advisory team delivered a portfolio of due diligence services to a global client base to inform a number of transaction and advisory scenarios throughout the course of 2019, including:
Assisted and supported clients with investment decisions relating to market entry, design and technology optimisation, life extension analysis, and OPEX optimisation and route to market.
80
In 2019, Natural Power’s in-house team of over 80 advisors collectively delivered due diligence and advisory services to inform investment and divestment decision making. This included over 160 projects and portfolios spanning 25 countries in Europe, the Americas, Asia, Africa and Oceania. We delivered market-leading services for a portfolio of over 20 GW of projects.
70% of projects considered in 2019 were in development, while the remaining 30% were operational.
70%
Natural Power delivered these advisory services throughout all stages of the transaction cycle and across a number of energy sectors. This included initial risk assessment and reporting in early transaction stages and comprehensive reporting for credit committee or data room presentation at final bid stage or financial close.
Storage
20 GW
20 GW of projects considered spanning 25 countries in 2019.
The results presented informed a number of investment and divestment decision making processes, while identifying specific project factors that required attention, in addition to highlighting project-specific risks and benefits
Throughout delivery, we formed effective working relationships with client’s legal, commercial and advisory teams to ensure all findings presented were collective, joined up and presented in the context of the individual projects themselves.
Natural Power collaborated with several banks, financial institutions, owner operators and developers together with legal and financial advisors to deliver these services.
Project finance debt transactions, where we fulfilled the duties of lender’s or owner’s independent engineers/technical advisors, from pre-finance technical due diligence to project commissioning and handover.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/due-diligence-and-advisory-services-2019



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/applying-learnings-from-onshore-wind-to-battery-energy-storage-systems
Read more…
11 Mar 2020 .
. Onshore
Utility-scale battery energy storage systems (BESS) are becoming a more common feature of the UK electricity network for the purpose of frequency regulation and balancing. Alistair Parlett, Head of asset management at Natural Power explore the growing interest in the integration of storage systems with renewable technologies such as wind and solar in the white paper below.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/actualite/applying-learnings-from-onshore-wind-to-battery-energy-storage-systems
. Terrestre


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/fr/actualites/applying-learnings-from-onshore-wind-to-battery-energy-storage-systems



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/applying-learnings-from-onshore-wind-to-battery-energy-storage-systems



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/applying-learnings-from-onshore-wind-to-battery-energy-storage-systems



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/applying-learnings-from-onshore-wind-to-battery-energy-storage-systems



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/beinn-an-tuirc-wind-farm-phase-3
Groundwater level monitoring
Soil infiltration testing
The site has consent for 18 turbines.
The site investigation comprised the following elements:
126m
Geotechnical laboratory testing and reporting.
Borehole drilling (25 locations)
50MW
Carrying out successful site investigation services in remote Scottish peninsula
The project is an extension to the existing Beinn an Tuirc (BAT) wind farm. The site is located within a remote upland area of commercial forestry, approximately 10km north of Campbeltown, on the Kintyre peninsula. The site has consent for 18 turbines; four ‘borrow pits’; one control building; access tracks; crane hard standings and two meteorological masts. The turbines will have a maximum height of 126m from the base to the tip of the blade, giving an operating capacity of up to 50MW.
The turbines have a maximum height of 126m.
Natural Power modified the on-site resources as required to suit the progress of the forestry keyhole felling as the work progressed. This made sure there was no delay to the project programme, and it came at no additional cost to the client.
18
Soil and rock sampling
ScottishPower Renewables
In addition to the site investigation works, we provided dedicated principal contractor (PC) services for the site investigation works. As part of the PC service, we worked with the client and carried out a full-scale Emergency Response Drill on site.
We carried out a geotechnical site investigation to assess the ground conditions at the turbine locations and other key infrastructure locations to assist with the detailed civil design of the proposed wind farm infrastructure.
There is an operating capacity of up to 50MW.
Trial pitting (264 locations)
Dynamic Cone Penetrometer testing (102 locations)


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/beinn-an-tuirc-wind-farm-phase-3



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/solara4-solar-project
Solara4 solar project
Advising on Solara4, Europe’s largest unsubsidised solar project
Natural Power advises on Europe’s largest unsubsidised solar project: Solara4
Solara4 will be the largest unsubsidised plant in Europe and amongst the top 20 largest solar PV plants in the world.
Following the initial due diligence, we are providing ongoing construction monitoring services to the lenders.
The due diligence and energy yield assessment were led by Natural Power’s UK team, with site inspections and construction LTA services carried out by Natural Power’s French team. Collaborating across our regional offices enabled us to have a presence on site and provide valuable insight into construction progress and challenges throughout the Covid-19 pandemic.
17 Nov 2020
660,000
Solara4 covers a total area of 400 hectares and uses 660,000 solar modules.
Solara4 will generate enough electricity to power 200,000 homes.
Natural Power acted as lender’s technical adviser (LTA) for the financing of the 220 MW Solara4 solar farm in Portugal. Our scope included a detailed review of construction and operational contracts; design and technology; permitting and environmental issues; and the construction schedule. We also completed a finance-grade energy yield assessment for the project, which is unusually complex in terms of its layout and terrain.
20
Portugal
200,000
Solara4 will be the largest unsubsidised plant in Europe and amongst the top 20 largest solar PV plants in the world. Covering a total area of 400 hectares and using 660,000 solar modules, Solara4 will generate enough electricity to power 200,000 homes. Construction of interconnection infrastructure started during 2018 and the PV site in January 2019. The plant is currently in the final stages of construction and will be fully commissioned in 2021.
WElink, Investec and Kommunalkredit


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/natural-power-advises-on-europes-largest-unsubsidised-solar-project-solara4
Our global due diligence team provides services throughout all stages of the transaction cycle, from initial risk assessment and reporting in early transaction stages through to comprehensive reporting for credit-committee or data room presentation at final bid stage or financial close. Find out more
Hannah Staab, Natural Power’s head of advisory – Europe, said: “We were delighted to support WElink, Investec and Kommunalkredit on this financing. Due to its size and complexity, the project is not without challenges, and we were able to draw on the expertise of our global solar team to mitigate technical risks and work with our clients to resolve issues. We look forward to supporting the project until it reaches commercial operations in 2021.”
Solara4 will be the largest unsubsidised plant in Europe and amongst the top 20 largest solar PV plants in the world. Covering a total area of 400 hectares and utilising 660,000 solar modules, Solara4 will generate enough electricity to power 200,000 homes. Construction of interconnection infrastructure started during 2018 and the PV site in January 2019. The plant will be operational in Q2 2021.
The project is being developed by WElink and the lenders are Investec and Kommunalkredit.
Gregor Hogarth, technical manager – Investments and Transactions Europe at WELink Energy, said: “I was pleased with the speed, diligence and flexibility shown by Natural Power, which was coupled with excellent communication throughout. We hope to continue working with Natural Power on our strong pipeline of projects.”
17 Nov 2020 .
The due diligence and energy yield assessment were led by Natural Power’s UK team, with site inspections carried out by Natural Power’s French team. We are continuing to support the lenders by providing construction monitoring throughout the remainder of the construction phase.
Stefan Rattensperger, power and infrastructure finance at Investec added: “The entire Natural Power team has been an absolute pleasure to work with – experienced, professional and truly impartial, with a commercial view on project risks and a systematic approach to resolving them. The team went out of its way in visiting site, during difficult times, and where necessary challenged the contractor. It would be a privilege to work with the team again on similar projects.”
Natural Power has acted as lender’s technical adviser for the financing of the 220 MW Solara4 solar farm in Portugal. This is a landmark project in the European solar market and will be Europe’s largest unsubsidised solar project when completed in 2021.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/natural-power-advises-on-europes-largest-unsubsidised-solar-project-solara4



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/natural-power-advises-on-europes-largest-unsubsidised-solar-project-solara4



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/natural-power-advises-on-europes-largest-unsubsidised-solar-project-solara4
Gregor Hogarth, technical manager – Investments and Transactions Europe at WELink Energy, said: “I was pleased with the speed, diligence and flexibility shown by Natural Power, which was coupled with excellent communication throughout.  We hope to continue working with Natural Power on our strong pipeline of projects.”
Stefan Rattensperger, Power and Infrastructure Finance at Investec added: “The entire Natural Power team has been an absolute pleasure to work with – experienced, professional and truly impartial, with a commercial view on project risks and a systematic approach to resolving them. The team went out of its way in visiting site, during difficult times, and where necessary challenged the contractor. It would be a privilege to work with the team again on similar projects.”


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/solara4-solar-project



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/technical-due-diligence-aventron-portfolio
Providing due diligence across wind farms, solar farms, rooftop solar and hydro installations in six countries
Natural Power’s mandate for the operational sites in the portfolio included a review of technology, O&M contracts and operational performance. The team also completed post-construction yield assessments for the wind and solar assets to benchmark this against industry standard. We further assessed the historic variability of annual production. This involved a deeper dive into various upgrades that had been performed on the hydro assets. We found a fairly wide spread of operational performance across the portfolio that were linked to different contracting approaches within each region, as well as the characteristics of each technology.
Natural Power advises Crédit Mutuel Equity in aventron deal
We reviewed a large portfolio under tight timescales, focusing on key risk areas such as operational performance of the assets, assumptions regarding future build-out, and CAPEX and OPEX benchmarks. Using our pan-European experience and in-depth knowledge of the various technologies, we were able to provide our client with a general level of comfort on the portfolio, as well as allaying specific technical concerns.
Natural Power was engaged by the French private equity specialist Crédit Mutuel Equity to provide technical due diligence to support a CHF 30 million investment in Aventron Ltd. The platform under review included a large number development-stage and operational wind farms, solar farms, rooftop solar and hydro installations in six countries.
For the development-stage assets within the portfolio, we focused on reviewing CAPEX estimates and future cost trend assumptions across the pipeline of wind, solar and hydro projects. This allowed our client to understand how realistic the development ambitions for the portfolio were.
Crédit Mutuel Equity
Technical due diligence on the Aventron portfolio
04 Aug 2020
Norway, France, Germany, Italy, Spain and Switzerland


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/technical-due-diligence-aventron-portfolio



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/news-post/natural-power-advises-credit-mutuel-equity-in-aventron-deal
Natural Power is an independent consultancy and service provider that supports a global client base in the effective delivery of a wide range of renewable projects including onshore wind, solar, renewable heat, energy storage and offshore technologies. It has a global reach, employing more than 400 staff across 12 international offices. Its experience extends across all phases of the project lifecycle from initial feasibility, through construction to operations and throughout all stages of the transaction cycle.
Antoine Millioud, the CEO of aventron, said: “aventron is pursuing a targeted and balanced growth strategy in the field of renewable energy production, focusing on hydro, wind and solar power. The capital raising is a clear sign of trust in the development and the strategy of aventron. We are delighted to be working alongside Crédit Mutuel Equity, a strong institutional investor who will help us consistently pursue our strategy.”
Leading renewable energy consultancy and service provider, Natural Power, has acted as technical adviser to the French private equity specialist Crédit Mutuel Equity for its CHF 30 million investment in aventron Ltd., who owns a renewable energy portfolio consisting of a large number of wind, solar and hydro assets located throughout six European countries.
PR and Media
aventron is Switzerland's third largest producer of green energy. The company acquires and operates photovoltaic solar power plants, onshore wind power plants and small hydropower plants in Switzerland and some European countries. In the medium term, aventron plans to build a balanced and diversified portfolio of assets in the field of renewable energies, with a total capacity of 1,000 megawatts of installed capacity, and thus become a leading operator of power plants in Europe. aventron offers an attractive opportunity for long-term investment in energy infrastructure in Europe.
Natural Power’s mandate for the operational sites in the portfolio included a review of technology, O&M contracts and operational performance. The team also completed post-construction yield assessments for the wind and solar assets. For the development-stage assets within the portfolio, Natural Power focused on reviewing capex estimates and future cost trend assumptions across the pipeline of wind, solar and hydro projects.
4 Aug 2020 .
About Natural Power
About Crédit Mutuel Equity
Natural Power has a deep understanding of financing for renewable energy projects, and helps clients, including banks, developers, independent power producers (IPPs), utilities and investment funds, to make good financial decisions when it comes to green energy projects.
T: 07887 995 589
www.aventron.ch
aventron, based in Münchenstein (Canton of Basel-Land), is a producer of green energy from hydro, wind and solar power. The company is pursuing a diversification strategy based on three technologies (solar PV, onshore wind, and small hydro power) and six countries (Switzerland, France, Germany, Spain, Italy and Norway).
Natural Power on LinkedIn
Jane Maher
Hannah Staab, Natural Power’s Principal Advisor – Europe, said: “This project demonstrates our ability to deliver robust due diligence across a diverse and pan-European range of technology. We are looking forward to see how this equity deal goes on to support the growth and development of aventron across Europe.”
Contact details:
Natural Power on Twitter
Fabienne Mazières, Crédit Mutuel Equity's CEO in Switzerland, adds: “We are delighted to have the opportunity to support aventron in executing on its ambitious growth plans. They fit in well with the philosophy of Crédit Mutuel Equity, a subsidiary of Crédit Mutuel Alliance Fédérale Group, which is extending its support to the infrastructure and renewable energy sectors. We are aware of the benefits that these investments bring to society. This type of partnership fits well with our long-term investment horizon, throughout which we work actively alongside management.”
E: janem@naturalpower.com
About aventron
Crédit Mutuel Equity thus brings together more than 350 managers in a real network of entrepreneurs who offer everyone, whatever the nature of their project, the assurance of benefiting from the experience of others. By investing its own capital (3.0 billion euros), Crédit Mutuel Equity finances companies' projects according to time horizons suited to their development strategy, both in France and internationally.
At the end of 2019, aventron had an installed capacity of 545 megawatts (MW) and generated annual revenues of CHF 102,5 million. aventron seeks to maintain its strong position as the third-largest green power producer in Switzerland (solar, wind and small hydro) and to join the ranks of the leading European green power producers by establishing a fully balanced and diversified portfolio of renewable energy assets with a total installed capacity of 1,000 MW. Extensive industry experience and a network of strategic partners guarantee the project pipeline. Typical acquisition projects involve power plants with a capacity of 200 kW to 50 MW.
Crédit Mutuel Equity brings together all of Crédit's private equity activities; capital development, capital transmission and capital innovation; and provides capital support to managers at all stages of their company's development- from initiation to transmission - by providing them the means and the time necessary to implement their transformation projects.
Thomas Bitzi, Investment Director at Crédit Mutuel Equity in Zurich, said: “This investment is a unique opportunity to support a company that combines growth, resilience and high-quality assets in several European countries, and is working on a daily basis to promote a future based on sustainable energy. aventron's management team enjoys a sound reputation and has a proven track record, both in terms of operations and acquisitions. aventron is in an excellent position to seize any opportunities as the renewable energies market develops.”
www.creditmutuelequity.com
Find out more


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/news/natural-power-advises-credit-mutuel-equity-in-aventron-deal



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/natural-power-advises-credit-mutuel-equity-in-aventron-deal



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/news/news-post/natural-power-advises-credit-mutuel-equity-in-aventron-deal
Leading renewable energy consultancy and service provider, Natural Power, has acted as technical adviser to the French private equity specialist Crédit Mutuel Equity for its CHF 30 million investment in aventron Ltd., who owns a renewable energy portfolio consisting of a large number of wind, solar and hydro assets located throughout six European countries.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/project-detail/bumpers-solar-farm
Natural Power carried out technical due diligence to support Gresham House in acquiring the Bumpers solar farm, which was nearing the end of construction. Our scope included a detailed site inspection to show the construction contractor had fulfilled their obligations and the provisional acceptance certificate could be signed.
Bumpers solar farm
Gresham House
Solar acceptance - Bumpers case study
As we could not visit the site in person, we compiled a snagging list based on photo and video evidence requested from the engineering, procurement and construction (EPC) contractor. We asked for a comprehensive list of photographic evidence to make sure that we could review key parts of the system installation in detail. High-resolution video and images are essential to be able to verify small but crucial details such as torque marks on bolts and plating on the inverters and switchgear. Throughout the review process, we kept in close contact with the EPC contractor to make sure we obtained all relevant evidence, could verify measurements that we would typically make on-site (e.g. module and pyranometer tilt, module height above ground, cable bend radius), and gained a representative view of the site.
Solar acceptance testing during Covid-19
Buckinghamshire, England
Two days before the scheduled site inspection at Bumpers, the UK government announced strict Covid-19 lockdown measures, and we could no longer carry out a physical site inspection. To avoid delaying provisional acceptance and allow Gresham House to complete its acquisition of the solar farm, we performed our inspection virtually. This enabled our client to feel assured about the quality and completeness of the installation, and successfully close the transaction within the target timescales.
30 Jul 2020
Following several rounds of review, we were able to confirm that all snagging items had been closed out by the EPC contractor and the site could be handed over to our client.


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/projects/bumpers-solar-farm



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/us/expertise/analysis



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/expertise/analysis



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/life-at-natural-power/story/scott-bennett
Behind all these wind farms there are lease agreements with the landowners. When an asset reaches the end of its predicted life, they must be extended to permit life extension. There’s a level of negotiation that goes into extending a lease agreement to allow you to submit the application to extend [the wind farm] but also the rights to continue to operate the wind farm. I mostly get involved with looking at the land deals and how they’re set up and what rights and obligations the wind farm has to allow for a life extension. There may be consideration for the rental level during the later extension period or for decommissioning bonds, where the landowner is assured that there’s enough money in the budget for decommissioning to allow the wind farm to be dismantled and the land restored to its previous condition.
It was a feasibility project, but sadly it didn’t come to anything as the cost of the batteries at that time were prohibitive. Hopefully, in the coming years, we may be able to revisit the project because battery prices are coming down, but I think it will be more likely that people will connect their electrical vehicles into their house, and that will be the battery. People will have their 50–60 kw battery outside their house, and it will provide the secure electricity they need.
What does your role entail?
What is the most interesting project you have worked on and why?
A good example was one recent job in Wales. It was an extension of a wind farm, and they’ve opted for tip height increase to make it better financially with no subsidy. A route that they’ve used for two other wind farms next door just isn’t suitable, so we’ve had to agree a cross country bypass with other landowners to bypass the pinch point in the local road network. Generally, there is a solution to pinch points, but it’s about working out what’s most sensible for the wind farm and then going out to get the land signed up.
I passed my Royal Institution of Chartered Surveys (RICS) exams, and that means I can put MRICS on the end of my name. Getting that formal recognition has helped with my career, as a lot of the agents I speak with are chartered surveyors as well. There’s a lot of ethics and competence that goes with being chartered. Having an understanding of competencies and ethics shows an industry competency that clients appreciate. The people we look to bring into the land team are either working towards or are chartered surveyors as well.
One of the complications is that a lot of the sites that are close to repowering or life extension would have been consented 20 years ago, and what was submitted then would not be accepted today. One of the most common issues we see is having to extend the crane pads: the ones used 15 years ago could be considered as too small now. When you go for life extension, you’re having to consent another 50% larger crane pad or so, so that when you’re replacing things like the gearboxes, there’s the ability to do that. It’s not as simple as adding 10 years on to its life. It’s assessing if the asset is still fit for purpose and that you can do blade and gearbox replacements moving forward.
What is your biggest achievement at work?
How did you get into the role in the first place?
What do you enjoy most about your role?
I have a degree in geography and a master’s in land economy, which is rural surveying, from the University of Aberdeen. I have always enjoyed geography, which is effectively what we do here. I did my rural surveying, and I always thought I would be a more traditional surveyor, looking at farms and estates, but I didn’t have a formal rural background. That made it difficult because I didn’t have that inert farming knowledge. So, when this job came up over 10 years ago, I had finished my dissertation on the effects of wind turbines on grouse, so thought I would give it a go. A lot of people didn’t have years of renewables experience at that point, so it wasn’t a barrier that I didn’t come from renewables. I applied for the job and started as an assistant land agent. Over the years, I’ve worked my way up to principal land agent.
I enjoy the marrying of the physical world, such as road corners and swept path analysis, and dealing with people and how you communicate that. Most landowners are happy to get involved with wind farm development, as they would have seen the blades going by their door and seen the wind farms being built. They want a slice of that action; we may be able to give that to them. They see that renewables are here to stay and the need for it, and that’s always positive. You play on the narrative that this is good for them, the environment and the economy.
It would be a community project I did for Carsphairn community council. This was looking at installing either residential batteries at individual homes and being able to amalgamate them up into a larger battery offering or installing a single large battery in the village. It was between installing 100 4–5 kw batteries or installing a 500 kw battery in town. Local Energy Scotland funded it, and the client was a community council. [The community council] were people who had given up their free time to come along and see if this was something the village could benefit from. The idea was that they were going to use part of their wind farm community benefit fund to purchase the battery. They get blackouts in their village, so they wanted the batteries to make revenue and give them more grid security. It was a different client and scale than what I generally get involved in at Natural Power. We look at megawatts scale projects; this was kilowatts.
When looking at repowering projects, one of the big issues is larger blades, as there’s likely a lot more work to upgrade the public roads to transport them to site. Twenty years ago, you may have had a handful of landowners with roads containing tight corners to get to a site, so it wasn’t too complicated. These days, some sites have 30+ corners with owners that need to sign up. That can take almost more time, if not longer, than signing up the landowners on the site where the turbines will be located. I spend a lot of my time doing that land referencing, exclusivities and options taken up with the third-party access landowners.
I fire up the laptop and review emails that have come in from the day before and set out what sort of tasks I’ll prioritise. I may have a few calls with landowner’s agents or developers, so I’ll spend my day going between clients and the development team and making sure everything is connected up. For example, has site access been arranged? Has notice been given to the landowner for turning up? Is the layout of the wind farm correct as per what the landowner is wishing to see? All of these things need to be well managed to ensure the relationship between the developments and landowner is healthy. I get involved in lease plans and may need some negotiation of property agreements. It’s a lot of dealing with middlemen. I also speak with other land agents in the team and see what they are up to for the next few days.
My role is about the marriage of land rights with planning and permitting for renewables projects. I look at planning considerations, review planning applications and assess the need for an environmental impact assessment (EIA) assessment report. This is standard form whether you are starting to develop a wind farm from scratch and you would have to submit a planning application, or whether you are considering the next steps in a wind farm’s life, such as repowering or decommissioning. I also get involved in the property side.
Generally, a developer comes with a site and says, “this is where we fancy putting a wind farm”. Then the land team will do some land referencing, and that’s working out who owns the land. We’ll then start trying to make contact through letters, door knocking or telephone calls. Once we know who owns [the land] and we’ve spoken to them and they’re keen for a wind farm, we’ll introduce them to the exclusivity agreement. This says the wind farm developer has an exclusive right to progress with a development on this site and they have the access to do necessary surveys. This usually goes on for 12 months. During this time you negotiate a heads of terms that outlines the fundamental commercial and practical terms in the options lease document. It takes you through which rights and obligations you have, such as planting trees or habitat management, and rental payments. Then you can go into things like insurances and public liability or record of conditions. Once that’s agreed it goes to the solicitor and they create the full Option Lease, and that goes back and forth through various drafts before being agreed. A typical Option would last for 5–10 years, and that’s when the planning application begins. The development phase takes place knowing the property side is secured. I work with the landowner and developer throughout that whole process.
My job is about forming good relationships, and a level of trust is built up over time. When considering a repowering or life extension situations, if the relationships are strained, it will make it harder to extend the site for another 10 years or repowering for 35 years. There’s no guarantee that you’ll get a repowering consent for a brand new wind farm over a life extension, so you have to be completely honest and open with all stakeholders about what you’re hoping to achieve.
What does your day typically consist of?


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/scott-bennett



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/life-at-natural-power/story/louise-renton
I enjoy the dynamic environment and the fact that you really do not know what can happen in a day! That can prove challenging. On the other hand, it is also rewarding when you manage to sort an issue out and get a positive outcome.
Generally, I provide operational and admin support to the site operations manager and our client. This includes overseeing vital equipment and ensuring that it is always in a state of full repair and calibration; financial management; reporting on health and safety; co-ordinating facilities management activities; carrying out monthly site inspections; and inducting visitors on to the site.
I think working in a pressured and high energy environment means you must be able to adapt to constant “curveballs” and associated challenges that comes with that. The ability to plan an ever-changing workload is a key skill in this job as well as being able to adapt to a to- do list that is never empty!
I saw an advert in a local newspaper advert for an administrator, but the role naturally developed into operations assistant. I previously worked as a firefighter, so the thought of being at height did not phase me in this job.
I really enjoy working in an environment where I get to see so much wildlife. I was lucky enough to see the residents of the owl breeding boxes our ecologists have on site which just made my day! I am known as the “Dr Doolittle” on site. I rescued an injured buzzard on the outskirts of site that was hopping along the track. I brought him back to the office until the Scottish Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals (SSPCA) arrived to take him away. They rehabilitated him and released him back at site. I  also rescued a deer that was stuck on a fence one morning on my way into work. All in a day’s work at the wind farm! The flip side of that is that I have been in close proximity to the adders that reside on site. I also came across hundreds of toads in breeding season on the tracks which nearly killed me off as I have a fear of frogs. I was very brave that day!
Louise Renton | Wind Farm Operations Assistant | Natural Power
The role was very different when I started, and it has grown hugely as the site has expanded.  I was integral in the set-up of the site office. It was a bare shell when we moved in, so everything needed to be done, such as sourcing furniture, utilities and getting contractors for facilities work.
As part of a site management team, I assist with the day-to-day management of operational and administrative activities of one of the UK’s largest onshore wind farms
What is the most interesting part of the job and why?
Anyone who has worked on a wind farm knows there is most certainly no “typical” day! It is a long-standing joke that when things become “challenging” we blame it on the disobedient local monks who were banished from a nearby abbey in years gone by!


SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/about/louise-renton



SOURCE: https://www.naturalpower.com/uk/legals/terms-conditions
